<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891013-0020 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-13-89.f2.A1019</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register </T4> / Vol. 54, No. 197 / Friday, October 13, 1989 / Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Family Support Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">45 CFR Parts 205, 224, 233, 234, 238, 239, 240, 250, 255 and 256 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 0970-AA68  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Aid to Families With Dependent Children; Job Opportunities and BasicSkills Training (JOBS) Program; Child Care and Supportive Services; ConformingChanges to Existing Regulations   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Family Support Administration (FSA), HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This final rule implements title II of the Family SupportAct of 1988 (the Statute), Public Law 100-485, which creates the Job Opportunitiesand Basic Skills Training (JOBS) Program for recipients of Aid to Familieswith Dependent Children (AFDC). The JOBS program is designed to assistrecipients to become self-sufficient by providing needed employment-relatedactivities and support services.  This final rule also implements sections 301 and 302 of the Statute. Section301 guarantees child care and provides other supportive services for JOBSparticipants and recipients who are in approved educational and trainingactivities, and guarantees child care for those who are working. Section302 guarantees child care for twelve months for certain individuals whohave lost AFDC eligibility due to increased earnings, increased hours ofwork, or loss of the earned income disregard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>October 13, 1989. (For further explanation, pleasesee ``Overview of JOBS Program Implementation.'')</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Mark Ragan, Family Support Administration,Office of Family Assistance, Fifth Floor, 370 L'Enfant Promenade, SW.,Washington, DC, 20447, telephone (202) 252-5118.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:  </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background  </ITAG>Studies indicate that the average length of time an AFDC family receivesassistance is about 2 years. Included in that average are many familieswho remain on assistance for a protracted period of time. Often, the parent(or parents) in these families lacks the necessary skills or basic educationto find employment and become self- sufficient. In many cases, the parentbegan to receive assistance as a teenager, never finished high school,and has never developed the skills needed to find and keep employment. Current Federal law and implementing regulations provide for a number ofwork and training programs for AFDC recipients_the Work Incentive (WIN)program, the Work Incentive Demonstration (WIN Demo) program, the communitywork experience program (CWEP), the employment search program, and thework supplementation program. However, since most of these work programsare optional, and State support for the programs has varied, implementationof work and training programs has been uneven among the States. A numberof studies of possible factors fostering welfare dependence cite the needfor reliable and affordable child care in order to obtain and maintainemployment. Lack of other support services, such as transportation, hasalso been mentioned as hindering employment.  On October 13, 1988, the President signed the Family Support Act (the Statute),Public Law 100-485. Title II of the Statute establishes the Job Opportunitiesand Basic Skills Training (JOBS) program under title IV-F of the SocialSecurity Act (the Act). The purpose of JOBS is to assure that needy familieswith children obtain the education, training, and employment that willhelp them avoid long-term welfare dependence. Title III provides childcare and other services in support of employment and education and trainingactivities.  Because the Statute affects programs administered by a number of Departments,we actively sought suggestions and comments from the Departments of Education,Interior, and Labor. We also considered letters received in the mail andcomments at numerous meetings held with representatives of State IV-A agencies,Indian Tribes, Alaska Native organizations, welfare rights organizations,and other interested parties during the period in which the proposed regulationswere being developed. In addition, we carefully reviewed over 700 commentswhich were received on various aspects of the regulations. <ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of the Regulations  </ITAG>In the final regulations, we have followed the format of the proposed regulationsissued April 18, 1989 (54 FR  15638) with one exception. We have movedthe definition of ``participation'' to a new andSection; 250.78. We havewritten the preamble and final regulations so that they do not requirereference back to the proposed regulations.  Preamble language in the finalregulations generally follows the same sequence as in the preamble to theproposed regulations, and we have interspersed comments and responses asappropriate. Regulatory language remains the same except when pertinentchanges have been made. Some information about the WIN and IV-A work programs,which we had included as background for the proposed regulations, has beendeleted from the preamble to the final regulations.  This discussion is divided into three parts. The first addresses all aspectsof the JOBS program; the second addresses provisions regarding child careand other supportive services; and the third part describes changes tothe existing regulations in the title IV-A program.   Provisions contained in title II of the Statute regarding workers' issues,such as working conditions, tort claims protection, workers' compensation,and displacement are included in a separate regulatory package developedjointly by the Department of Health and Human Services and the Departmentof Labor. Several related amendments affecting the AFDC program containedin the Statute, as well as changes to the title IV-D program, are includedin separate regulations packages. Section 303, which provides for the extensionof Medical Assistance under title XIX of the Social Security Act when afamily loses AFDC eligibility, will be implemented under separate regulationsto be published by the Health Care Financing Administration.  <ITAG tagnum="84">JOBS  </ITAG>Public Law 100-485 requires State IV-A agencies to have a JOBS programunder a plan approved by the Secretary of HHS no later than October 1,1990, or, at State option, as early as July 1, 1989. It further requireseach State IV-A agency to make the program available in each subdivisionof the State where it is feasible to do so by October 1, 1992. At leastevery 2 years, the State IV-A agency must review and update its JOBS planand submit the updated plan to the Secretary for approval.  Sections 202(a) and 204 of the Statute provide for the repeal of the currentWIN and WIN Demonstration programs upon State implementation of the JOBSprogram, which may be no later than October 1, 1990. JOBS program authorityis under the new title IV-F of the Act.  <ITAG tagnum="84">Child Care and Other Supportive Services  </ITAG>Under the Statute, at the time that a State IV-A agency implements theJOBS program, the State IV-A agency must provide funding for child care,or provide child care, if the State IV-A agency determines that it is necessaryto accept or maintain employment, or to enable participation in a JOBSeducation or training program or another approved education or trainingprogram. It also requires that participants be assisted with transportationand other work-related supportive services. Under section 302, effectiveApril 1, 1990, twelve months of child care (transitional child care) isguaranteed for former recipients who received AFDC in 3 of the 6 monthsprior to the loss of AFDC as the result of increased hours of work, increasedearnings, or the loss of the earned income disregards. Child care fees(to partially offset the costs) must be charged on a sliding scale basedon the family's ability to pay. The transitional child care provision isin effect until September 30, 1998.   <ITAG tagnum="84">Technical and Conforming Amendments  </ITAG>Section 202 of the Statute amends certain sections of title IV-A of theAct and repeals title IV-C. These changes are necessitated by the creationof the JOBS program and the close-out of the WIN and WIN Demo programs. They include, among others, the repeal of the community work experience,employment search and work supplementation programs as of October 1, 1990,unless the State IV-A agency is operating under an approved JOBS plan priorto that date.  <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Procedures  </ITAG>Executive Order 12291  Executive Order 12291 requires that a regulatory impact analysis be performedfor any ``major rule.'' A major rule is one that:<ITAG tagnum="15">_Has an annual effect on the national economy of $100 million or more;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Results in a major increase in costs or prices for consumers, anyindustries, any government agencies, or any geographic region; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Has significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or on the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.</ITAG>The increased expenditures authorized for JOBS and child care and othersupportive services under the Statute are expected to have an annual effecton the national economy of over $100 million in each of the first fiveyears of operation. The calculations for expenditures under the Statuteare based on the anticipation of increased expenditures in work, trainingand education programs, and related supportive services (particularly childcare), which will be partially offset by payment of child care fees byparents as well as reduced welfare costs in the long run. It is envisionedthat required funding levels will decrease over time as a result of theimpact of the JOBS program on long-term dependency and the number of familieson AFDC.   We have determined that any economic impact in excess of $100 million peryear is the result of section 201 of Public Law 100-485 (the Statute).The implementing regulations will not significantly affect expenditures. For this reason, an extensive analysis of the economic impact of theseregulations is not required.  There may be increased administrative costs for State IV-A agencies dueto the expansion of work programs and related support services, but suchcosts are not mandated by these regulations. State IV-A agency decisionsconcerning work programs and supportive services will affect administrativecosts. Some increase in costs may be necessary because the Statute requiresa minimum number of programs.   There is no evidence that competition, employment, investment, productivity,innovation or the United States' competitiveness will be affected adversely,as a result of these regulations.  Paperwork Reduction Act  Public reporting burden for the collections of information found at 45CFR 250, 255, and 256 are estimated to average 22 hours for FSA 302, 12hours for FSA 103, and 50 hours for FSA 104, including the time for reviewinginstructions, searching existing data sources, gathering and maintainingdata needed, and completing and reviewing the collection of information.These information collection requirements are subject to review and approvalby the Office of Management and Budget under the Paperwork Reduction Actof 1980. Send comments regarding the burden estimates or any other aspectof these collections of information to the Family Support Administration,370 L'Enfant Promenade, SW., Washington, DC 20447; and to the Office ofInformation and Regulatory Affairs, Office of Management and Budget, Washington,DC 20503.  Regulatory Flexibility Act  The Secretary certifies, under 5 U.S.C. 605(b), enacted by Public Law 96-354,the Regulatory Flexibility Act, that these regulations, if promulgated,will not result in a significant impact on a substantial number of smallentities because it primarily affects State governments and individuals.Certain small entities, such as providers of child care services, couldreceive a positive benefit from this program.   We received one comment requesting that we address economic impacts, whetherthey are positive or negative.  The Department has traditionally takenthe view that if the economic impact of a given action is expected to bepositive, an economic impact statement under the Regulatory FlexibilityAct is unnecessary. The additional spending on child care is expected tobe a very small part of the total spending on child care in the UnitedStates. We have identified nothing in these regulations which have a directeconomic effect on child care providers or other small businesses. Anyeconomic impact would stem not from these regulations but, from the additionalFederal funding appropriated by Congress to implement this Statute. Theseregulations merely ensure that the basic decisions on what services shallbe provided and chosen will be made by the States, and parents of the childreninvolved.  Therefore, we have concluded, and the Secretary has certified, that a regulatoryimpact analysis as provided in Public Law 96-354, the Regulatory FlexibilityAct, is not required. These regulations are issued under the authorityof section 1102 of the Social Security Act.  Federalism and Family Effects  We certify that this action has been assessed using the criteria and principlesset forth in Executive Orders 12606 and 12612.  Analysis Required by Executive Order 12612 on Federalism  If a policy leads to Federal control over traditional State responsibilitiesor decreases the ability of a State to make policy decisions with respectto its own functions, that policy is determined to have a significant federalismeffect.  The Statute requires that all State IV-A agencies implement a JOBS programby October 1, 1990. In addressing the problems of welfare dependency, whichare national in scope, the Statute mandates certain JOBS activities, andrequires State IV-A agencies to choose to implement two of four optionalprogram activities (job search, on-the-job training, work supplementation,and community work experience programs).   Previously, State IV-A agencies were required to have a Work Incentive(WIN) or WIN Demonstration program and could elect to provide other workprograms. Under the work program option, the State IV-A agency chose whichtype of work programs to implement.  The Family Support Act is more specific than prior work program authoritiesregarding the activities which may be offered by State IV-A agencies andthe population they are to serve under the various program authorities. However, within these limitations, the final regulations are written toallow the State IV-A agency considerable flexibility in the design andoperation of its JOBS program. Moreover, title II of the Statute providesauthority to Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizations to operate autonomousprograms.  HHS has consulted with State IV-A Directors, other State, County, Tribaland local representatives, welfare rights advocacy groups, labor unions,and similar organizations for their comments and suggestions in those areasof the program where options are available. In response to the Notice ofProposed Rulemaking published April 18, 1989, we received over 700 commentletters covering a number of areas in the regulations. The final regulationsreflect consideration of those comments and suggestions.  The Statute mandates Federal support and technical assistance from theDepartments of Health and Human Services and Labor in enhancing the flexibilityand information resources of each State. Federal assistance is also requiredto be available to State IV-A agencies upon request for program assessmentand to ensure that State  IV-A agencies have adequate information bothto carry out the program and to develop programs specifically fashionedto their demographic requirements. The Statute calls for the development of performance standards by October1993. The Department is directed to do so in consultation with the Secretaryof Labor, Governors, State and local program administrators, community-basedorganizations, and similar groups. This permits participation by Statesthrough the entire development process. In its rulemaking, the Departmenthas made a conscious effort to refrain from prematurely establishing standardsbut, based on section 487(b) of the Act, as added by section 203 of theStatute, the Department establishes certain uniform reporting requirementsfor performance standard purposes. We expect no State laws to be preempted. Analysis Required by Executive Order 12606 on the Family  The JOBS program is expected to have an overall beneficial family impact.This analysis discusses this impact in terms of the criteria in the ExecutiveOrder.   (a) The objectives of the JOBS program, to provide training, education,job placement, and employment to end welfare dependency, will result inmore secure and stable family units. For two-parent families, the Statuteprovides State options for the participation of both parents, thus enlistingeach in the drive toward independence. The potential danger to family self-image,stability and marital commitment posed by welfare dependency increasesas a family remains on welfare. The decrease in dependency and increasein self-sufficiency which the Statute is designed to achieve will helpstrengthen families and ameliorate the erosive effects of poverty.  (b) The Statute provides significant support for the nurture and supervisionof children in the form of guaranteed child care, which will enable parentsto work to achieve self-sufficiency and increase their earnings.  Parentswill continue to have supervision of their children as they would havein any working family, with options for choosing sources of child care.Federal financial support for child care services in no way changes thenature of that care, which may continue to be provided by relatives, friendsand neighbors without State intrusion, except insofar as States and localitieshave already chosen, or may in the future choose, to regulate or licenseday care providers, or ensure that center-based care becomes subject tohealth and safety protections.   Some families may feel that control over their own destiny is diminishedby the extension of mandatory requirements established by Congress to continuetheir education or seek employment while placing their children in childcare. This is true in a limited sense, but it represents a positive compromiseby a family in which a tradeoff is made between immediate autonomy anda better future through cooperation with the requirements under the JOBSprogram.   (c) The JOBS program does not substitute governmental activity for anyof the functions of the family. It will help the family perform its nurturingfunctions. It will also provide support while the family attains economicindependence.  (d) The JOBS program is specifically directed at increasing family earnings.Under JOBS and the other Family Support Act provisions for enhanced earnedincome disregards, supportive services, transitional child care and otherbenefits lasting beyond the period of AFDC eligibility, earnings are lessapt to be offset by reductions of grants or loss of associated benefits.  (e) The JOBS options and services are to be designed and delivered by thenon-Federal levels of government, i.e., States, localities, and IndianTribes. The Federal government will not intrude upon family autonomy ordecisions.  (f) The provisions in the Statute regarding the JOBS training program andthe related child care and other supportive services emphasize that a strongfamily structure is critical for the nation's economic strength, and isan important source of values that promote the work ethic. Targeting familiesin economic crisis with supportive services and active help towards gaining(or regaining) strength and self-sufficiency, sends the message that alllevels of government are getting involved in assisting families.  (g) Finally, the emphasis on achievement in the JOBS program should sendthe right message to young people about the rewards of self-reliance andthe direct connection between responsible behavior and their own economicsuccess.  Objectives of the Family Support Act and These Regulations  The Family Support Act embodies a new consensus that the well-being ofchildren depends not only on meeting their material needs, but also onthe parent's ability to become economically self-sufficient. The Statuteassumes that self-sufficiency and family responsibility are necessary andachievable goals and makes education, training, and child care availableto allow individuals to reach these goals. The Statute further recognizesthe mutual obligations of parents, who are currently dependent, to worktoward self-sufficiency through private employment, and of the governmentto support that effort.  These final regulations have been drafted to implement the objectives ofthe Statute and of the Administration of President Bush. Several key principleshave guided their development:<ITAG tagnum="15">_That the value of the Aid to Families with Dependent Children programshould be measured not just by its ability to meet the income needs ofindividuals served, but also by its ability to help these individuals achieveindependence;   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_That parents have the primary responsibility for the support andwelfare of their children and that programs should be designed to helpparents meet these responsibilities;  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_That women and their children represent the overwhelming proportionof AFDC recipients; that within this group the most dependent are never-marriedmothers who did not complete high school and who had their first childat a young age; and that programs designed to reduce overall dependencymust necessarily address this group;  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_That consistent with individual responsibility is choice, and thatparents be given a wide range of options for child care while participatingin the program;  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_That education (such as literacy and high-school equivalency) isone of the most important tools an individual needs to achieve full citizenshipand independence, and that this should be an important JOBS component; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_That skills training can be an important element in an individual'sreaching self-sufficiency;  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_That JOBS programs be designed to prepare participants for privateemployment in jobs they can realistically be expected to obtain;  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_That resources be maximized through the coordination of existingprograms at all levels of government and in concert with community-basedvolunteer and business organizations; and  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_That States be given maximum flexibility to design program componentswithin the JOBS provisions of the Statute in order to tailor programs tomeet local needs.</ITAG>In the sections below, we discuss our overall plan for program implementation,and provide in-depth discussions of each section of the final regulations.In these discussions, we refer to the Family Support Act of 1988 as ``theStatute,'' and the Social Security Act as ``the Act.''  We also use thepronoun ``she'' when referring to applicants, recipients, and participants.Unless otherwise specified, ``she'' is a generic term meaning both sheand he. This choice of terminology is appropriate because the great majorityof adult caretakers in the AFDC program are women.  Overview of JOBS Program Implementation Section 204 of the Family Support Act of 1988 permits State IV-A agenciesto implement a JOBS program as of July 1, 1989, regardless of the publicationof implementing regulations. Fifteen States implemented on July 1, 1989. JOBS and Supportive Services plans for States, Indian Tribes and AlaskaNative organizations implementing JOBS prior to publication of the finalregulations must meet the requirements of the Statute.  We plan to provide preprints for JOBS and Supportive Services plans followingpublication of the final regulations. These preprints will provide fora description of the design and operation of States' JOBS programs andassociated supportive services. Prior to issuance by the Department, theseforms will be submitted for approval to the Office of Management and Budget. For the purposes of the following discussion, we use the terms ``interimplans'' and ``initial plans''. Interim plans are plans submitted by a StateIV-A agency in a format other than preprints. Initial plans are the firstplans submitted by a State IV-A agency and can be either an interim planor a preprinted plan, depending on when the plans are submitted. StateIV-A agencies must submit initial JOBS and Supportive Services plans 45days before planned implementation. When the plan preprint is made available,States which are operating a JOBS program under interim plans will be given90 days to resubmit plans in the required format.   Federal financial participation (FFP) will not be available for expendituresincurred before the date that initial JOBS and Supportive Services plansare approved.  More information regarding this issue, as well as the  StateJOBS and Supportive Services plan review process, is provided below.  The preamble discussion generally follows the sequence of the final regulations,with the exception that the description of conforming changes to the existingregulations is last, whereas the conforming changes precede the JOBS andSupportive Services sections in the final regulations.   <ITAG tagnum="72">PART 250_JOB OPPORTUNITIES AND BASIC SKILLS TRAINING PROGRAM  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions  </ITAG>Purpose (andSection; 250.0 of the Final Regulations)  This section of the final regulations contains the goals of the JOBS Programand the regulatory objectives of Part 250.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that we use the purposeof the JOBS Program as stated in section 481(a) of the Act instead of thelanguage from section 482(c) of the Act, which provides that the Stateagency ``must ensure that all applicants for and recipients of aid to familieswith dependent children are encouraged, assisted, and required to fulfilltheir responsibilities to support their children by preparing for, accepting,and retaining such employment as they are capable of performing.''   <T3>Response: </T3>We have decided to use the language from section 481(a)of the Act to describe the overall purpose of the JOBS Program. However,we have added the language from section 482(c) of the Act that emphasizesparental responsibility to the more specific list of program goals containedin this section. We believe that the goal of ensuring that parents haveprimary responsibility for the support of their children is fundamentalto the entire purpose of the Family Support Act of 1988.  Definitions (andSection; 250.1 of the Final Regulations)  We have included a number of definitions in order to facilitate understandingof the regulations. These definitions are discussed below.  <ITAG tagnum="81">Terms Related to the JOBS Program  </ITAG>The term ``adult recipient'' is defined in accordance with section 403(k)(4)of the Social Security Act. The term ``caretaker relative'' is used inseveral places in the Act. However, we have not provided a definition inthese regulations. Traditionally, States have established procedures fordetermining who the caretaker relative is for each assistance unit, andwe have continued this practice. The term ``target population'' is definedto meet the requirements of sections 403(1)(2)(B) and 403(1)(2)(C) of theAct. The definition includes provision for any State to adjust the particulartarget populations if it satisfactorily justifies the change to the Secretary. For purposes of convenient reference in the body of the regulations, wedefine a number of words and acronyms.  These include standard referencessuch as ``Secretary'' and ``Department''; thus, any reference to the Departmentsof, or the Secretaries of, Education, Interior, or Labor is made specific.We define ``component'' as including all services and activities that aState may make available under  andSection;andSection; 250.44 through 250.48.We define a number of acronyms common to work and welfare programs, suchas ``CWEP,'' ``OJT,'' and ``UP.'' We include ``FFP'' for Federal financialparticipation. We include a definition of ``MSA'' since we require theuse of defined Metropolitan Statistical Areas in assessing issues relatedto statewideness requirements in the legislation. We add several acronymsthat are specific to JOBS, such as the ``JOBS'' acronym itself, and ''JAS''as the reference for the JOBS Automated System for recordkeeping and reportingpurposes.  <ITAG tagnum="81">Terms Related to Educational Programs, Services or Activities  </ITAG>The Family Support Act provides for extensive educational services, andsets certain requirements, such as that participants ``make satisfactoryprogress.'' We have defined the terms related to these services and requirementsin accordance with Federal and State definitions when they are well understood,widely accepted, and feasible to use in connection with JOBS. For example,the definition of the term ``institution of higher education'' derivesfrom the corresponding definition of the term found in section 481(a) andsection 1201(a) of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C.1088 and 1141).  <T3>Basic Literacy Level. </T3>The phrase ``basic and remedial educationto achieve a basic literacy level'' is listed in the Act as one of themandatory educational activities of JOBS. Also, section 482(d)(2) of theAct provides that the State agency shall include educational activitiesas a component of participation in JOBS if the individual does not havea high school diploma or the equivalent, unless her employability planhas a long-term employment goal that does not require high school educationor she demonstrates a basic literacy level.  In the NPRM, we proposed that basic literacy level mean a basic literacylevel that allows a person to function at the level of an individual whohas successfully completed the eighth grade. Our basis for that proposalwas the recently proposed regulations for implementing the Adult EducationAct, which indicated both that adult basic education includes educationthrough grade 8.9 and that ''adult secondary education'' includes instructiondesigned for an adult who ``is literate and can function in everyday life,but is not proficient.'' We also considered that in the list of mandatoryeducational activities contained in the Act, ``basic and remedial educationto achieve a basic literacy level'' is an item separate from ``high schoolor equivalent education.'' Further, we took into account that these termswere characterized in the Act as ``educational activities,'' and that ``jobskills training'' and ``job readiness activities to help prepare participantsfor work'' were listed separately from the educational activities.  <T3>Comment: </T3>We received many letters containing comments on our proposeddefinition of basic literacy level. The majority of the commenters didnot favor our proposal.  Many of those commenters stated a preference forthe level of completed high school. A few commenters said the proposedlevel of ``successfully completed the eighth grade'' is too high. A fewcommenters advocated the use of State or local literacy criteria. Somecommenters did not approve of the concept of completion of a school gradelevel, preferring a competency based, functional definition. A few commentersdid not object to completed eighth grade as a basic literacy level. Onecommenter suggested that the definition refer only to reading skills atthe completed 8th grade level. Similarly, another commenter preferred a10th grade reading skill definition.   While most commenters said the eighth grade is too low to promote self-sufficiency,some stated that the level is too high to be in harmony with the goalsof JOBS and to take advantage of existing services with which JOBS is intendedto be coordinated, e.g. JTPA programs. A committee of a State legislatureobserved that using the proposed level of literacy would increase costsand thereby reduce the number of educational assignments that could bemade for JOBS participants. Another agency within the same State askedthat if a grade level continued to be used, it should be no higher thanthe grade level proposed. An organization involved in serving AFDC clientsapproved of the definition, which it saw as being advantageous in coordinatingwith adult and alternative education programs.  Some commenters did notview ``successfully completed the eighth grade'' as being as precise inmeaning as ``grade 8.9.'' Others stated that the definition did not conveyadequately measured performance. They, therefore, suggested that the definitionincorporate the use of a standardized testing tool to measure successfulcompletion of the eighth grade.   One commenter pointed out that using only a grade level, as opposed tosetting out the specific proficiencies that comprise basic literacy, posedproblems in instances where criterion-referenced assessment measures areused.  Many groups suggested focusing the definition on a list of thoseproficiencies, usually consisting of reading comprehension, written communication,verbal communication, computation, and problem-solving. Many of the groups seeking to have basic literacy  established at the completedhigh school level cited studies of workforce trends that indicate thatmost new jobs being created will require basic skills at the high schoollevel or above. Some of them reasoned that the wording of the Act at section482(d)(2), concerning participants age 20 or over, indicated Congress'intent that basic literacy would be equivalent with a high school leveleducation. Some stated that the definition of basic literacy should becompatible with what they saw as the strong emphasis upon achieving a highschool education for participants under the age of 20 contained in section402(a)(19)(E) of the Act. It was the sense of some of the comments thatthe use of a lower than high school level in defining basic literacy wouldresult in States choosing to deny participants the opportunity to earna high school diploma or the equivalent.  Other commenters requested that the States be given flexibility in definingbasic literacy levels for the purpose of JOBS, in view of regional differencesin the skills needed by the labor force. However, one literacy group favoreda national, functional standard, because it said that States vary in theirviews of the content of a particular grade level. Some stated that basicliteracy should be determined by the particular occupational goal of theparticipant. Some commenters wanted ``life skills'' to be incorporatedas part of the definition.   We also received views that indicated that the broader range of goals appropriatefor participants under the Adult Education Act, many of which are not orientedtoward employment, made it difficult to apply definitions designed foradult education programs to the JOBS program. We note that Congress hasrequired the U.S. Department of Education to make a determination of thecriteria for defining literacy. The results of that study will be availablein 1990. Also, the Department of Labor has contracted for a study of JTPAprogram participation that will profile workplace literacy levels and producea workplace literacy testing instrument by 1991. These two Federal studiesare expected to produce useful information on literacy relative to JOBS.  <T3>Response: </T3>Since the comments on this issue did not yield clearguidance concerning establishing a definition of ''basic literacy level,''and since the results of the two important Federal studies are not yetavailable, we have decided that at this time we will maintain our proposeddefinition with two modifications made for the purpose of clarification.First, for purpose of precision, we now refer to grade 8.9, instead ofsuccessfully completed eighth grade. Second, we now indicate that the individualis expected to function ``at least'' at that level, emphasizing that Statesmay define basic literacy at a higher level.  We did not choose to lower the grade level for this definition becausethe comments indicate a trend toward greater literacy needs in the workplace.Moreover, even though a few States said they preferred a lower level thanproposed in order to coordinate with JTPA, the Department of Labor commentedthat the basic literacy level should be defined as a literacy level abovethe 8th grade on a generally accepted standardized test or equivalent scoreon a criterion referenced test. Since our definition of basic literacylevel does not prescribe the method of assessing the individual's educationalachievement level, our reference to a grade level should not be interpretedto preclude use of equivalent scores in criterion-referenced assessmentsystems.  We recognize the trend toward a more literate workforce and strongly urgeeach State to adopt a definition of basic literacy level that will fulfillthe aim of JOBS to reduce welfare dependency and foster self-sufficiency.The individual's educational skills, her skills that compose the conceptof ``job readiness,'' and appropriate job skills form a critical core ofcharacteristics leading toward self-sufficiency. It would not serve anyuseful purpose under JOBS for a State to excuse an individual from educationalactivities on the basis of her performance at grade 8.9 if the local jobmarket requires a higher level of educational competency to produce long-termself-sufficiency.   The issue of literacy impacts upon all aspects of life in the United Statesand has commanded the close attention of the administration of PresidentBush. Thus, our interest in the topic reaches far beyond literacy's relevanceto welfare reform. We will continue to coordinate with the Departmentsof Education and Labor to reach an understanding of the basic literacyneeds of this country. It is crucial to our economy and to the generalwell-being of our population that this country continue to strive to provideour citizens with appropriate educational opportunities_not only to achievethe goal of individual self-sufficiency but to fulfill the intellectualpotential of each citizen. We urge all interested parties affected by theJOBS program to remain constantly attentive to literacy issues.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters asked that the definition of basic literacylevel take into account the worth and potential of those who are learningdisabled and do not have the ability to achieve an 8th grade literacy level. <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations at andSection; 250.44 provide for Statesto take into account those who are unable to achieve the basic literacylevel. Specifically that section allows for placement in any educationalactivity below the postsecondary level that the State IV-A agency determinesto be appropriate to the participant's employment goal.  Moreover, andSection;250.32 provides appropriate opportunities for individuals of each of theage levels addressed in that section to be placed in educational activitiesother than those leading to high school level credentials or the basicliteracy level defined in the regulations. <T3>Limited English Proficiency</T3>The definition of ``limited English proficiency'' is consistent with themanner in which the Department of Education's Office of Vocational andAdult Education uses the term. In the preamble to the NPRM we stated thata State IV-A agency would not have to provide instruction in English asa Second Language (ESL) if such instruction would not be necessary foran individual to become self-sufficient. As an example of an instance inwhich instruction in ESL might not be necessary for self-sufficiency, wecited the case of an employer who does not require English proficiency. Many groups commented that they believed that these statements would discourageStates from providing ESL education. Several commenters stated that limitedEnglish proficiency is one of the most significant barriers to true self-sufficiency,and that ESL instruction is mandated in the Act. One State labor departmentapproved of the flexibility given to States regarding possible exceptionsfrom ESL education but asked that the regulations require the State JOBSplan to give assurance that an individual will be excused from ESL educationonly if sufficient employment opportunities exist that meet the needs ofthe person's employability plan.  Education in English proficiency is listed as a mandatory component ofJOBS in andSection; 250.44 of these regulations. Our discussion in the preambleto the NPRM was intended to indicate that States have flexibility in selectingactivities for the participant's employability plan that will best suither needs to become self-sufficient. If the State IV-A agency determinesthat ESL instruction is not necessary for the participant to achieve self-sufficiency,other activities may be selected to help meet the goal. It is not our intentto diminish the use of ESL instruction when it is needed to help a participantachieve self-sufficiency.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter from the adult literacy field observedthat, while ESL instruction is highly important, JOBS should permit transitionalbilingual educational programs in which the participant might receive instructionin fields such as mathematics and science in her first language.   <T3>Response: </T3>These regulations provide the States with the flexibilityto place a JOBS participant in such a program, based upon her assessedneeds and employability plan.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters found that the definition of ``limitedEnglish proficiency'' was not totally consistent with the reference to``education in English proficiency'' located in andSection; 250.44(a)(3).They asked that the terms be conformed.  <T3>Response: </T3>We agree with the commenters and have conformed theterms. We added ``reading'' to the list of limitations in English coveredby the definition of ``limited English proficiency.'' We added ``understand''to the list of limitations in English to which andSection; 250.44(a)(3) refers. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter read the part of the definition of ``limitedEnglish proficiency'' that refers to the participant's family or communityenvironment as a separate definition. The commenter observed that the wordingmight not serve to screen out those who lack proficiency in English. Therewere other comments that the final part of the definition was confusing. <T3>Response: </T3>The definition should not be read as a two-part definition.We have revised the wording so that it is clear that the person's environmentis considered along with her limited ability in English. The definitionis compatible with the regulations recently proposed for implementing theAdult Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.)  <T3>Postsecondary Education. </T3>The term ``postsecondary education''is defined to include a program of postsecondary instruction in the institutionscaptured in the definition of ``institution of higher education,'' anda program of instruction in other institutions referenced by section 435(b)and section 435(c) of the Higher Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1085) as wellas in any public institutions in the State that may not be covered by theHigher Education Act. The definition of postsecondary education: (1) allowsa State to exercise a wide choice among educational activities, (2) includesprivate postsecondary schools among the institutions that the State mightutilize to meet the educational needs of JOBS participants, (3) providesthe protection concerning educational quality that is built into the HigherEducation Act, and (4) permits States to select training from among anypublic postsecondary institutions that might not have been determined tomeet the definitions in the Higher Education Act.  We wish to avoid uncertainty in applying the terms found in the HigherEducation Act to the educational activities used in the JOBS program. Therefore,our definitions provide that the State IV-A agency use the determinationsthat result from the Secretary of Education's process for certifying institutionaleligibility to apply for the Higher Education Act student financial assistanceprograms. This provision does not appear to be burdensome, nor is it anunrealistic way of securing a decision regarding a postsecondary institution'scompliance with the definition, since we anticipate that welfare recipientswho enroll in postsecondary education or activities will have the benefitof Federal student financial aid, such as Pell Grants and Guaranteed StudentLoans.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State commented that the inclusion of ``vocationalschool'' as part of the definition of ``postsecondary education'' was confusing,since the term ``vocational training'' appears in andSection; 250.44(b) aspart of a self-contained definition of ``job skills training,'' which islisted as one of the mandatory components of JOBS. The State's interpretationwas that the similar terms would therefore make postsecondary vocationaleducation a mandatory part of JOBS, and they sought clarification of thispoint.  <T3>Response: </T3>The position of the commenter is not accurate.  TheAct identifies postsecondary education as a separate, optional JOBS activity.The unavoidable similarity of terms must not be used to blur the distinctionbetween  mandatory and optional activities.   <T3>Remedial Education. </T3>Since the term ``remedial'' appears withinthe clause, ``basic and remedial education to achieve a basic literacylevel,'' in section 482(d)(1)(A)(i) of the Act, we invited comment as towhether the distinction of remedial education from basic education canbe an operationally useful distinction. All who commented on this issueindicated that a distinction of remedial education from basic educationis artificial, unnecessary, and potentially confusing. Therefore, we havedecided to delete the definition of remedial education from andSection; 250.44(a)(2)and will consider ``basic and remedial education'' as a term not requiringan operational distinction.   <ITAG tagnum="81">Terms Related to Making Good or Satisfactory Progress in EducationalActivities  </ITAG>The definition of ``make good progress'' and ``making satisfactory progress''affects a participant's involvement in educational activities in two specificplaces. First, in section 402(a)(19)(E) of the Act, a State IV-A agencymay require an 18 or 19-year-old custodial parent who lacks a high schooldiploma or its equivalent to accept a job or training_instead of enrollingin educational activities_ if the participant ``fails to make good progressin successfully completing such educational activities.''  Second, in section402(a)(19)(F) of the Act, a State IV-A agency may accept, as satisfactoryparticipation in the JOBS program, a participant's attendance in good standingin an ``institution of higher education,'' or in a ``school or course ofvocational or technical training,'' if the participant is ``making satisfactoryprogress.''  The concept of satisfactory progress should be used in connection withother educational activities whenever a State IV-A agency performs a reassessmentof a participant, in order to help determine whether the participant hasbeen appropriately placed in an educational activity. It should be usedto determine whether to continue to provide supportive services, pursuantto andSection; 255.2 of the final regulations. If a State elects to alloweducational activities for unemployed parent under 25 in lieu of the workrequirement at andSection; 250.33, the unemployed parent meets the requirementif she is making satisfactory progress, as defined in andSection; 250.1,in the educational activity. However, as indicated in our discussion relatedto participation in education at andSection; 250.32, making satisfactoryprogress in an educational activity is not a factor in defining participation,for the purposes of participation rates under andSection; 250.74 of the regulations. Our definition of ``make good progress'' and ``making  satisfactory progress''is consistent with the <T3>Federal Student Financial Aid Handbook</T3> of the U.S. Departmentof Education, which is available in most schools and public libraries.The definition requires that a standard include both a qualitative element(e.g., grade point average or performance on a criterion referenced test)and a quantitative element (e.g., time limit for completion of the programor course of study). The final regulations permit the standard to providethat a participant may be considered to be making satisfactory progressduring a probationary period or due to mitigating circumstances. The regulations provide that a standard be used that was developed by theeducational institution or program and approved by both the State or localeducation agency, and the State IV-A agency or Indian Tribe or Alaska Nativeorganization. We believe that the institution or program offering the educationshould be involved in devising the standard, because of wide diversityamong educational programs. Furthermore, the practice is compatible withDepartment of Education student financial assistance guidelines.   In order to assure that participation in educational components is meaningfuland productive, we sought comments on the issue of including time standardswhere the educational activity is not part of an established educationalprogram, such as high school. The examples that we gave were average hoursper week or limits on the time period permitted to make specified educationalgains.   <T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters, including two postsecondary institutionalmembership organizations, specifically stated that they approved of thesatisfactory progress definition for educational activities. A State educationagency, for example, specifically noted the appropriateness of involvingthe State IV-A agencies and the State education agencies in approving theinstitutional definition, but at the same time the commenter asked thatsatisfactory progress be based solely upon attendance and grades. One organization,however, favored simply using existing Federal definitions where availableand measuring literacy program progress by ``satisfactory participation''and effort. Another commenter recommended that the State IV-A agency'sdefinition prevail over any institutional, programmatic, or provider policy.A few commenters favored individualized plans for each participant. Somegroups said that the definition should be used only for purposes of reassessinga participant and not for purposes of determining participation rates orcontinued receipt of supportive services. Several groups applauded theconcept of a probationary period and recognition of mitigating circumstances,but they asked that a probationary period clearly be made mandatory.  More groups opposed the requirement for a qualitative component in thestandard or asked for refinement of that requirement. Although grade pointaverage was cited in the preamble of the NPRM as an example of the qualitativeaspect of the standard, most commenters seemed to see it as the only qualitativemeasure permitted.  They said a grade average is not applicable to nontraditionaleducational programs, such as adult education activities. One of the commentersspecifically asked that the definition be adjusted to incorporate  alternateways to measure progress, e.g., criterion-referenced tests. One commentersuggested adding ''improvement of basic skill competencies'' as a specificexample of a qualitative measure of a participant's progress. Another statedthat promotion to a higher grade, particularly for young parents, shouldoverride other satisfactory progress requirements.   Some of these commenters said that the participant who faithfully attendsan educational activity should not be penalized for failing to make progressaccording to an institution's standard. Some commenters pointed out thatparticipants who are in adult education activities are more likely thanthe normal population to be learning disabled and therefore would progressmore slowly. They feared that the definition would discourage the placementof those who are the most in need of education into educational activities.Some of them observed that an individualized definition of satisfactoryprogress might be needed. A few groups suggested that interim participationmeasures are too cumbersome, and some of them said that those measuresshould be replaced by outcome measures.  Concerning the issue posed in the NPRM as to whether to establish minimumhours for those who were in educational activities outside of regular highschool, the comments were evenly divided between those in favor and thoseopposed. Of those opposed to a Federal requirement, one commenter statedthat its experience was that time standards are not good measures of progress.One commenter noted that since those programs were likely to enroll peoplewith learning disabilities, time is an inappropriate factor. One Stateasked that the States be allowed to establish their own standards. Anothercommenter said that States would purposefully underestimate time neededto complete an activity.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have decided to retain the definition essentiallyas proposed, because we believe that it provides adequate flexibility toaccommodate the concerns of those who commented. (However, we will no longeruse the concept for defining participation under andSection; 250.78.)  Sincestudents who are participating in a wide variety of Federal financial aidprograms are accountable for qualitative and quantitative progress, webelieve that the JOBS population should not be exempted from accountabilityin these areas. At the same time we do allow for the State IV-A agencyto take into account any special characteristics of the JOBS population.Therefore, for the purpose of assuring maximum flexibility, we have decidedto delete the reference to the satisfactory progress definitions of accreditingbodies recognized by the U.S. Secretary of Education. Also, we will notrequire that minimum hours be established for those who are in programs,such as evening adult educational activities, that are outside of traditionaleducational settings.  While we give examples of qualitative and quantitative measures, theseare not intended to be limiting. The State IV-A agency, therefore, hasthe flexibility to work with educational institutions or programs to developstandards that take into account the special needs of the JOBS population.While we do not see the need to mandate provisions for mitigating circumstances,our definition clearly allows for a probationary period relative to JOBS,and we encourage States to be sensitive to the issue.   We further note that, insofar as JOBS participants are enrolled in postsecondaryeducation and are receiving loans and grants under the Higher EducationAct, continued receipt of those loans and grants will be governed by theinstitution's provisions regarding satisfactory progress relative to theHigher Education Act, regardless of whether the State IV-A agency has accepteda more lenient definition of ``good progress'' or ``satisfactory progress''from the provider for the purpose of JOBS.  <T3>Making Good or Satisfactory Progress in Training Programs.</T3>  TheAct does not include a qualitative measure of making good or satisfactoryprogress for training programs under JOBS, such as OJT and skills training.However, after consultation with the Department of Labor, we decided toexpand the definition of making good or satisfactory progress to applyto OJT and skills training. We do so to assure that training offered throughJOBS results in an increase in participants' skills and competencies, andthat such progress be monitored by the State IV-A agency.   Operationally, this will require that qualitative measures be developedby the provider and approved by the State education agency and the StateIV-A agency or Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organization. If such measuresalready exist for a training program, then they can be applied with theagreement of the State IV-A agency. If they do not exist, the State IV-Aagency should secure appropriate measures as a condition of including suchtraining in a JOBS component. States will have flexibility concerning measuresof good or satisfactory progress because there will be a great deal ofvariation in the types of training programs which States will choose tooffer. However, we strongly urge the State IV-A agency to consult withthe appropriate State employment and training agency in developing suchmeasures.  The measure of good or satisfactory progress should be used by the State IV-A agency to determine whether a participant should continue in a particulartraining activity and whether to continue to provide supportive services,pursuant to andSection; 255.2 of the final regulations.  We considered whether to apply the concept of making satisfactory progressin measuring participation rates for OJT and skills training. However,we sought comments on the issue because we were concerned that includingsuch measures in training components for purposes of the participationstandards could discourage a State from setting meaningful standards ifthe standards would affect the State's ability to meet the participationrates.  We also considered precluding FFP for the costs of training activitiesfor individuals not making good or satisfactory progress. However, we soughtcomments on the issue because we were concerned that this might discourageStates from including training components in their JOBS programs.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Those who commented on using a standard of good or satisfactoryprogress for training programs observed that the Act does not require sucha standard for training programs. Most of these commenters did not favorapplying the concept to training programs relative to continuing supportiveservices or determining participation; therefore, they did not discussthe content of the definition. Other commenters discussed the issue ofsatisfactory progress in training along with the issue of satisfactoryprogress in education or did not differentiate between the two, since theyhad the same concerns with both, such as whether the definitions woulddiscourage placement of those most in need of the education or traininginto such activities.  However, we received about a dozen comments specifically related to theproposed definition of satisfactory progress in training activities. Someof the commenters had concerns about how well qualitative standards couldbe constructed for training programs. Some commenters stated that performancebased contracting and outcomes would accomplish what was intended by imposingstandards of satisfactory progress. A few commenters observed that thestandard posed problems for coordination with JTPA programs. One of thesecommenters said that subcontracts with JTPA providers are outcome-oriented,that the monitoring aspect of the definition would be burdensome, and thatthe definition unfairly called for a standard for all participants in asingle activity which did not take into account differing ability levels. One commenter noted no objection to using qualitative measures of satisfactoryprogress in training as long as they did not discourage placement of thedifficult to serve, but they stated that States have to be given time todevelop the standards. A few groups did not object to the concept of satisfactoryprogress in training but recommended that the definition allow maximumflexibility and reliance upon training providers. One commenter highlightedthe necessity to differentiate between the kinds of qualitative measuresthat would be used in determining satisfactory progress in educationalactivities from those measures that would be used to measure progress injob skills training and OJT. They suggested progress should be trackedthrough a sequence of learning objectives, related curriculum, and pre-and post-assessment.  <T3>Response: </T3>We are retaining our definition of ``making good progress''and ``making satisfactory progress'' in training to help assure that thetraining results in an increase in the skills and competencies of JOBSparticipants. Periodic assessment of the participant's progress while sheis in the program is preferable to determining at the program's conclusionthat the participant did not profit from it, either because the placementwas inappropriate or because the participant did not make an adequate effortto learn from the activity.   Our definition provides broad flexibility concerning the measures and timeperiods that can be used. Since there is such a variety of training programs,our definition allows for the provider to participate in setting the standard.Moreover, very short programs that do not meet the time increments establishedby the State IV-A agency for monitoring progress need not be subject tothe policy.   In deference to those commenters who asked for time in which to developstandards of satisfactory progress in training activities, we will notrequire State IV-A agencies to use the definition until October 1, 1992,the second full JOBS cycle, although we encourage States to employ suchstandards before then if they are available.  We believe that the two-yeargrace period will allow State IV-A agencies to work with providers andemployment and training agencies, as well as to amass some initial experiencein the area, in the development of definitions for programs that lack suchstandards.   Terms Related to Participation  We have moved the definition of participation to the new andSection; 250.78.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Administration</ITAG>State IV-A Agency Administration (andSection; 250.10 of the Final Regulations) Section 482(a)(2) of the Social Security Act identifies the State IV-Aagency as the State agency responsible for the administration or supervisionof the JOBS program. Similar provisions apply to the AFDC and Adult Assistanceprograms (see sections 2(a)(3), 402(a)(3), 1002(a)(3), 1402(a)(3), and1602(a)(3) (Aid to Aged, Blind, and Disabled) of the Social Security Act).Longstanding Federal policy construing these latter requirements has interpretedthem to mean that the State IV-A agency must maintain overall responsibilityfor the design and operation of the program and may not delegate to otherthan its own officials functions involving discretion in the overall administrationor supervision of the program (see andSection; 205.100).   However, section 485 of the Act provides States with contract authorityto administer the JOBS program (see andSection; 250.13 and related preamble).Accordingly, in view of both sections 482(a)(2) and 485, we believe thatcertain JOBS functions and activities which involve decision-making withregard to individual participants may be performed by entities other thanthe State IV-A agency, so long as there are specific rules and regulationsissued by the State IV-A agency governing their implementation. For example,the State IV-A agency may contract out a wide range of functions_such asorientation, literacy testing, and JOBS component activities and services. A number of questions have arisen regarding the effect of the single Stateagency requirement on the delivery of JOBS services to individual participants.Questions regarding this issue were raised in the comments to the NPRM,as well as through review of the State JOBS plans of the fifteen Stateswhich implemented the program on July 1, 1989. Longstanding policy withregard to State IV-A agency administration has required that decision-makingand other functions which affect individual eligibility for and the amountof the AFDC benefit must be performed by an office of the State IV-A agency,or through the local welfare agency under the supervision of the StateIV-A agency. We have said that such activities as processing applications,determining eligibility, providing hearings, and imposing sanctions mustbe performed by the State IV-A agency. This policy derives from congressionalexpressions of intent_e.g., section 402(a)(7) (the State agency is to determineneed), and section 402(a)(4) (hearings are to be before the State agency).Many States have questioned the effect of this policy on JOBS servicesto be provided under contract or agreement_e.g., assignment of an individualto a particular component. Others have asked if such functions as assessmentand case management could be contracted out.  Some States have asked ifentire components could be provided by agreement with other State agencies.Other States have submitted plans in which overall program administration,including planning and control of the program, as well as the deliveryof services, would be performed by another agency. In some plans it wasclear that the States intended to make few changes to the existing servicedelivery system and would simply call the existing system ``JOBS''.   We believe that the State IV-A agency should have maximum flexibility toadminister its programs within the requirements of the Act. We recognizethat in many States, other agencies_such as Job Training Partnership Act(JTPA) agencies, the State education agency, the State employment securityagency and community-based organizations_have been effectively performinga range of educational, training and employment-related functions for welfarerecipients. Rather than requiring a State IV-A agency to train or expandin-house staff to perform similar JOBS functions which do not directlyinvolve discretionary judgment, the final regulations provide the StateIV-A agency with the flexibility to determine how it can most effectivelyuse all potential State resources.   It is also clear that Congress intended to expand the variety of servicesavailable to assist families in achieving self-sufficiency. Many of theseservices involve decision-making. To be consistent with section 482(a),delivery of these services must be directed by the IV-A agency, both atthe State and local level. However, in view of section 485, we believethat States may generally contract out such functions if they wish.   Therefore, certain JOBS functions and activities which involve decision-makingwith regard to individual participants may be performed by entities otherthan the IV-A agency, but only according to policies, rules and regulationsof the State IV-A agency. In doing so, such entities must not have theauthority to review, change, or otherwise substitute their judgment forthat of the IV-A agency.   Accordingly, if the State IV-A agency develops specific criteria underwhich the decision-making regarding a participant is carried out by thecontractor, then such functions can be performed by the contractor. Suchactivities might include assessment, priority determinations, provisionof component services, case management, and conciliation. If a situationarises that is not covered by the general policies of the IV-A agency,then the contractor must make recommendations to the IV-A agency, whichhas final authority for all decision-making regarding the participant.Alternatively, if the State does not have specific criteria for an activity,the State may utilize a contractor for the sole purpose of making recommendationsin individual cases to the State IV-A agency.   This policy does not extend to AFDC activities under title IV-A traditionallyperformed by title IV-A staff, such as determining the amount of the AFDCpayment, which must continue to be performed by title IV-A staff. RelatedJOBS functions under title IV-F affecting eligibility for and the amountof the AFDC payment must be performed by title IV-A staff. These functionsinclude determining exemption status, determining good cause for failureor refusal to participate, providing notice of case actions, implementingsanctions, and holding hearings. We have amended the final regulationsto clarify the circumstances under which the State IV-A agency may contractout for services and activities.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State questioned the applicability of andSection; 205.100(b),describing the single State agency concept, to the State IV-A agency administrationof the JOBS program.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(a)(2) of the Act requires that ``[t]he Stateagency that administers or supervises the administration of the State'splan approved under section 402 shall be responsible for the administrationor supervision of the administration of the State's program.''  A principalpurpose of the single State agency provision is to assure that there isa central point of responsibility in the State, i.e. the State IV-A agency,with adequate legal authority, to which the Federal Government can lookfor the carrying out of the approved State plan and with which it can dealin all matters related to the grants, and that the State functions notbe so fragmented as to preclude effective administration. The single Stateagency principle does not preclude the purchase of services from otherState agencies, nor is it designed to set aside the cooperative relationshipsthat are normal and proper within a State. Purchase of services and workingcooperatively with other agencies are, however, different from delegatingadministrative responsibility for performance of functions required underState and Federal laws to other agencies or individuals. The State maymake use of the expertise of other agencies as long as the State IV-A agencydoes not delegate administrative decision-making authority.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked what single State agency administrationmeant in terms of the responsibilities of the State IV-A agency for overallmanagement of the program.   <T3>Response: </T3>The State IV-A agency must submit the State JOBS andSupportive Services plan to the Department for approval. It must have soleresponsibility for promulgating rules, regulations, and guidelines thatgovern the operation of the program. It must be responsible for programdesign decisions, including, but not limited to:  (1) optional provisions,such as lowering the age of the youngest child that qualifies an individualfor an exemption; (2) what optional components will be offered; (3) definitionof failure to participate and good cause for failure to participate; and(4) the minimum requirements for conciliation.  Limits on Contracting  Before a State IV-A agency contracts for any JOBS service or activity,it must ensure that such service or activity is not otherwise availableto JOBS participants on a non-reimbursable basis. This requirement is discussedin detail in andSection; 250.13 and related preamble on contracting and inandSection; 250.72 and related preamble concerning maintenance of effort.Requirement for a Statewide Program (andSection; 250.11 of the Final Regulations) Section 482(a)(1)(D) of the Social Security Act requires that by no laterthan October 1, 1992, a State  IV-A agency must make the JOBS program availablein each subdivision of the State where it is feasible to do so, takinginto account the number of prospective participants, the local economy,and other relevant factors. The regulation at andSection; 250.11(a) describesthis requirement, and specifies that the State must operate a JOBS program,including all components described in andSection; 250.44 and two of the componentsin andSection; 250.45, in each political subdivision of the State, unlessthe State determines that it is not feasible to do so.  If the State IV-A agency determines that the program will not be made availablein all political subdivisions, it must provide appropriate informationregarding the extent of the State JOBS program to the Secretary in itsJOBS plan. In order to determine whether a State IV-A agency needs to submitadditional justification for less than statewide operation, we will applythe criteria described in andSection; 250.11(c)(1). If a State meets thesecriteria, then no additional justification will be required. If these criteriaare not met and additional justification is necessary, the Secretary willdisapprove the plan if the justification is inadequate.  It is expected that the State IV-A agencies will make a serious and determinedeffort to implement programs throughout all local jurisdictions to themaximum extent possible, so that eligible families will have an opportunityto benefit from the new services that are authorized under the legislation. In determining how specific to be in the regulations, we considered thestatements in the Conference Report (H. R. Rep. No. 100-998, 100th Cong.,2d Sess. 112 (1988)).  The conferees intended that the program be providedto as many recipients as possible. Specifically, section 482(d)(1)(A)(i)(I)of the Act requires that the State JOBS plan include educational activities,such as high school or equivalent education, and basic literacy and Englishproficiency training. The conferees noted (H. R. Rep. No. 100-998, 100thCong., 2d Sess. 141 (1988)) that there would be those for whom enrollmentin regular school programs would be inappropriate, and consequently suitablealternatives would have to be identified or developed. We believe thatat least some of these educational activities are available in the majorityof political subdivisions in all States, and they, therefore, should bemade available, as appropriate, to AFDC recipients.  However, State resources may not permit the inclusion of the same optionalcomponents, listed in section 482(d)(1)(A)(ii) of the Act, in all politicalsubdivisions. To allow maximum State flexibility in designing State JOBSprograms, a State IV-A agency will not be required to implement the sameoptional components in all political subdivisions in which it operatesa JOBS program. Further, the State need not operate components in the samemanner in each political subdivision.  Criteria for Determining Whether Further Justification is Necessary  First, a ``minimal'' JOBS program should be available to most adult recipientsin a State. A minimal program includes high school or equivalent education,as specified at section 482(d)(1)(A)(i)(I) of the Act, one optional componentfrom among those specified at section 482(d)(1)(A)(ii) of the Act, andinformation and referral to non-JOBS employment services. In determiningwhether a JOBS program is statewide, we will first determine whether aminimal program is available in a number of political subdivisions in which95 percent of adult recipients reside.  Second, a ``complete'' JOBS program should be available to a large proportionof adult recipients. A complete program includes, but is not limited to,all mandatory and any two optional components, pursuant to section 482(d)(1)(A)of the Act. For the purposes of meeting this criterion, a complete programshould be available in all Metropolitan Statistical Areas (MSAs) in theState, as well as in a number of political subdivisions in which 75 percentof adult recipients reside.  The use of MSA boundaries is a nationally recognized system for distinguishingamong economically different areas of States. The 75 percent requirementis included because the number of adult recipients living in MSAs is relativelylow in many rural States.  In the NPRM, we proposed the criteria set forth above as an alternativeto requiring a justification for less than statewide operation in all circumstanceswhen a State would not offer a JOBS program in all areas of the State. Based on the number and content of comments regarding the criteria, itis clear that further clarification is necessary.  In general, commenters appear to have read the above criteria as requirements.Many commenters complained that the criteria are too restrictive, do notallow for variation between States, and would require that resources bespread too thin. However, some commenters felt that use of the criteriawas inappropriate because it would mean that some areas of a State mightnot have a JOBS program.   The statutory requirement that the program be available in each politicalsubdivision where it is feasible to do so, as well as the requirement thata justification be provided when a State would not provide the programin all political subdivisions indicates congressional intent that the programbe available to as many potential participants as possible.   However, it is also clear that Congress recognized that economic and demographicfactors would affect States' ability to provide the program to all potentialparticipants. We expect, therefore, that many States will not provide anidentical program throughout the State, but rather will provide differentlevels of service in some areas, and no program in others. In this case,a justification would be required. However, in order to ease the administrativeburden for these States, we have provided the criteria described in andSection;250.11 for the purposes of our review of this requirement.  We emphasize that States are not precluded from operating a JOBS programthat does not meet the criteria.  If a State JOBS program does not meetthe criteria, then a justification, as required by the Statute and describedin the following discussion, must be provided as part of the State's JOBSplan. We believe that the alternative to these criteria_to require a justificationfor all State JOBS programs that would not be absolutely statewide_wouldbe extremely burdensome.  <T3>Comment: </T3>In the NPRM, we proposed that a minimal program includehigh school or equivalent education. A number of commenters felt that othereducational activities listed in section 482(d)(1)(A)(i)(I) of the Actshould be included in the definition of a minimal program, in order toprovide additional flexibility for States. Some commenters indicated thatliteracy levels in their States were relatively high, and that consideringonly high school for purposes of the criteria was too restrictive.   <T3>Response: </T3>We have not expanded the criteria to include any ofthe other educational activities listed in section 482(d)(1)(A)(i)(I) ofthe Act, such as basic and remedial education, and education for individualswith limited English proficiency. We believe the statutory emphasis ison high school education in the JOBS program. If the characteristics ofa State AFDC population are such that inclusion of high school as a mandatorycomponent in most political subdivisions is not appropriate, the Stateshould request waiver of the statewideness requirement.   <T3>Comment: </T3>In the NPRM, we indicated that because high school isgenerally available in all political subdivisions of a State, job searchis relatively inexpensive to operate, and referral to public employmentservices is a simple method for directing recipients to potential employment,implementation of a minimal JOBS program in most areas of a State was areasonable expectation. Many commenters felt that it was unreasonable toexpect States, particularly those States with a largely rural population,or with limited resources, to provide even a minimal program to such alarge percentage of the AFDC population.  They felt that resources wouldbe spread too thin in order to meet this criterion.  <T3>Response: </T3>The criteria are provided for the purpose of the reviewof the statewideness requirement. They are not absolute lower limits. Statesare free to design and implement JOBS programs that do not meet these criteria,so long as an acceptable justification is included in their approved JOBSplan. <T3>Comment: </T3>A number of commenters felt that our use of the term``political subdivision'' in these criteria was too restrictive, sinceservices are often provided through program service delivery areas thatmay not coincide with political subdivisions. They felt that States shouldbe free to define political subdivision for the purposes of this provision. <T3>Response: </T3>The term political subdivision, which is contained insection 482(a)(1)(D)(i) of the Act, has longstanding meaning for the AFDCprogram, and is defined by each State. Typically, this includes counties,parishes, or other political jurisdictions in a State.  Since JOBS is integrallyrelated to the AFDC program, we see no basis for defining the term differentlyfor purposes of the JOBS program. For this reason, we have retained theterm ``political subdivision'' but eliminated any specificity as to typesof political subdivisions in the final regulations.  Nevertheless, States are free to provide services in areas defined geographicallyin terms other than political subdivisions, such as JTPA service deliveryareas. In order to maximize use of available resources, a State might includeservices provided at a site other than a local welfare office, perhapsin a neighboring county. The service would nevertheless be considered availableto all potential participants. However, in the State JOBS plan, the Statemust describe component services provided under an alternative scheme interms of political subdivisions.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter was concerned that by including one mandatorycomponent as well as one optional component in the criteria for a minimalprogram, we would discourage States from providing other mandatory components,choosing instead the optional component in order to meet the criteria.  <T3>Response: </T3>States are free to determine the mix of services andthe location of such services. If the program will not meet the criteriafor a minimal program, the State would then need to provide a justificationfor less than statewide operation.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked why we included high school as themandatory component in a minimal program to the exclusion of job skillstraining, job readiness, or other educational activities.   <T3>Response: </T3>The focus on educational activities, particularly highschool, is based on the statutory emphasis on education. The Act containsspecific educational requirements for custodial parents under 20 yearsof age. States must include educational activities in the employabilityplan of certain custodial parents who are 20 years of age or older andwho do not have a high school diploma or equivalent. Educational activitiesare an alternative to the work requirement in the AFDC-UP program for parentsunder 25 years of age. It is, therefore, appropriate to expect such activitiesto be included in a JOBS program in almost all areas of the State, particularlyin light of the general availability of such activities.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters felt that by including only one mandatoryand one optional component in the definition of a minimal program, we wouldlimit State program design. They felt that States might design programsmerely to satisfy the criteria. Others felt that because the definitionof a minimal program includes an optional component, which would then beavailable in most areas, States would include job search or CWEP, ratherthan another optional component that might be more expensive to operate. <T3>Response: </T3>These criteria have been included to ease the burdenfor States by reducing the necessity to provide a justification for lessthan statewide operation, as well as to facilitate review of this requirement.We do not intend or expect States to design programs merely to meet thesecriteria. We encourage the design of programs that will meet the uniqueneeds of the individual States.   There may also be some misunderstanding of the criteria as they relateto the mix of services that might be available. A State need not have thesame optional component available in the number of political subdivisionsin which 95 and 75 percent, respectively, of adult recipients reside. Forexample, for purposes of meeting the criterion for a minimal program, aState might make a CWEP program available in part of the State, and jobsearch activities available in other areas.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters asked whether, for purposes of thesecriteria, the program should ``serve'' 95 and 75 percent, respectively,of adult recipients, or whether it should ``be available'' to these percentages.One commenter discussed phasing in the program in counties that currentlydo not operate work programs, in considering the statewideness requirement.The discussion related to the level of service, particularly the numberof people who could be served during the phase-in of the program.  <T3>Response: </T3>For purposes of these criteria, a ``minimal'' and ``complete''JOBS program must be available in a number of political subdivisions inwhich 95 and 75 percent, respectively, of potential participants reside.The program need not be capable of actually serving these percentages.The requirement related to actually serving individuals is the participationrate requirement at andSection; 250.74. We have revised the language of andSection;250.11(c)(1) in order to clarify this point.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Another commenter asked whether the percentages wouldbe measured in each political subdivision_that is, whether in a countywith a minimal program, JOBS components must be available to 95 percentof the potential participants in the county.  <T3>Response: </T3>For purposes of these criteria, percentages will bemeasured on the State level, rather than at the political subdivision level.For example, JOBS components need not be available to 95 percent of potentialparticipants within a county for it to be considered to have a minimalprogram.   <T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters asked how implementation of Tribal JOBSprograms would affect computation of the percentages in the criteria. <T3>Response: </T3>For the purposes of these criteria, members of IndianTribes and Alaska Native organizations to be served by Tribal JOBS programswill not be included in computing percentages. The regulations at andSection;250.11(c)(1)(iv) now include language to this effect.  Justification for Less Than Statewide Operation   Section 250.11(c) provides the basis for our review of the statewidenessrequirement. If a State JOBS program will not be available in a numberof political subdivisions sufficient to meet the criteria of andSection;250.11(c)(1), the justification to the Secretary will include the informationidentified in andSection; 250.11(c)(2).  The factors listed in andSection; 250.11(c)(2) expand on the items identifiedin section 482(a)(1)(D) of the Act, which specifies two factors_i.e., thenumber of prospective participants and the local economy. We have addedone additional item: whether a State IV-A agency will, even with the proposedareas excluded, fully expend all JOBS funds available to it for the periodcovered by the plan.  This additional information will help in determiningwhether a State IV-A agency is proposing to concentrate services on specificgeographic areas identified as particularly critical to reducing long-termdependency, and as a consequence, is unable to implement a statewide program.  We do not believe that depressed local market conditions would necessarilymake a JOBS program infeasible. For example, even in areas of high unemployment,there are generally job opportunities because of job turnover and segmentedjob markets. However, in a rural area where the sole employer has recentlyclosed its plant, a State IV-A agency might be justified in not operatinga JOBS program, or in operating a minimal program. A State IV-A agencyshould consider these types of distinctions, and include this informationin the  justification for less than statewide operation.   In designing a State JOBS program that will be less than statewide, a Stateshould assure that political subdivisions not be excluded on the basisof ethnic, racial or religious characteristics.   Because the statewideness requirement is not effective until October 1,1992, phased implementation of the program will be permitted. As a consequence,an initial State JOBS plan may not reflect a level of component availabilitysufficient to meet the statewideness requirement. We would therefore expectthat, no later than the first biennial review, for the plan period beginningOctober 1, 1992, the State JOBS plan and the State Supportive Servicesplan (pursuant to andSection; 255.1) will be updated to reflect either sufficientprogram availability to meet this requirement, or a justification for lessthan statewide implementation.   <T3>Comment: </T3>A number of commenters felt that the additional informationrequested for the justification_whether the State will fully expend availableFederal funding_will disadvantage States that are unable to secure theadditional funding necessary to draw down all available Federal matching.One commenter, on the other hand, asked for clarification of the ``automaticdenial'' when a State has ``sought its full capped entitlement.''   <T3>Response: </T3>The additional information will be used in assessingwhether a State should be permitted to operate a JOBS program on less thana statewide basis. Drawing down all available Federal matching may be anindication that the State is targeting resources to specific areas.  However,drawing down all available Federal matching will not, in and of itself,result in waiver of the statewideness requirement. This factor will beconsidered in light of other information provided by the State in determiningwhether the requirement should be waived.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Other commenters felt that the lack of State resourcesshould be included as a factor in the justification for less than statewideprogram operation.  <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that by providing additional funding underthe JOBS program, Congress intended that States include a wider range ofservices than are currently available in order to provide the opportunityto achieve self-sufficiency to as many recipients as possible.  Failureof a State to provide funding to operate an adequate JOBS program shouldnot be a basis for waiving the statewideness requirement. Section 482(a)(1)(D)(i)of the Act bases feasibility of statewide operation on the number of prospectiveparticipants, local economic conditions, and other relevant factors, whichin our view do not include availability of State resources. Congress explicitlyincluded availability of State resources in other sections of the Act.Because it did not include similar language in describing the statewidenessrequirement, we conclude that this factor should not be considered in determiningwhether a JOBS program is statewide.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A number of commenters asked that the regulations containspecific criteria to be used in determining whether a request for waiverof the statewideness requirement should be approved.   <T3>Response: </T3>We do not believe that it would be appropriate to providespecific criteria. The reaction of commenters to the criteria describedabove is an indication of the general opposition to such specific language.Each State program will differ, and must be viewed in light of the uniquedemographic and economic factors in the State.Coordination and Consultation (andSection; 250.12 of the Final Regulations)Section 402(g) and section 483 of the Social Security Act contain a numberof provisions designed to assure coordination of the JOBS program, includingchild care and supportive services pursuant to andSection; 255.3(h) of theregulations, with other education, training, and employment programs availablein a State. The purpose of this coordination is to provide comprehensive,quality services to meet the multifaceted needs of welfare recipients inthe most effective and efficient manner.  At the Federal level, the Department is working closely with the Departmentsof Labor, Education, and Interior, and expects State and local IV-A agenciesto promote coordination among their counterpart agencies. The Departmenthas had discussions with the Department of Agriculture on ways to insurecoordination between JOBS and Food Stamp work programs and with the Departmentof Housing and Urban Development to develop linkages between JOBS and supportiveservices in public housing projects. The JOBS program should be coordinatedwith providers such as Job Training Partnership Act (JTPA) agencies, theEmployment Service, vocational education, adult basic education, Head Startand preschool programs under chapter I of the Education, Consolidationand Improvement Act of 1981, school and nonprofit child care programs,public housing agencies, and other human development programs.  Congress intended that agencies identify existing resources to preventduplication of services and to assure that other program services are availableto JOBS participants. Such coordination is necessary to assure that costsfor services for which welfare recipients have been eligible are not shiftedto the JOBS program. The final regulations preclude such shifts in costs,as described in the maintenance of effort provisions in andSection; 250.72.  Section 483 of the Act requires coordination with JTPA agencies, sinceone of JTPA's major goals is reducing welfare dependency. The JTPA requiresthat AFDC recipients be served in at least equal proportion to their incidencewithin the eligible population.   At the State level, the JOBS plan must be consistent with JTPA coordinationcriteria and must be reviewed by the State job training coordinating council(SJTCC) prior to submission to the Secretary. We strongly encourage theState IV-A agency to meet regularly with the SJTCC regarding the planningand implementation of the JOBS program to identify common JOBS-JTPA activitiesand services, and to develop an integrated strategy which ensures thateligible AFDC recipients receive training and employment services in aneffective, non-duplicative manner.   At the local level, the welfare agency must consult with private industrycouncils (PICs) on the development of arrangements and contracts underJOBS and to identify and obtain advice on the types of jobs that are available,or are likely to become available, in the area. These provisions reflectcongressional concern that JOBS resources not be used inefficiently, i.e.,provided to ineffective service providers or expended on training for jobswhich are not available to participants.  The local relationship between the welfare agency and the PIC is crucialto assure that welfare recipients receive the JTPA services for which theyare eligible.  Thus, we strongly urge local welfare administrators to berepresented on the PIC or, at a minimum, to become actively involved inPIC meetings, as appropriate.  Initial and ongoing coordination between the State IV-A agency and localState and educational systems will enable the State IV-A agency to accessneeded expertise in this new area of welfare agency involvement, to avoidduplication of services and to assure that welfare recipients receive thenecessary educational services for which they are eligible. Welfare agenciesshould meet regularly with their State or local educational counterpartsto ensure that educational providers are involved in the planning and deliveryof the JOBS program at all levels.  Section 250.21 of the final regulations requires State IV-A agencies todescribe in the JOBS plans efforts to coordinate with other agencies includingbut not limited to JTPA, basic and adult education programs, programs underthe Carl D. Perkins Vocational Education Act and other vocational services,and other human development programs.  Furthermore, the final regulations at andSection; 250.20 specifically providethat State IV-A agencies make the proposed JOBS plan available to membersof federally- recognized Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizationsduring the public comment period. This segment of the population is highlightedto assure that a Tribal entity eligible to operate a separate JOBS program,pursuant to andSection; 250.91 of the regulations, has sufficient opportunityto coordinate with the State in the planning of JOBS.   Coordination is necessary whether the Tribe or organization operates anindependent program or receives services from the State, but is particularlyimportant if a Tribal entity does operate a separate program. While a Tribalgrantee will have responsibility for JOBS, the State IV-A agency will maintainresponsibility for the basic AFDC program and for child care services,including transitional child care services. Given this interrelationship, andSection;andSection; 250.12 and 250.93(b)(1) of the regulations requirethat the State IV-A agency and the Tribal applicant exchange all availableinformation on adult Tribal AFDC recipients necessary to determine a Tribe'sor organization's JOBS funding level. In addition, the requirements inandSection; 250.94 concerning Tribal JOBS administration and in andSection;250.95 regarding child care elaborate on the need for the State and Tribalgrantee to develop mutually agreed upon procedures and methodologies toassure that Tribal  participants receive equitable treatment under theAFDC and JOBS programs.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters objected to the provision that JOBS providetraining only for the types of jobs which are, or are likely to become,available in the area, because the local area may be economically depressed. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 250.12(d)(2) implements section 485(e) of theAct which requires that the State IV-A agency (1) consult with PICs onthe types of jobs available or likely to become available in the ServiceDelivery Area (SDA) and (2) ensure that the State program provides trainingin any area for jobs of a type which are, or are likely to become, availablein the area.  We believe that the requirement of consultation with PICs is meant to givethe State IV-A agency a broad picture of the labor market in the State.There are over 600 service delivery areas nationwide, many serving geographicalareas that constitute one labor market. State and local IV-A agencies mayhave to coordinate with PICs in several different SDAs to serve its JOBSclientele. We do not believe that Congress meant to be so limiting as tobar training for a job that happens to be in an adjacent service deliveryarea. Rather, we interpret the ``shall ensure'' language of section 485(e)to require that at a minimum a State must provide training in an area forjobs that are or likely to become available in the area_not that it maynot do more.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State suggested that the requirement at  andSection;250.12(d)(1) that State IV-A agencies consult with private industry councilson the development of arrangements and contracts promotes a conflict ofinterest since PICs with private, non-profit (rather than public) statusmight compete for contracts for which they had provided prior consultation. <T3>Response: </T3> State rules on procurement must be observed.  We donot believe that Congress intended to impede contracting with private industrycouncils when it adopted the provision for consultation on the developmentof arrangements and contracts. To the extent that prior consultation wouldprohibit a private industry council from competing for a contract to provideservices, the State IV- A agency should limit consultation with privateindustry councils to subjects that would not result in conflict of interest.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State recommended consulting with the EmploymentService agency for labor market information rather than with private industrycouncils.  <T3>Response: </T3>Consultation with the private industry councils on labormarket information is required by section 485(e) of the Family SupportAct of 1988. However, in andSection; 250.12 of the regulations, we specificallyprovide for consultation and coordination with several other organizations,including the State Employment Service agency. Such consultation couldinclude labor market information, but it does not substitute for the statutorilyrequired PIC consultation.Contracting Authority (andSection; 250.13 of the Final Regulations)  Section 485 of the Social Security Act grants the State IV-A agency broadcontracting authority, which is reflected in andSection; 250.13 of the finalregulations. At the same time, however, the Act requires administrationof the JOBS program by the single State IV-A agency.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters asked for clarification about which activitiesand services can be contracted out under JOBS.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have addressed the question of what activities andservices can be contracted out in andSection; 250.10 and in the accompanyingpreamble on what administration by the State IV-A agency means in termsof the JOBS program.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked for flexibility in contracting andin determining the wide range of methods used to purchase services.  <T3>Response: </T3>As discussed in the preamble to andSection; 250.10 onState IV-A agency administration, States have broad authority to contractfor services. Some of the methods that may be used include but are notlimited to fixed price, cost reimbursement, and performance-based contracts. Selection of Providers  Section 250.13 incorporates the requirements of section 485 of the Actregarding the factors which must be taken into consideration in selectingservice providers and the prohibition against contracts for services whichare otherwise available on a non-reimbursable basis. Regarding the issueof provider selection, the requirement for consultation with private industrycouncils is described in andSection; 250.12 on coordination and consultation. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked that the consulting role of the privateindustry councils be limited to providing labor market information andnot include consulting on the development of contracts for JOBS.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 485(c) of the Act requires that the State IV-Aagency consult with private industry councils on the development of arrangementsand contracts for the JOBS program. The only exception is discussed inthe preamble to andSection; 250.12 and involves the situation in which suchconsultation could result in a conflict of interest if the private industrycouncil is also a competitor for contracts.  The statutory prohibition against contracts for services which would beotherwise available on a non- reimbursable basis reflects congressionalconcern that costs of services for which welfare recipients have been eligiblenot be shifted to the JOBS program. Since it is so closely connected tothe provisions on maintenance of effort (section 482(a)(3) of the Act),we elaborate on its interpretation in andSection; 250.72 of the regulationsand preamble.   Before a State contracts for services under JOBS, we expect that it willcarefully identify those services which have traditionally been availableto welfare recipients at no cost, as well as community-based or volunteerprograms that may provide competent services at minimal or no cost.  Thestatutory language clearly intends that the State IV-A agency fully utilizeall resources otherwise available to serve JOBS participants on a non-reimbursablebasis. For instance, other programs have paid for many educational servicesprovided to AFDC recipients, including those available under the AdultEducation Act (20 U.S.C. 1201 <T3>et seq.</T3>), the Higher Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1001 <T3>et seq.</T3>) and the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Education Act (20U.S.C. 2301 <T3>et seq.</T3>) Similarly, through JTPA, the State employment securityagency, State employment and training programs and the Community ServicesBlock Grant program, extensive employment and training services_such asjob counseling, job development and placement, job skills training, andon-the-job training_have been offered to eligible low income individuals,many of whom are AFDC recipients.   Segregation of Costs by Matching Rate  For the purposes of FFP, the State IV-A agency must segregate costs accordingto applicable matching rates, as defined at andSection; 250.73(b)(1), inany contract or arrangement under the JOBS program. This means that contractedservices will qualify for Federal matching funds at the same rate as thoseservices which the State IV-A agency provides directly. This provisionis included to assure that State IV-A agency decisions on contracting willbe based upon the efficient administration of the program and that consistentFederal matching will be available to the State IV-A agency regardlessof the method used to provide services.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters said that segregation of costs wouldbe extremely burdensome. They pointed out that the definitions in JOBSmight not be compatible with other programs, such as JTPA. They said thatit might cause some providers not to do business with JOBS, or that itwould drive up the cost of the contracts with no benefit to participants. <T3>Response: </T3>The Act does require different matching rates for differentactivities, and we maintain our position that State agency decisions aboutcontracting not be driven by available matching rates.  However, based on all the comments we received, we have amended andSection;250.73 as to what activities are eligible for the different matching rates.A full discussion of these changes appears in the preamble to andSection;250.73. The effect of these changes is that more of the costs of providingservices directly to participants will be eligible for enhanced match,whether the service is provided by the State IV-A agency or another entity.Therefore, it is less likely that segregation of costs will be required. However, we have not amended andSection; 250.13 in the final regulationssince there may be some contracts which will still require segregationof costs because of the nature of the activities.   Other Applicable Regulations  In addition to the specific contracting requirements in this section, contractedservices under JOBS are subject to the requirements of Part 92 with thefollowing exception. We have excluded the provisions under andSection; 92.30(d)(4).These provisions, which require prior Federal approval of contracts, appearto be inconsistent with congressional intent since they would severelylimit a State IV-A agency's contracting authority under section 485 ofthe Act.   State IV-A agencies are subject to the procurement requirements of onlyparagraph (a) of andSection; 92.36. This means that the State IV-A agencyis required to assure that JOBS contracts follow State and local laws,regulations, and procedures regarding procurement. Indian Tribes and AlaskaNative organizations, however, are subject to the Federal procurement requirementsof andSection; 92.36(b) through (i).   <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_State Jobs Plan Requirements and Content  </ITAG>Requirement for a State JOBS Plan (andSection; 250.20 of the Final Regulations) The JOBS provisions are found in title II of the Family Support Act, whichincludes changes to Part A and creates Part F in title IV of the SocialSecurity Act.  State implementation of these provisions will be coveredunder a new State plan for JOBS (the JOBS plan). The requirements for thatplan and the procedures for its submission are discussed below. Title IIIof the Statute also requires that States provide child care and other necessarysupportive services. These services will be covered under a SupportiveServices plan, to be developed and submitted with the JOBS plan. A discussionof the Supportive Services plan and related requirements is at andSection;255.1.  We believe that it is appropriate to include the new statutory requirementsin section 402(a)(19) of the Social Security Act as well as all requirementsof title IV-F in a separate JOBS plan. This position is supported by thelanguage of section 482(a)(1)(A) of the Social Security Act, which requiresthe JOBS plan to meet ``all of the requirements of this part and section402(a)(19).'' Section 482(a)(2) of the Act provides that the State  IV-A agency willbe responsible for the administration or supervision of the State's JOBSprogram. Based on this provision, the final regulations provide that theState IV-A agency is responsible for the submission of the State JOBS andSupportive Service plans, after completion of all coordination requirementsand review by the Governor.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked why we require separate JOBSand Supportive Service plans when they are so integrally connected andmust be submitted concurrently.  <T3>Response: </T3>Child care under section 402(g) of the Act is a partof title IV-A, and, therefore, we believe, it would be inappropriate forit to be included in the IV-F (or State JOBS) Plan. A fuller discussionof the Supportive Services plan is contained in the preamble to andSection;255.1. We have carefully refrained from requiring any duplicate informationin both plans. Since the same regulations for submission and approval governboth the JOBS Plan and the Supportive Services Plan, we do not believethat treating them as separate plans is burdensome on States. Furthermore,any State which has not implemented JOBS as of April 1, 1990 will haveto submit a Supportive Services plan for transitional child care at thattime.  Plan Approval Prior to Implementation  Section 250.20(a)(2) of these regulations requires States to submit theinitial JOBS and Supportive Services plans for approval 45 days prior toimplementation.  The Family Support Act does not directly address the question of whethera State's JOBS plan must be submitted and approved prior to a State's implementationof the program. However, the statutory language best supports the positionthat the JOBS plan should be approved prior to a State's implementation.In several places the Statute references JOBS programs operated and fundedunder <T3>approved </T3> plans; the implication is that programs could not beoperated and funded unless a JOBS plan had been approved. Specifically,the statutory language includes the following: (1) Section 482(a)(1)(A)of the Social Security Act states, ``As a condition of its participationin the program of aid to families with dependent children under part A,each State shall establish and operate a job opportunities and basic skillstraining program * * * under a plan <T3>approved by the Secretary</T3> * * *.''; (2) Section 403(k)(1) providesthat ``Each State <T3>with a plan approved under part F </T3>shall be entitled to payments* * *.''; and (3) Section 403(l)(1)(A) provides, ``In lieu of any paymentunder subsection (a), the Secretary shall pay to each State <T3>with a plan approved under section 482(a)</T3> * * *.'' (emphasis added). Submission of Initial JOBS Plans 45 Days Before Anticipated Implementation This timeframe is not found in the Family Support Act. We have adoptedthe 45-day period for the initial submission as we proposed in the NPRM,because we believe this will provide a reasonable period of time withinwhich to conduct an orderly and responsible review of a State's submission.We received no comments to the contrary.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked that we establish a timeframein the regulations by which the Secretary would act to formally approveor disapprove a State JOBS Plan.  <T3>Response: </T3>We see no need for establishing a time frame.  The Departmentis committed to acting expeditiously on all State JOBS and Supportive Servicesplans that are submitted timely, as evidenced by the fact that all fifteenplans submitted for July 1, 1989 start dates were approved before July1.  Interim Plans  Initial State JOBS and Supportive Services plans submitted prior to theissuance of plan preprints have been and will continue to be approved asinterim plans. States with interim plans will be required to submit newJOBS and Supportive Services plans 90 days after the issuance of a preprintform by the Secretary. An approved interim plan shall remain in force untilaction is taken by the Secretary to approve or disapprove the preprint.Although described as a new plan, a State's first JOBS plan preprint followingits interim plan will not be subject to the requirement for review by theSJTCC before submission to the Secretary, unless there are substantialchanges.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters said that the 60-day period for resubmissionof the plan on the preprint form issued by the Secretary is too short,especially if State legislative action is necessary prior to resubmission. <T3>Response: </T3>We have amended the final regulations at andSection; 250.20(d)(2)(i)to provide that States will have 90 days after the publication of the Stateplan preprints to submit them to the Department for approval. Interim planswill remain in effect until the Secretary acts to approve or disapprovethe new plans.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked that the interim plan remain in effectin the event the final plan is disapproved.  <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations provide that the interim plan remainseffective until the Secretary acts to approve or disapprove a State's finalplan. Section 250.20(g) of the final regulations provides for an opportunityto make revisions to any plan prior to final disapproval. However, oncethe Secretary does issue a formal disapproval of a plan, there is no provisionfor continuation of an interim plan.  Resubmission of State Plans: Biennial Update  Section 482(a)(1)(A) of the Act requires that the State submit its Stateplan not less often than every two years to the Secretary for approval.Under these regulations, the biennial update shall be considered a newplan, which must be submitted for approval 90 days prior to the date itis to become effective. The biennial update must be available for publicreview and comment in accordance with the provisions of andSection; 250.20(c). We recognize that this process is very different from existing title IV-Aplan amendment procedures. However, we believe that there are several compellingreasons to treat the biennial update as a new plan for which approval bythe Secretary is required: (1) the specific requirement that it be resubmitted(not less than every two years) distinguishes it from the regular titleIV-A plan amendment process at andSection; 201.3, which requires only thatplan amendments be submitted by the end of the calendar quarter of implementation;(2) the requirements for coordination and consultation, including the requirementthat the State plan be submitted to the SJTCC for review and comment, wouldbe significantly lessened if it were only required once prior to JOBS implementationand never thereafter; and (3) the nature of the information that section482 of the Act requires be in the State plan makes it an ``operationalplan.'' Much of it is specific to the period which the plan covers, suchas the number of persons to be served and the extent to which other serviceswill be available by provider and type of service. Such information mustbe updated for each new period in order to make the plan a useful document.  Content of Biennial Update  The State plan update will consist of four parts: (1) assurances regardingthose parts of the State JOBS plan and Supportive Services plan that remainunchanged; (2) a description of any changes in program operations, includingbut not limited to, changes in the mix of components or target populationsto be served; (3) specific information for the period of the update regardingestimates of persons to be served and the availability of services providedby the State IV-A agency as well as other providers; and (4) an assurancethat the State JOBS plan is consistent with the coordination criteria specifiedin the current Governor's Coordination and Special Services Plan requiredunder section 121 of the JTPA. The State plan preprint shall be the vehiclefor the update.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked that we reduce the requirementsfor the biennial update. One suggested that if it were considered a newplan, it would trigger the consultation requirements which could resultin the plan being disapproved for technical reasons. Another asked thatonly changes be submitted.  <T3>Response: </T3>In the NPRM, we outlined several reasons for our approachin considering the update a new plan. We have restated them in the finalregulations because we find them no less compelling after review of thecomments we received. Congress could have easily mandated that the sameprocedure that governs amendments for the AFDC program apply to JOBS. Insteadit required an update at least every two years which must be submittedto the Secretary for approval. The conference report (H. R. Rep. No. 100-998,100th Cong., 2d Sess. 113 (1988)) specifically describes the State planas an ``operational plan'' which would describe how the State planned tooperate the JOBS program during the period covered by the plan. We regardthe requirement for consultation and coordination to be an on-going one.Our regulations do not require the State to submit an entire plan as itsbiennial update. Section 250.20(e)(2)(i) simply requires assurances regardingthose parts of the State JOBS plan and Supportive Services plan  that remainunchanged. We do require the State to submit a description of any changesto program operation and estimates of the number of persons to be servedby the program during the next biennium. The State plan preprint will bethe vehicle for submitting this information.  Submission of First Biennial Update  All plans submitted between the issuance of the preprints and October 1,1990, (whether resubmission of interim plans or initial plans), if approved,will remain in force until the Secretary acts to approve or disapprovethe first biennial update. To ease the administrative burden, the firstbiennial update for all States will be due on July 1, 1992 for the periodbeginning October 1, 1992. However, States may submit plans on April 1,1992 to be effective July 1, 1992 if this would be administratively easierbecause it would coincide with either the State fiscal year or the programyear under the Job Training Partnership Act or the Carl D. Perkins VocationalAct.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked that we make the biennial updatesubmission consistent with the program period under JTPA and Carl D. PerkinsVocational Act by moving the submittal date back to April 1, 1992 for theperiod beginning July 1, 1992.  <T3>Response: </T3>In the NPRM, we proposed October 1, 1992 as the startdate for the first biennium because it coincided with the date on whichall States will have to have statewide programs, and we believed that itwould ease the administrative burden to put all plans on the same schedule.  However, we are persuaded that for some States it would be advantageousto have the program period coincide with either the State fiscal year orthe program period for other employment and training programs. Therefore,we have amended the final regulations to give States the option of submittingthe first biennial update either on April 1, 1992 for the period beginningJuly 1, 1992 or on July 1, 1992 for the period beginning October 1, 1992.If a State, which does not have a statewide JOBS program, submits a planfor the period beginning July 1, 1992, the State plan must explain howthe program will be statewide as of October 1, 1992.   Amendments  A State IV-A agency may submit amendments to an approved plan, if necessary,prior to the required resubmission described below. The current processfor submission and review of amendments, as described at andSection; 201.3(f)and andSection; 201.3(g), will apply. Submission of plan amendments doesnot relieve the State of the obligation to resubmit its plan to the Secretaryfor approval every two years.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked that we specify what circumstanceswould require a plan amendment.  <T3>Response: </T3>Amendments are required when the State IV-A agency changesits program in two circumstances: (1) it makes changes which would affecteligibility for services or the requirements to participate. These wouldinclude, but are not limited to, reducing the age of the youngest childexemption from 3 to 1, redefining ``good cause'' for failure to participate,and changing the criteria for excusing those under 18 from school attendancerequirements; and (2) it makes changes in program design that alter thenature of the program. These would include, but not be limited to, expandingthe geographical coverage (prior to October 1, 1992), adding or droppingany of the optional components including any other education, training,or employment activities pursuant to andSection; 250.47, or proposing tochange the target groups specified in andSection; 250.1.  We have renumberedandSection; 250.20(f) to designate the existing language as paragraph (f)(1)and added paragraph (f)(2) to describe when an amendment to the JOBS orSupportive Services plan is required.  Public and Inter-Agency Review of State JOBS Plans  The Act requires that the State agency submit its JOBS plan to the StateJob Training Coordinating Council (SJTCC) 60 days before submission tothe Secretary. The final regulations require submission of the plan tothe State education agency, based on the extensive required and optionaleducational activities under JOBS, and the general coordination requirementsin section 483 of the Act related to State and local education agencies. In accordance with section 483(a)(1) of the Act, the content of the plan,where it relates to job training and work preparation, must be consistentwith the coordination criteria specified in the Governor's coordinationand special services plan required by section 121 of the Job Training PartnershipAct.  The Statute also requires that the State JOBS plan be made available forpublic review and comment 60 days prior to submission to the Secretary.All public and State agency comments on the plan shall be resolved at theState level. It was noted that if this were not made clear, the State effortsto resolve disagreements could become a problem, since commenters mightchoose to press their view at the Federal level rather than at the appropriateState level.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters said that the final regulations shouldrequire the State IV-A agency to submit any comments it receives duringthe 60-day review period to the Secretary as part of its JOBS Plan.  <T3>Response: </T3>We see no practical reason for requiring submissionof comments to the Secretary. The fact that the Act requires the commentsof the SJTCC to be submitted to the Governor supports our position thatdisagreements should be resolved at the State level and not submitted tothe Secretary.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked that the initial plan submittedafter the preprint is issued be subject to the 60-day comment and reviewperiod prior to submittal to the Department.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have carefully reviewed the changes that we havemade in the final regulations to determine whether there would be any reasonto require States with approved interim JOBS plans to go through the publiccomment and review period when they submit their initial plans using thepreprint. We conclude that the changes are not so substantial as to automaticallyrequire another comment and review period for all States. However, we havemaintained the provision that if the State makes substantial changes inits program, the plan should be submitted for review and comment. We haveamended the regulations to provide for an abridged review and comment periodof 30 days. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter pointed out that the proposed regulationsomitted the statutory language ``made reasonably available to the generalpublic through local news facilities and public announcements * * *'' <T3>Response: </T3>The final regulations have been revised to contain theprovisions of the statutory language which were inadvertently left outof the proposed regulations.State Plan Content (andSection; 250.21 of the Final Regulations)  Section 250.21 lists the information required in the JOBS plan. We willprovide a preprint which will elicit all necessary information in a standardizedformat. The preprint will guide States in submitting the JOBS plan andwill expedite review. It will also provide a basis for comparison of Stateprograms.  In the NPRM preamble, we said that some of the requirements for the JOBSplan were included in other sections of the proposed regulations (54 Fed.Reg. 15647).  In the final regulations, we have collected all of thoserequirements and listed them in andSection; 250.21. We have also made somechanges in the order of items in this section in response to comments.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters requested that andSection; 250.21(a)(1)(ii)be reworded to reflect the statutory provision that a recipient may onlybe required to participate when that recipient is guaranteed child care,rather than when child care is available ``in the political subdivision,''as stated in the NPRM.  <T3>Response: </T3>We clarified our language in the final regulations tomeet these commenters' concern.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters requested that we clarify and expandparagraph (f) to ensure that the statutory requirements for consultationand coordination are carried out. Some commenters suggested that we requiredescriptions of State efforts in this area to ensure the most efficientand effective coordination of services possible.   <T3>Response: </T3>We agree with these commenters that the integrationof JOBS with other programs serving those in need is essential to the successof the program. The consultation and coordination requirements of andSection;250.12 are intended to ensure this extremely important function is carriedout. We have clarified and expanded paragraph (e) to require that the Stateplan include the specific results of any coordination and consultationthat the State undertakes.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to soften our required descriptionsof assessment techniques employed by States, claiming that requiring descriptionsof the techniques used by each political subdivision was too burdensome.  <T3>Response: </T3>We do not wish to be unnecessarily burdensome in ourrequirements and have removed the requirement to describe assessment techniquesin the State JOBS plan.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Similarly, some commenters believed the required descriptionsof case management were too burdensome.  <T3>Response: </T3>To meet these concerns, we have amended the final regulationsto provide for a general description of case management, including whatentity will be responsible for providing the service and, if not used statewide,a description of methods by which individuals will be assigned a case manager.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked us to employ better assurancesthat the statutorily identified target groups would only be replaced ifthey were infeasible to serve, and that any alternative target groups wouldmeet the statutory requirements.   <T3>Response: </T3>We have included a new paragraph (b)(5) in andSection;250.21 to meet this concern. Section 403(l)(2)(C) of the Act requires aState to demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the Secretary, that servingthe statutorily identified target groups is infeasible and to define alternativetarget groups. Any alternative target groups must meet the statutory criteriaof being populations of long-term or potentially long-term recipients. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters requested that we include under thissection other information that andSection; 250.35(d) and andSection; 250.72(e)require in State plans.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have collected other State plan requirements andincluded them in this section. We added andSection; 250.21(d)(12), requiringStates to set forth in their State plans additional grounds for good causeselected by the State, as required by andSection; 250.35(d). We added anassurance at andSection; 250.21(a)(7) because andSection; 250.72(e) requiresthe State to certify that services provided by the State IV-A agency arenot otherwise available on a nonreimbursable basis.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters believed the State plan requirementswere too extensive and structured and did not provide States with enoughflexibility.  <T3>Response: </T3>We disagree. The Statute requires States to submit aplan and describe how the JOBS program will operate in the State. It alsoprovides the Secretary with the authority to require additional informationnecessary for the proper administration of the program. We have tried togive States maximum flexibility, and our final regulations reflect thatphilosophy.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to require States to describehow they will decide who will receive JOBS services, including how theywill give priority to volunteers.   <T3>Response: </T3>We do not believe this kind of detail is necessary inthe State plan. We do not believe we must approve a process in order toensure that volunteers are served according to the Statute and the regulations.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to use the term ``basic skillsassessment'' instead of ``literacy tests.'' Other commenters asked thatwe require an assurance that recipients will not be discriminated againston the basis of literacy.   <T3>Response: </T3>We have removed the requirement to describe the typesof assessment tools a State will use. As for discrimination, since oneof the principal goals of the program is to reach those recipients mostin need, the provisions designed to assure that State programs strive towardthose goals should prevent any discrimination against those in need ofliteracy training, since they are a population most in need.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters requested that, in States opting foran alternative hearing process, the State plan contain assurances thatparticipants in these States who request use of the normal State hearingprocess will not be subject to delay or prejudice due to that request.  <T3>Response: </T3>If a State establishes a separate hearing process forJOBS as an alternative to the IV-A hearing process, as provided by section482(h) of the Act, the participant does not have the option to pursue hercase through the IV-A hearings process. The State is only required to insurethat whatever hearing process it establishes meets the requirements of<T3>Goldberg </T3>v.<T3> Kelly.</T3>  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters believe that the provisions under andSection;andSection;250.21(d) and (g)(3) (now subsection (f)) regarding estimates of numbersof people to be served and ways of serving them were too specific, whileother commenters did not believe they were specific enough.   <T3>Response: </T3>The information asked for is required by section 482(a)(1)(B)of the Act. We believe that it is useful for planning purposes. We havenot gone beyond the statutory requirements in these areas.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to require States to describe,in their State plan, how child care will be provided for parents underage 20.   <T3>Response: </T3>The Supportive Services plan covers methods of providingchild care. We do not believe these questions need to be addressed in theJOBS plan.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to require States to describe,in the State plan, the circumstances under which assignment to each JOBScomponent is appropriate.   <T3>Response: </T3>We do not believe this type of specificity is neededin the State plan. We are unaware of any need for federally approved procedures.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to require States to state whetherthey will allow unemployed parents under age 25 to meet the 16-hour participationrequirement in andSection; 250.33 through education.   <T3>Response: </T3>Section 250.21(c)(6) requires a State to describe whetherit will allow a parent under age 25 to meet the unemployed parent program16-hour work requirement by participating in educational activities. <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to delete ``education'' fromthe andSection; 250.21(n) State plan requirement that the State describeits actions to assure that education and training be directed to jobs inthe area.   <T3>Response: </T3>We declined to adopt this suggestion. We believe educationunder the JOBS program should have the same goals as the training components_toprovide necessary skills for self-sufficiency. Preparing participants forjobs available, or likely to become available, in the State is a primarymeans of assisting in the achievement of self-sufficiency, and providesenough latitude to include education. This provision, however, has beenrenumbered as andSection; 250.21(e)(4) in the final regulations.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to require States to describehow they will ensure recipients will not be required to take a job thatwould result in a net loss of income.   <T3>Response: </T3>We have added a provision at andSection; 250.21(c)(5)that provides that a State must describe what necessary and reasonableexpenses it uses to calculate ``net loss of cash income.''   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to require States to state inthe plan any other priorities that could affect the order of participationin or access to the program.   <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that requiring this kind of detail is notappropriate. States must retain the flexibility to make some program assignmentson a case-by-case basis, without having federally-approved procedures tofollow in making every decision.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to require a medical assessmentof all participants to determine whether or not they are handicapped, andthen to require a handicapping assessment for those found to be handicapped,for the purpose of measuring residual functional capacity to assist inplanning appropriate participation.   <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that requiring a medical assessment of allparticipants would be unduly burdensome. However, when a State does identifya participant as handicapped, we would expect it to provide her with thenecessary services to insure meaningful participation.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked that we include vocational rehabilitationservice organizations as a listed example of possible contractors underandSection; 250.21(g)(4)(i).   <T3>Response: </T3>In the final regulations, we have elected not to listany specific kinds of providers with which a State might contract. As aresult, we have not incorporated vocational rehabilitation service providers.This section has been renumbered as andSection; 250.21(b)(3)(iii) in thefinal regulations.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to amend andSection; 250.21(n)to require that the State plan provide that participants must be trainedfor jobs ``in demand,'' rather than jobs which ``will become available.''  <T3>Response: </T3>We decline to make this change. JOBS is  intended toprovide skills for long-term self-sufficiency.  This is not limited tojobs presently in demand, but must include jobs that will become availablein the future. We do not necessarily want to place JOBS participants justin slots presently in demand, which may be limited in many areas, but toprepare them to compete in the workforce for jobs that are appropriatefor them. This provision has been renumbered as andSection; 250.21(e)(4)in the final regulations. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Participation Requirements, Exemptions and  Requirementsfor Individual Participation and Exemptions</ITAG>(andSection; 250.30 of the Final Regulations)  Section 402(a)(19)(C) of the Act provides for exemptions from participationin JOBS that are similar to those that exist under WIN. The exemptionsare contained at andSection; 250.30 and are discussed below.  Child Under 16  A child who is under 16 or is attending full-time an elementary, secondary,vocational or technical school is exempt.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters said that the designation in the NPRMof a minor parent as an adult for purposes of exemption determination isbeyond the scope of the Statute.  They contend that the statutory exemptionapplies to any child under 16. They further say that the fact that minorparents fall within the definition of ``adult recipient'' in section 403(k)(4)of the Act has no relevance to their exemption status; many other non-exemptsare counted as ``adult recipients'' for the purposes of the funding formula. <T3>Response: </T3>We have amended the final regulations to remove theexception for minor parents under age 16 because of the statutory exemption.However, we are concerned that this could result in these young parentsbeing out of school for a very long time, and we, therefore, encourageStates to help these young women to complete their educations.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked whether a child, who did not qualifyfor this exemption because she was not in school, and is required to returnto school as a required JOBS activity, would then qualify for the exemptionfor attending school.  <T3>Response: </T3>If a child is required by the State agency to participatein JOBS because the child was not attending school full-time (and thusdid not qualify for this exemption), such participation could consist ofrequired full-time school attendance. The regulations clarify that suchschool attendance, as a required JOBS activity, does not then trigger theexemption.  Advanced Age  We define ``advanced age'' for the purposes of this exemption to mean age60 or older. This is consistent with the upper age exemption in the FoodStamp Program and should ease the administrative burden on State agencies. Remoteness  Section 402(a)(19)(C)(vii) of the Act also provides an exemption for remoteness.This exemption is for the individual who lives in a political subdivisionthat has a JOBS program, but who resides so far away from a JOBS activitythat participation is not feasible.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State commented that the exemption for remotenesswas changed in the Act to permit exemption only in the areas where theprogram is not available, and that the proposed regulations went beyondthe exemption provided in the Act in the definition of remoteness.  <T3>Response: </T3>We do not agree. Section 402(a)(19)(B)(i) of the Actprovides that the State will require participation by all recipients tothe extent that the JOBS ``program is available in the political subdivisioninvolved'' (and the individual is not otherwise exempt.) Thus, in a subdivisionthat does not have a JOBS program, there is no requirement to participate.In order to give meaning to the exemption at section 402(a)(19)(C)(vii),there must be circumstances in which even in a subdivision with a JOBSprogram, an individual would be so ``remote'' from services as to considerthe services to be unavailable.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that the travel standardapplied in the determination of remoteness (taken from prior WIN regulations)may have been reasonable when persons with children under six were exempt,but does not acknowledge the different circumstances of parents with veryyoung children. They suggested the calculation of reasonable travel timeshould include child care travel time.  <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that remoteness in this context means physicaldistance from a JOBS office or activity. The amount of time it takes toget from home to the site can be objectively calculated if one knows distanceand mode of travel.   On the other hand, the amount of time it takes to deliver a child to acaregiver is a very individual determination, and every working parentmust factor in the time involved in delivering a child to a caregiver whendetermining the duration of her commute. We believe that calculating thecommute for JOBS participants should be no different than calculating itfor any working parent.   Working More Than 30 Hours per WeekSection 402(a)(19)(C)(iv) of the Act retains the exemption for working30 hours or more per week. Currently, under WIN, andSection; 224.20 providesa Federal standard for this exemption: the job has to be unsubsidized andexpected to last at least 30 days. The Federal standard was designed toinsure that the employment is bona fide and likely to lead to self-sufficiencyfor the family. However, in consultation with States, we have heard thatthe Federal definition does not provide States with enough flexibilityto require participation by individuals who are working sporadically atvery low wages.  Therefore, the final regulations allow State IV-A agencies to establishtheir own standards for the type of ``work'' that qualifies for this exemption.For example, such a standard might require that the job pay at least minimumwage. The standards must be included in the State JOBS plan as providedat andSection; 250.21.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State suggested that the regulations allow thoseaveraging 30 hours of work per week to be considered exempt from participation. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe the regulations, as written, leave it openfor States to ``establish minimum standards in its JOBS plan for work thatqualifies an individual for this exemption.'' The State JOBS plan wouldhave to define the period over which the averaging would be calculated. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked if States are allowed to develop a policyfor self-employed people for the purposes of the 30 hour work exemption. <T3>Response: </T3>States are given maximum flexibility to establish theirown standards for the type of work that qualifies for this exemption aslong as it is contained in the State JOBS plan. Pregnancy  Currently, a pregnant woman in her third trimester is exempt based on thepregnancy. Section 402(a)(19)(C)(vi) of the Act exempts pregnant womenduring the second and third trimesters based on the pregnancy.  However, we strongly encourage States to urge pregnant women to volunteerto participate in the program, particularly those who are not yet 20 yearsof age and are without a high school education.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter objected to our urging States to encourageyoung pregnant women to participate, saying that singling out these exemptindividuals for special pressure to volunteer subverted the intent of theAct.  <T3>Response: </T3>We do not see it as singling them out for pressure.We believe that it is important that these young women stay in school fortheir own sake and that of their children. A six-month absence from schoolis almost the equivalent of missing an entire year of school. We recognizethe statutory exemption, but we believe these young women would be betterserved by continuing in educational activities. We decline to change thepreamble.  Age of the Youngest Child  Section 402(a)(19)(C)(iii) of the Act provides that a parent or other relativeof a child under 3 (or an age less than 3, but not less than 1, if theState plan so provides) is exempt if the parent or relative is personallycaring for the child. It also provides that the parent or relative of achild under 6 is exempt if personally caring for the child unless the StateIV-A agency assures the necessary child care and that participation inthe program will not be required for more than 20 hours per week.  However,both of these exemptions are superseded by the requirement at section 402(a)(19)(E)of the Act that custodial parents under age 20 attend educational activitiesif they have not finished high school and child care is otherwise available.A more complete discussion of this requirement is contained in the preamblefor andSection; 250.32.  The child care exemption is limited to one parent or caretaker relativeper case. This is consistent with section 402(a)(19)(D) of the Act whichspecifically allows only one such exemption in a two-parent unemployedparent case. We believe that by analogy it is a reasonable interpretationto apply the same requirement in an AFDC case and, therefore, where thereis more than one person who can qualify for the exemption, only one personmay be exempt. We also believe that this policy is consistent with thelanguage that the individual must be ``personally providing care.''  Exemptions in Unemployed Parent (UP) Cases   Section 402(a)(19) of the Act does not exempt a parent in an AFDC-UP familyfrom JOBS participation due to the other parent's participation in JOBS.Accordingly, the second parent must participate unless he or she meetsanother exemption criterion such as caring for a young child. However,section 402(a)(19)(D) of the Act also allows a State to require both parentsto participate, notwithstanding the exemption for personally providingcare for a young child, if child care is guaranteed in accordance withsection 402(g) of the Act.  If the State IV-A agency does not elect this option, section 402(a)(19)(D)of the Act provides that only one parent may be exempt for personally caringfor a young child. We allow a State to establish policy on whether theprincipal earner is eligible for the exemption for caring for a child underage 3.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State commented that the final regulations shouldclearly specify that if one parent in an AFDC-UP case is participating,the second parent is not required to participate unless the State IV-Aagency chooses to require his or her participation.  <T3>Response: </T3>The State's interpretation is incorrect. Section 402(a)(19)(C)of the Act contains no exemption for the second parent in a two-parentfamily. The second parent is required to participate unless he or she meetsanother exemption criterion such as caring for a young child. This is achange from prior law at section 402(a)(19)(A)(viii) of the Act which exemptedthe second parent in an AFDC-UP case from participation if the principalearner was participating.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Two commenters asked if the option for States to requireboth parents in an AFDC-UP case to participate, notwithstanding the exemptionfor having a young child, means that the parents can be required to participateif their child is one day old.  <T3>Response: </T3>The commenters are correct. The statutory option torequire both parents to participate specifically makes section 402(a)(19)(C)(iii)inapplicable to the parents. It does provide that child care must be guaranteed.However, as we explain in the preamble on the incapacity exemption, a womanwho has recently given birth may qualify for an exemption for incapacity. Incapacity  Section 402(a)(19)(C)(i) of the Act provides an exemption for incapacity.We do encourage State IV-A agencies not to automatically exempt someoneas incapacitated if the individual could be served or employed if reasonableaccommodation for the person's condition were made.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked that we delete the language in theNPRM which provided that the State could take an individual's age intoaccount in determining whether an incapacity prevented her from participatingin employment or training. The commenter was concerned that this couldresult in age discrimination.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have deleted the language ``by itself or in conjunctionwith age.''  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter said the standards for verifying incapacityseem unreasonably strict.  <T3>Response: </T3>We do not regard the requirements of verification ofincapacity to be so onerous as to require modification. The law distinguishesbetween exemptions for illness and incapacity, and our regulations providedifferent standards of verification. In the case of illness, which we defineto include injury, the regulations require medical evidence or some othersound basis for verifying the illness. The commenter's example of a brokenleg would clearly fall into this category, and the cast on the leg couldprovide evidence for a temporary exemption for illness. In the case ofan incapacity, the regulations require verification by a physician or alicensed or certified psychologist. Since incapacity must be somethingother than a short-term illness, we believe that the verification standardsare appropriate. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters pointed out that section 402(a)(19)(E)of the Act, requiring young custodial parents to participate in educationalactivities without regard to the age of the youngest child, does not providefor any period of ``bonding'' or recovery after a young mother gives birth.These commenters suggested that we add an exemption which allows a teenparent to stay home with her child for a ``bonding period.'' Suggestionsfor the length of the bonding period varied from eight weeks to one yearin duration.  <T3>Response: </T3>We agree with the comments that it is very importantfor young children to establish an early and firm bond with their mothersand that the mothers should spend sufficient time nurturing their children.Research seems to indicate that both the age of the child when separationbegins and the amount of time of separation are critical to the normaldevelopment of young children. Infants who are placed in part-time, non-maternalcare do not seem to suffer deleterious effects from separation. We believe,therefore, that it is important for the agency staff working with youngmothers to design program options which are sensitive to the needs of boththe mothers and their children. This could include working with schoolsystems to encourage in-school programs for teen mothers and their children,including courses in parenting skills.   We also believe that the mother's physician is in the best position todetermine when the mother is incapable of participating in educationalactivities after childbirth.  The State IV-A agency may exempt her as ``incapacitated''for an appropriate period of recuperation prescribed by her physician.  Other Exemptions  Other exemptions provided in section 402(a)(19)(C) of the Act, includingcaring for another ill or incapacitated individual in the household, areimplemented in the final regulations and follow the language of the currentWIN regulations, which implement identical exemptions.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that we include in the finalregulations an exemption for VISTA volunteers pursuant to the DomesticVolunteer Service Act Amendments of 1979 (Pub. L. 96-143) which providesthat ``a person enrolled for full-time service as a volunteer under titleI of * * * [the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973] who was otherwiseentitled to receive assistance or services under any governmental programprior to such volunteer's enrollment shall not be denied such assistanceor services because of such volunteer's failure or refusal to registerfor, seek, or accept employment or training during the period of such service.'' <T3>Response: </T3>We agree. Section 250.30 of the final regulations hasbeen amended to include a new andSection; 250.30(b)(10).   Review of Exemptions  The final regulations require that the State IV-A agency regularly reviewthe appropriateness of exemptions, especially those of a temporary nature.Such review must occur, at a minimum, at each redetermination for AFDC.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked that the final regulations be amendedto require that the IV-A agency promptly notify the recipient and the appropriateservice provider of any change in exemption status.   <T3>Response: </T3>We agree. Since there is no longer a ``registration''requirement compelling an affirmative step by either the State or the recipientto change a status, it is possible that, without the provision for notice,the individual's status could change without her knowledge. We also believethat it is appropriate to notify service providers if an individual's statuschanges. For example, an agency providing case management services shouldbe notified. In andSection; 250.30 of the final regulations, paragraph (c)has been redesignated as paragraph (c)(1) and a new paragraph (c)(2) hasbeen added to include that notification requirement. Volunteers (andSection; 250.31 of the Final Regulations)  Section 402(a)(19)(B)(i)(II) of the Act contains a general requirementthat the State IV-A agency must allow applicants for and recipients ofAFDC who are exempt under section 402(a)(19)(C) to participate in JOBSon a voluntary basis if the program is available in their area and Stateresources otherwise permit. However, section 402(a)(19)(B)(iv) of the Actspecifically provides that a State IV-A agency need not allow or requireparticipation of an individual if such participation would affect the State'srate of reimbursement pursuant to Section 403(l)(2) because the State couldnot expend 55 percent of its funds on individuals in the target groups.This provision is incorporated in the regulations at andSection; 250.74(a)(3). Section 402(a)(19)(B)(ii) of the Act contains a specific requirement thatin determining priority of participation within the target groups definedin section 403(l)(2)(B) of the Act, the State IV-A agency shall give firstconsideration to applicants and recipients who volunteer. We interpretthe use of the term ``volunteer'' to include both non-exempt and exemptapplicants and recipients so that a State may elect to prioritize amongvolunteers and, if appropriate, give priority to non-exempt volunteers. The statutory priority given to volunteers in target groups does not usurpthe State IV-A agency's authority to determine the type of program it willoffer. Several factors may affect a State's decision to provide services,including: (1) goals of the State program, (2) availability of resources,and (3) the effect of selection of individuals to participate on the States'sability to meet participation rate standards.   The regulations at andSection; 250.31(b) describe the consequences for volunteerswho stop participating in JOBS.  For exempt individuals who stop participatingin the program without good cause, their priority status to participatein the program is lost as long as other individuals are actively seekingto participate. For individuals who are not exempt but enter the programvoluntarily, the regulations provide that if such an individual stops participatingwithout good cause, the individual is subject to sanction as describedin andSection; 250.34.  We believe that this approach provides fair and equitabletreatment for all non-exempt participants and avoids the situation in whicha non-exempt (mandatory) participant could avoid participating in JOBSby volunteering first and then dropping out without good cause. If therule about volunteers losing priority status were applied in that situation,the non-exempt individual would become part of the group served after allothers thereby avoiding her obligation to participate.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters felt that the preamble to the proposedregulations went beyond statutory intent by giving States discretion indetermining whether to serve volunteers. Many felt that the JOBS programswould have a greater likelihood of success by including as many volunteersas possible, since volunteers are more likely to cooperate, and would requireless administrative activity, such as conciliation. They therefore feltthat the regulations should require States to serve all volunteers first.One commenter indicated that the statutory language ``clearly stated thatvolunteers were to be served before the mandatory population.'' Othersasked for clarification of the language regarding the treatment of volunteers.  <T3>Response: </T3>We reviewed the conference report as well as the languageof the Family Support Act. Though earlier versions of the bill containedstronger language relating to the status of volunteers, we feel that ourreading of the Act is correct. Although many commenters felt that the Actrequires States to serve volunteers first, the actual language does notsupport this view. The statutory language does not include an absolute requirement that allvolunteers be given priority; the Act requires the State to make reasonableefforts to allow volunteers to participate. Only in the case of membersof the target groups is the State required to treat volunteers differentlythan other participants. While it may be appropriate for some States toemphasize volunteering in the JOBS program, this may not be the case inother States.  For these reasons, we have retained the language of theproposed regulations.   The language of section 402(a)(19)(B) of the Act and the implementing regulationsat andSection; 250.31 provide the State with the flexibility to give volunteers,including those outside the target groups, priority. The State is in thebest position to determine the emphasis to be given to including volunteersin its JOBS program, while considering such factors as targeting and participationrate requirements.   The State must provide applicants and recipients with information aboutthe JOBS program, and allow individuals who are not required to participateto volunteer.  Decisions to serve volunteers should be made on the basisof such factors as availability of services, resource  constraints, effecton the targeting and participation requirements, and program goals. Theexception to this general approach involves individuals in the target groups. As required by section 402(a)(19)(B)(ii) of the Act, the State must givefirst consideration to volunteers within the target groups. But even forthis group, Congress stopped short of absolutely requiring that such individualsbe served first by using the term ``give first consideration.'' This languageindicates that even for this group, the State may exercise judgment inserving volunteers.   <T3>Comment: </T3>A number of commenters felt that the preamble and regulationsshould not permit a State to consider such factors as the availabilityof resources, program goals, and possible impact on the State's abilityto meet the participation rate requirement in serving volunteers, particularlythose in the target groups. One commenter argued that Congress explicitlyincluded the qualification that a State need not serve volunteers if doingso would result in failure to meet the targeting requirement, but did notinclude a similar qualification regarding the participation rate requirement.  <T3>Response: </T3>We do not agree that the qualification in section 402(a)(19)(B)(iv)of the Act is the only factor  which a State may consider in deciding whetherto serve volunteers. We believe that a better reading of the Act requiresconsideration of all of the paragraphs of section 402(a)(19)(B) in harmony.Subparagraph (iv) qualifies the general participation requirement in subparagraph(i), as well as the provisions regarding volunteers. A State need not requireindividuals to participate, nor allow individuals to volunteer, if by doingso it would fail to meet the targeting requirement.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked for clarification of the term ``givefirst consideration'' in andSection; 250.31 of the proposed regulations. <T3>Response: </T3>This phrase comes directly from section 402(a)(19)(B)(ii)of the Act. We interpret this language to mean that in determining priorityin serving target group members, a State must first look to volunteers. However, the Act does not require that volunteers necessarily be servedbefore others, regardless of the individual circumstances. Rather, a Statemust give priority to a volunteer over a non-volunteer when all relevantfactors are equal.   <T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters felt that there should be no penaltyfor volunteers who drop out of the program, and  that an individual ina program which did not meet her long-term aspirations should be encouragedto drop out.  One State felt that only non-exempt individuals who dropout should be penalized, and that the penalty should be loss of prioritystatus. Another commenter felt that the penalty should be the same forall volunteers, regardless of their exemption status. Others felt thatnon-exempt volunteers should not be subject to possible sanction.   <T3>Response: </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(B)(ii) of the Act provides that exemptindividuals who drop out of the program without good cause will lose theirpriority status. This section of the Act does not address non-exempt volunteerswho drop out of the program. We believe that such individuals should betreated as other non-exempt participants for the purpose of the sanctionrequirements at section 402(a)(19)(G) of the Act, as described in andSection;250.34 of these regulations. To do as other commenters suggest_providingno penalty for non-exempt volunteers who drop out_would result in preferentialtreatment for non-exempt  volunteers, since exempt volunteers who dropout lose priority status.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked for clarification of the language inthe regulations which provides that individuals who are not otherwise requiredby the State to participate, as well  as those who are exempt, may volunteer.The commenter felt that the only individuals not required to participateare those who are exempt. One commenter asked that we not require staffto make determinations based on the apparent oxymoron of the ``mandatoryvolunteer.'' Another asked for clarification of this term. Another askedthat the term ``volunteer'' be defined in such a way as to exclude non-exemptindividuals.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(B)(i) of the Act specifies that aState require participation ``to the extent the program is available inthe political subdivision involved and State resources otherwise permit* * *'' There will therefore be circumstances in which non-exempt individualsare not required by the State to participate. Individuals from this groupwho then volunteer are ``mandatory (non-exempt) volunteers''.   We do not believe that it would be appropriate to exclude this group fromthe requirement that a State allow individuals to volunteer for the program.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A number of commenters stated that the preamble languageimplied that a State would not have to serve volunteers if they would notparticipate in an activity for 20 hours per week. Another felt that notcounting  participation of less than 20 hours per week would discouragepotential participants from volunteering and the State from serving them. <T3>Response: </T3>Changes made to the definition of participation, nowat andSection; 250.78 of these regulations, will affect the State's decisionsregarding volunteers. However, some discussion of the term ``volunteer''is appropriate, as it was apparent from the comments that there are differencesin the treatment of volunteers with respect to the services that are providedin various programs.   An individual can volunteer to participate in JOBS, and at that point,be accepted into the program as would any non-volunteer_that is, the Statewould perform an assessment, formulate an employability plan with inputfrom the individual, and assign the individual to a component.  On theother hand, many commenters apparently believe that volunteers tend tovolunteer for specific components and for a certain number of hours withina component.   While it may be possible to permit the flexibility of the latter type of``volunteering'' in some State programs, other States will operate underthe former. Once an individual volunteers, the components and activitylevel in their employability plan will be determined as for any non-volunteer.As indicated in andSection; 250.41, the State has final authority for approvalof the employability plan. We believe that both interpretations are acceptableand that the State should determine how volunteers will be served.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter felt that it was inappropriate to permitStates to prioritize among volunteers_for example, serving non-exempt volunteersfirst.  <T3>Response: </T3>The Act does not provide any incentives for servingnon-exempt volunteers first. However, a State may determine that it wouldbe more cost-effective to do so.  In determining which volunteers to servein circumstances in which not all can be served, the State is permittedto prioritize. For example, an individual may be exempt by reason of remotenessfrom an appropriate component site.  The State might choose to serve anindividual who is not exempt (e.g., one who is not remote) on the basisthat there are limited funds available to provide for transportation forthe exempt individual. We believe that the Act permits such flexibility,and we, therefore, have retained the language in question.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that exempt volunteers be countedin determining participation rates. <T3>Response: </T3>Exempt individuals living in JOBS areas of the Statewho participate will be included in determining State participation rates(but will not be included in the denominator pursuant to section 403(l)(3)(B)(iii)(II)ofthe Act).   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State suggested that in order to prevent childrenwho are in school from requesting supportive services, such as reimbursementfor transportation, by volunteering, we should specify that the provisionapplies only to adult recipients.   <T3>Response: </T3>We do not believe that there is a rational basis formaking such a distinction. However, the State has final authority in determiningthe need for supportive services in individual cases.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters felt that volunteers, particularly thosein target groups, should be provided child care.  <T3>Response: </T3>This subject is addressed in the revised preamble andregulations at andSection; 255.2. Participation Requirements for Education (andSection; 250.32 of the FinalRegulations)  Congress recognized the importance of education to the achievement of long-termself-sufficiency, especially for young parents, and it addressed it intwo ways in the Family Support Act. First, the Act requires the State IV-Aagency to make available a range of educational activities which are describedin the final regulations at andSection; 250.44.  Second, the Act requiresthat to the extent educational services are available and State resourcespermit, the State must (subject to certain exceptions described below)require a custodial parent under 20 who has not finished high school (orits equivalent) to participate in an appropriate educational activity. Since teen mothers who drop out of school are prone to long-term welfaredependence, Congress specifically provided that a young parent under 20years of age is not exempt from educational activities even if she hasa child under 3 and gave the State IV-A agency the option to require thatshe attend full-time if it is in the pursuit of a high school diploma orits equivalent. This is a very important step in ensuring that the youngparent remains in school and not be ignored until her youngest child turns3.  In addition, in section 403(l)(2)(B)(iii) of the Act, Congress designatedcustodial parents under 24 who have not completed high school and who arenot enrolled in high school (or a high school equivalency course) at thetime they apply for aid, as one of the four populations specifically targetedfor services.  Section 402(a)(19)(E) of the Act provides the State IV-A agency with severaloptions for young custodial parents. The State may establish criteria forexcusing custodial parents under age 18 from the high school attendancerequirements described above. We believe, however, that excusing custodialparents from high school attendance should be rare. Accordingly, the finalregulations indicate that in such cases the State IV-A agency must providefor assignment to alternative educational activities or to training activitiesthat are combined with education. Job Corps under Title IV of the Job TrainingPartnership Act is an example of an alternative program that has an educationalcomponent. All determinations must be based on an assessment of the individual'scircumstances. The State agency's criteria may not excuse anyone from highschool who is subject to the State's compulsory attendance requirements.The State may not categorically excuse someone because of the grade levelshe has completed. For example, it is not sufficient to say that a 17-year-oldwho has only finished 8th grade is excused automatically.   For custodial parents who are age 18 or 19, the State IV-A agency may requireparticipation in training or work activities in lieu of educational activitiesif the individual is not making good progress in completing educationalactivities or, if an educational assessment, prior to assignment, determinesthat such educational activities are inappropriate for the individual. The statutory reference to ``custodial parent'' in section 402(a)(19)(E)has prompted some to question whether 16- to 18-year-old individuals whoare not parents are eligible for JOBS services. We want to be clear thatthey are. If they are not in school, they are mandatory participants becausethey do not meet the exemption criteria. In addition, if the individualis a member of a family in which the youngest child will lose eligibilitywithin two years because of age, she is a member of one of the target groupsdescribed at andSection; 250.1 earmarked for services. We believe that, liketheir counterparts who are parents, 16- to 18-year-old individuals shouldbe encouraged and helped to remain in school or to participate in othereducational or training activities.  For individuals 20 years of age or over, who have not earned a high schooldiploma (or its equivalent), section 482(d)(2) of the Act provides thatif the State IV-A agency requires such an individual to participate, itmust include educational activities consistent with her employment goalsas a component in her employability plan. There are two exceptions: (1)if the individual demonstrates a basic literacy level, or (2) if the long-termemployment goal identified in the individual's employability plan doesnot require a high school diploma (or its equivalent).  <T3>Comment: </T3>Concerning the proposed section in general, there weresome groups that indicated approval for the strong emphasis upon educationfor those under 20 and stated that the emphasis upon education for thoseover 20 might not be strong enough.   Most of the comments were about andSection; 250.32(a)(2), which sets forththe regulations for the State's criteria for excusing a custodial parentunder age 18 from educational activities. The majority of these commentsdid not support the provisions, because the groups felt that the requirementsexceeded congressional intent by only allowing for placement in anothereducational activity, instead of the larger range of JOBS activities. Somecommenters felt that the regulations overemphasized traditional high schoolas an educational activity for teen parents. They stated that the requirementsdeny a State the flexibility to address the needs of young AFDC parentsin favor of an approach that is only experimental. They did not want theseparticipants' benefits cut off if they are not in school. They sought moreflexibility in the provisions, such as allowing the State to use categoricalexemptions.  One commenter noted, for example, such an exemption mightbe made for parents of children under the age of 2, in view of the highcost of child care for that age group.  <T3>Response: </T3>The conference report indicates that Congress gave carefulconsideration to the intended effect of educational activities upon reducingthe welfare dependency of young parents. The stronger Senate amendmentlanguage concerning mandatory educational activities for young parentsprevailed over the language in the House bill. We therefore believe thatthe emphasis upon placement of teen parents in educational activities issupported by the Act.  Section 402(a)(19)(E) requires that, to the extentof program availability and State resources, the State agency must requirea custodial parent under age 20 ``who has not completed a high school diplomaor its equivalent * * * to participate in an educational activity.''  As to the issue of overemphasis upon full-time high school for teen parents,the regulations follow the Statute in indicating that the State IV-A agency``may require full-time participation (as defined by the educational provider)in educational activities directed toward the attainment of a high schooldiploma or its equivalent,'' and so we provide for the State to assignthe participant to alternative educational activities following the fullrange of options outlined in the regulations at andSection; 250.44(a) orinto training activities that are combined with education. These optionsprovide for flexibility within the congressionally mandated requirementthat the teen parents be in an educational activity. The Act provides for the State to establish criteria concerning exemptingcustodial parents under age 18 from educational activities ``in accordancewith regulations established by the Secretary.'' Since Congress placedsuch a clear emphasis upon educational services for this age group, webelieve that allowing categorical exemptions, including completion of acertain grade level, would dilute the requirement to serve this specialgroup of participants, which is highlighted in the Act.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters stated that, taken literally, the regulationsat andSection; 250.32 do not allow a young parent an adjustment period afterchildbirth. They asked that the section be revised to provide for a bondingperiod between the infant and parent, so that the parent is not sanctionedfor failing to return to her educational activity the day after the childis born.  <T3>Response: </T3>We encourage State IV-A agencies to be sensitive tothe need for fostering a healthy relationship between mother and child,such as through assignment to educational activities with on-site childcare and by encouraging young mothers to devote sufficient time to nurturingtheir children. Moreover, the exemption at andSection; 250.30(b)(3), concerningincapacity has been modified to specifically allow a period after childbirthprescribed by the mother's physician in which she is not required to participatein JOBS activities.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some organizations said that States should be requiredto provide alternative educational programs and on-site child care forteen parents.  <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations provide for State flexibility in fashioningappropriate JOBS activities and do not mandate a particular method of deliveringservices. Neither this section nor andSection; 250.44 on mandatory componentswould prohibit a State from using such alternative educational programs. <T3>Comment: </T3>Some States and other groups expressed concern with whatthey saw as this section's emphasis upon achieving universal coverage,since they felt there were not enough resources for appropriate educationalactivities to meet the special needs of the participants.  <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations in andSection; 250.32 repeat the statutorylanguage regarding consideration for the availability of the program inthe political subdivision and whether State resources otherwise permit.If the State does not have the capacity to meet the needs of the individual,as determined by the agency's assessment, she is not required to attendinappropriate activities.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A commenter asked for clarification of the participationof 16- to 18-year-old non-parents in JOBS.  <T3>Response: </T3>Sixteen to eighteen-year-old non-parents are subjectto the mandatory JOBS participation requirements unless they meet one ofthe statutory exemptions such as being in school.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter read the preamble regarding the proposedregulations for this section as meaning that 16-to-18-year-old individualswho are not parents are mandatory participants in education. The commenterstated that the Statute referred only to custodial parents relative tothe educational requirements, and that the provisions conflict with Staterequirement regarding compulsory school attendance, and that undue pressures,perhaps leading to physical abuse, would be placed upon the affected childrenof families who would receive sanctions if their children do not cooperateand remain in school.  <T3>Response: </T3>Sixteen to eighteen-year-old individuals who are notparents are subject to the participation requirements of JOBS if they arenot exempt pursuant to section 402(a)(19)(C) of the Act. The commenteris correct in saying that they are not required by Federal law to participatein educational activities. We encourage educational activities in keepingwith the general emphasis upon education in the Act, but the State maydetermine that another activity is more appropriate.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters requested that we define or give examplesof when participation in educational activities would be inappropriatefor the 18 or 19-year-old parent, provided in andSection; 250.32(a)(3)(ii). <T3>Response: </T3>The provision concerning the determination of appropriatenessfor individuals in this age group is taken from the Act. The determinationof appropriateness or inappropriateness of educational activities is tobe made based upon both an educational assessment and employability plan.For example, a person not likely to benefit from additional available educationalactivities might profit from other component activities of JOBS. In anotherexample, the individual might be capable of continuing with educationalactivities, but activities meeting her needs might not be available inher area due to lack of resources. Further, an individual's assessmentcoupled with her employability plan might indicate that JOBS componentactivities other than education might be more effective in helping theindividual reach her long-term employment goal more quickly.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A group expressed alarm about the provision that individualsaged 18 or 19 could be placed in training or work activities if they failedto make good progress in successfully completing educational activities.They stated that rote adherence to such a standard would deprive thosein this age group of a chance for a renewed attempt at education.  <T3>Response: </T3>Our definition of making ``satisfactory progress'' or``good progress'' provides for the State to adopt safeguards against thissituation. It allows a State to use a probationary period or to considermitigating circumstances. We encourage States to be sensitive to the specialneeds of the welfare population in educational activities. We also notethe value of using the assessment of the individual's educational progressto reconsider educational placements. These regulations take account ofCongress' great emphasis upon the education of young parents and shouldbe applied in that spirit to those participants who are 18 or 19 yearsold.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A State education agency commented on the importanceof the development of high quality basic education and remediation activitiesto serve the needs of JOBS participants. They asked that the regulationsmore clearly encourage the use of Federal funds to improve and expand sucheducational resources beyond typical local and State educational agencyprograms, in order to more directly serve the special needs of welfarerecipients.  <T3>Response: </T3>When appropriate resources are not otherwise available,these regulations allow the development of special activities for JOBSparticipants to be directly administered by the IV-A agency, to be offeredunder contract, or to be offered through or in coordination with otherFederal or State agencies. (See our comments regarding mandatory componentsof JOBS at andSection; 250.44.)Participation Requirements for Unemployed Parents (andSection; 250.33 ofthe Final Regulations)  Section 403(l)(4)(A)(i) of the Act provides that a State IV-A agency mustrequire at least one parent in a family eligible for AFDC due to the unemploymentof the principal earner in the family to participate for at least 16 hoursa week in one of the following components of the JOBS program: work supplementationprogram, a community work experience program or other work experience program,on-the-job training, or a State-designed work program approved by the Secretary.  If a parent is under age 25 and has not completed high school or an equivalentcourse of education, section 403(l)(4)(A)(i) of the Act permits the StateIV-A agency to require the parent to participate in educational activitiesdirected at attaining a high school diploma (or equivalent) or in anotherbasic education program. The Act does not specifically define minimum levelsof participation for individuals in this category. In the NPRM, we proposedto define the minimum level of participation in educational activitiesfor unemployed parents to be the same as we defined it for the purposeof determining the general participation rate. Although we no longer use``making satisfactory progress'' as a standard for participation rates(see discussion at preamble to andSection; 250.78), we have maintained thedefinition for other purposes, including determining whether an 18-or-19-yearold custodial parent should be assigned to work or training activitiesin lieu of educational activities. (See andSection; 250.32.) Since we havemaintained the definition proposed in the NPRM of ``making good or satisfactoryprogress,'' we believe that it is reasonable to use this standard in determiningwhether a parent under 25 who has not completed high school or its equivalentis meeting the educational requirements of section 403(l)(4)(A)(i) of theAct.   Section 403(l)(4)(A)(ii) of the Act provides that in the case of a parentparticipating in a community work experience program for the maximum numberof hours as provided in andSection; 250.63, such participation shall meetthe requirements of this section even if it is less than 16 hours per week.On the other hand, nothing in this section relieves the parent of the obligationunder andSection; 250.63(d) to participate in CWEP for the maximum numberof hours even if it exceeds the 16 hours per week provided in this section.  Sections 403(l)(4) (B) and (C) of the Act provide that, by FY 1994, eachState IV-A agency must have 40 percent of its Unemployed Parent caseloadparticipating at least 16 hours per week in a work component describedin this section. This requirement increases by steps to 75 percent in FY1997. The consequences of not meeting these rates are contained at andSection;250.74(c) and discussed further in the preamble to that section. We believethat it would be prudent for the State IV-A agency to incorporate programsdesigned to meet these requirements at the time that they implement JOBS(or as soon as they have a UP program).  Early implementation of this provisionwill allow the State to increase the coverage of its program on an incrementalbasis so that it can be at 40 percent by FY 1994. In addition, by implementingconcurrently with JOBS, the State IV-A agency will maintain a consistentapproach to serving unemployed parents.   In addition, we have read this provision together with the technical amendmentsthat section 202 of the Statute makes to the Unemployed Parent program.These amendments impose additional requirements on the State to requireearly participation by principal earners, and on principal earners to participateor apply for participation in JOBS within 30 days of receipt of aid. Theseprovisions are discussed more fully in the preamble to the technical andconforming amendments. By establishing a work program in accordance withthis section, the State IV-A agency would have in place a program to whichit could promptly and easily assign principal earners.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Based on the many comments received there is confusionregarding the effective date of these provisions.  Although the preambleacknowledges that participation rates are not effective until FY 1994,and andSection; 250.74(c) discusses the fiscal sanctions for not satisfyingthe relevant standards beginning in FY 1994, the regulations in this sectionare silent. Several commenters suggested that it was more appropriate andless confusing to place the effective date in this section of the regulationsrather than in the fiscal section.   <T3>Response: </T3>We recognize the concern for including the effectivedate in this section of the regulations.  However, since sections 403(l)(4)(B)and (C) of the Act tie participation rates to fiscal penalties it is appropriateto include this provision in andSection; 250.74(c) of the regulations.  <T3>Comment: </T3>There were several comments suggesting that as Statesdo not have to implement the UP provisions until FY 1994, they should beallowed under the regulations to treat mandatory UP participants as theywould any other mandatory participant until that time; i.e. allow the unemployedparent to participate in any JOBS activity without the constraints of the16-hour requirement until FY 1994.  Other commenters also proposed thata phase-in period for unemployed parents be allowed after a State implementsJOBS.   <T3>Response: </T3>Until FY 1994 a State with an approved JOBS plan hasthe option to either phase-in the unemployed parent 16-hour work requirementprovisions for participation rate purposes or serve the unemployed parentsunder the regular JOBS program requirements. For a State without an approvedJOBS plan there are no requirements to change the services currently beingprovided. States should also review section 202 of the Statute which imposesadditional requirements on unemployed parents. Despite the several optionsavailable under these provisions we want to stress that States should considerimplementing programs incorporating the unemployed parent requirementsas early as possible to provide consistency of services for the unemployedparent population.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Section 250.33(a) explicitly provides that a State-designedwork program may not substitute education or training activities for thework requirement. Several commenters suggested that there are many instancesin which  work involves training and education. By making a flat prohibitionof training and education in the regulations many of the options availableto States in assisting a UP client in finding work may be hampered.   <T3>Response: </T3>A work component such as CWEP or OJT may well containa training component, and such activities, as part of the work assignment,would be appropriate. The prohibition in the regulations means that theState may not substitute an education or training component, such as askills training course, for the work requirement. However, an educationor training activity could certainly be offered in addition to the workrequirement.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters also suggested that States be allowedto waive the 16-hour requirement when an assessment indicates that theclient would be better served in another component requiring more time. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 403(l)(4)(A)(i) of the Act requires that atleast one parent in a UP household participate for a total of at least16 hours per week in a work supplementation program, CWEP or other workexperience program, on-the-job training, or a State-designed work programapproved by the Secretary. This is a minimum requirement. If additionaleducation or training is appropriate, based on the individual's assessment,the State may require the unemployed parent to participate in these activitiesas well. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that the ``making satisfactoryprogress'' requirement for those unemployed parents under 25 participatingin an educational activity should be dropped. They suggested that theseparticipants should be required to meet the same 16-hour participationrequirements as unemployed parents assigned to work components.  <T3>Response: </T3>There is no statutory requirement that there be a 16hours per week participation standard for educational activities. Moreover,we are unaware of any reason for imposing such a standard under generalrulemaking authority.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One State asked if an unemployed parent could be requiredto participate for more than 16 hours per week in CWEP and, if so, whenwould they be expected to look for employment.  <T3>Response: </T3>Yes. There is nothing in section 403(l)(4)(A)(ii) ofthe Act which prohibits the unemployed parent from meeting the obligationof CWEP participation even if it exceeds the 16 hours per week requirement.In addition, the unemployed parent could be required to participate ina job search activity. However, this job search activity would not counttowards meeting the 16 hours of work per week requirement.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked if both parents are required to participate,are the hourly standards prorated among the two or is the requirement mandatorywith only one of the parents.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 403(l)(4)(A)(i) of the Act requires one parentin an AFDC-UP case to participate for at least 16 hours per week in a workactivity. The requirement attaches to one parent designated by the State.There is no provision in the law for prorating the hour requirement betweenparents when the State requires both parents to participate in JOBS.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked if the 16-hour requirement wouldcount towards meeting the JOBS participation standard. Others noted thatas the 16-hour requirement does not count toward meeting the basic JOBSparticipation standard, States would be compelled to stretch the 16 hoursof activity to 20 hours so that the unemployed parents participation couldcount.  <T3>Response: </T3>As we have redefined the participation standard to bean average of 20 hours of activity by the aggregate of participants, the16 hours of UP activity could count in meeting the JOBS participation standard.However, there will need to be other activity occurring so that the establishedaverage can be met. For example, if an unemployed parent is meeting the16 hours per week requirement, and another participant were active in acomponent for 24 hours per week, the 20-hour per week average would bemet for these two individuals.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that States should be allowedto design work programs for unemployed parents. They stated that workfarefor large numbers of individuals for limited time periods is costly andnot necessarily effective.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 403(l)(4)(A) of the Act explicitly states thetypes of programs in which unemployed parents are required to participate.The State IV-A agency does have the option to develop its own work programwhich must be described in the State JOBS plan. Sanctions (andSection; 250.34 of the Final Regulations)  Section 402(a)(19)(G) of the Act provides for sanctions if an individualwho is required to participate in JOBS fails to participate in the programor refuses to accept employment without good cause.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State pointed out that andSection; 250.34(a)(1) ofthe regulations discusses sanctions for those who fail without good causeto participate in JOBS or refuse to accept employment, but does not includelanguage contained in the similar provision from prior regulations at andSection;224.51, relating to termination of employment or reducing earnings withoutgood cause. The State asked if the less expansive language of the JOBSregulations indicates an intentional change in the interpretation of whatconstitutes refusal to accept employment.  <T3>Response: </T3>The Act contains a sanction provision virtually identicalin language to the former section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act. The sanctionprovisions for WIN are spelled out in andSection; 224.51. Where, as here,Congress enacts a new law incorporating language from a prior law, it ispresumed to have been aware of the administrative interpretation of theprior law and to have ratified that interpretation.  The legislative history of the AFDC statute does not expressly mentionterminating employment as a basis for imposing sanctions. However, Congresshas repeatedly stated its intent to encourage welfare recipients to obtainand to maintain employment. In enacting the new JOBS program, the 100thCongress provided further incentives and opportunities designed to assistwelfare recipients to become and to remain members of the workforce. Evidenceof congressional intent can be found in section 482(c)(1) of the Act (Provisionof Program and Employment Information): ``The State agency must ensurethat all applicants for and recipients of aid to families with dependentchildren are encouraged, assisted, and required to fulfill their responsibilitiesto support their children by preparing for, accepting, and retaining suchemployment as they are capable of performing.''  Interpreting section 402(a)(19)(G) of the Act restrictively to authorizesanctions for refusing to take a job and not for voluntarily refusing tocontinue employment would defeat the statutory purpose of encouraging recipientsto obtain and maintain employment. Congress did not intend to create sucha loophole in fashioning a program designed to encourage continued employment. Omission of the phrase ``terminates employment or reduces earnings withoutgood cause'' from the NPRM was an oversight. The final regulations at andSection;250.34(a)(1) have been amended to include this language.  Length of Sanctions  Section 402(a)(19)(G)(ii) of the Act sets forth the length of sanctionperiods for JOBS purposes. For the first failure to participate or acceptemployment, the sanction lasts until the failure to comply ceases. Forthe second failure, the sanction lasts until the failure to comply ceasesor 3 months whichever is longer. For any subsequent failure, the sanctionlasts until the failure to comply ceases or 6 months, whichever is longer. Determining When ``Failure to Comply Ceases''  Many States have indicated that it is difficult to determine when a ``failureto comply ceases.'' Accordingly, the final regulations contain an optionwhich allows the State IV-A agency to determine that the individual hasactually demonstrated a willingness to participate in the program and,therefore, has ceased her non-compliance. A State may require an individualto engage in either the activity to which she was previously assigned,or in some other activity designed by the State to lead to full participation,for a period of up to two weeks in order to demonstrate willingness toparticipate. If the individual successfully participates in such activities,the sanction will cease as of the day she agreed to participate. If theState IV-A agency has no activity to which it can assign the individual,the sanction will cease on the day she agrees to participate. If the individualfails to participate, during the trial period, she remains in sanctionstatus until such time as she successfully demonstrates a willingness toparticipate in the program and, therefore, ceases her non-compliance. For instance, if a sanctioned individual says on Monday that she wantsto participate, the State may require her to come in and develop an employabilityplan or attend a pre-employment orientation. If she successfully completesthe assigned activity, her sanction shall be considered to have ended onMonday. However, if she fails to complete the assigned activity, she willremain in sanction status.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that we eliminate this option.They claim that it goes beyond the provisions of the Statute. Some commentersalso asked why it only applied to the first sanction. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that providing States with the option torequire a trial period in order to determine that the individual has demonstrateda willingness to participate in the program is consistent with section402(a)(19)(G)(ii) of the Act. Therefore, the option is retained in thefinal regulations. We have amended the final regulations to clarify that,as a participant, the individual will be eligible for the child care andsupportive services necessary to allow her to participate.   We have also determined that it was an oversight not to make the optionto require a trial period applicable to the second and all subsequent sanctionssince they also contain the provision ``until the failure to comply ceases.'' We have amended andSection; 250.34(b) of the final regulations to reflectthis change.  Nature of Sanction   If a parent or other caretaker relative in a one-adult AFDC family failsor refuses to participate in the WIN program or accept employment, herneeds are not taken into account in determining the family's need for assistanceand the amount of the assistance payment. In addition, aid has to be paidto a third party in the form of protective or vendor payments unless theagency was unable to arrange such payments. Further, section 402(a)(19)(F)(iii)of the Act specifically provided that if the only dependent child in afamily failed or refused to participate, the entire family would be ineligiblefor AFDC. Finally, if the parent who was designated as the principal earner,for purposes of section 407, failed or refused to participate, the entirefamily was sanctioned.  Section 402(a)(19)(G) of the Act makes several changes to the way the sanctionis applied to the parent (or caretaker) and her family. The general ruleis that the needs of the individual are not taken into account in determiningneed for assistance and the amount of the assistance payment.   Sanction When Only Dependent Child Fails to Participate  Aid is not denied to a family if the only dependent child fails to participate;the general rule applies to such a family, and only the needs of the dependentchild are removed in determining the need for assistance and the amountof the assistance payment. Prior to the enactment of the Family SupportAct, section 402(a)(19)(F)(iii) of the Social Security Act specificallyprovided that the entire family was sanctioned when the only dependentchild failed to participate. The Family Support Act, in amending the SocialSecurity Act, did not retain this provision.  The specific provision wasnecessary to sanction the entire family because despite an only dependentchild's failure to participate, she is still considered a ``dependent child''under section 406(a) of the Act for the purpose of determining the eligibilityof the family. We have added a provision at andSection; 250.34(c)(3) thatexplicitly states the policy with regard to the only dependent child whofails or refuses to participate.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Two States suggested that the existing AFDC eligibilitydetermination provisions must be amended to allow the parent to receivea grant while the only dependent child is under sanction.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 406(a) of the Act defines ``dependent child.''Cooperation with the JOBS Program is not part of the definition. Therefore,a child remains a ``dependent child'' even if under sanction as long asshe otherwise meets the definition in section 406(a). Thus the parent orcaretaker relative may still receive benefits if she is otherwise eligible.We do not find that any change to existing AFDC eligibility determinationregulations is required.  Sanctions in AFDC-UP Cases  Section 402(a)(19)(G)(i)(I) of the Act revises the sanctions for unemployedparent families who are eligible under section 407 of the Act. In additionto applying the general rule to the individual who fails or refuses toparticipate, the Act provides that the needs of his or her spouse willalso not be taken into account in determining the family's eligibilityfor AFDC and the amount of its assistance payment if the spouse is notparticipating in the JOBS Program. The rest of the family will have itseligibility and payment amount determined without inclusion of the needsof the sanctioned parent (and spouse, if such spouse is not participatingin JOBS).  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked for clarification regardingthe requirement to sanction the spouse of a noncomplying unemployed parentunder section 402(a)(19)(G)(i)(II) of the Act.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(G)(i)(II) of the Act provides thatif the spouse of a noncomplying AFDC-UP parent is not participating inthe JOBS Program, the needs of the spouse shall also not be taken intoaccount. This penalty is a lesser penalty than that imposed under the WINProgram, under which the entire family lost eligibility. We believe thatthe new penalty reflects the mutual obligations of both parents to supporttheir children. Therefore, if one parent is not participating, the otheris obliged to do so.  At the time a State provides the program informationto a participant required by andSection; 250.40, it should provide informationto both parents about their mutual obligations.  If the second parent doesnot participate, his or her needs are not taken into account in makingthe determination of the family's eligibility for AFDC and the amount ofthe payment, whether or not the second parent would otherwise be exempt. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter pointed out that the second parent in anunemployed parent case is not necessarily the ``spouse'' and use of theterm ``spouse'' would result in unequal treatment of unemployed parentcases.  <T3>Response: </T3>We agree. We have revised the final regulations to usethe term ``second parent'' in place of ``spouse.''   Protective or Vendor Payments  Section 402(a)(19)(G)(i)(I) of the Act retains the requirement for protectiveor vendor payments if the sanctioned individual is the parent or othercaretaker relative, and the State can make such an arrangement. This appliesto both one-parent and two-parent families. We have amended andSection; 234.60(a)(12)to apply this provision to the JOBS Program.  3-Month Notice  Section 402(a)(19)(G)(iii) of the Act requires the State IV-A agency tonotify an individual whose failure or refusal has continued for 3 monthsof the individual's option to end the sanction by terminating the failure.The regulations clarify that, in the case of the third and all subsequentsanctions, the notice must be sent after 3 months, but it must say thatthe individual cannot terminate the sanction until the full 6-month sanctionhas elapsed.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked for regulatory relief from thestatutory provision that notice must be sent to the individual after 3months even though she is under a 6-month sanction. One commenter suggestedthat the final regulations require that a notice be sent at 6 months tothose individuals experiencing 6-month sanctions in order to remind themin a more timely fashion of their option to terminate the sanction promptly. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(G)(iii) of the Act provides thatthe State shall promptly remind any individual whose failure to complyhas continued for 3 months, in writing, of the individual's option to endthe sanction by terminating such failure. We find no basis for not followingthe statutory requirement of a 3-month notice,  nor do we find any basisfor requiring a State to provide for an additional notice at 6 months.However, the State has the option to provide an additional reminder at6 months, if it chooses, and providing such a notice would be an allowablecost under the JOBS Program.  Other Comments  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several States asked whether a work program sanctionin progress at the time a State implements JOBS must be cancelled or allowedto run its course.  <T3>Response: </T3>Such a sanction was properly imposed under the rulesof the program existing at the time it was imposed and must run its course.However, once a State implements the JOBS Program, all new sanctions mustbe imposed under the provisions of the Statute applicable to JOBS. Thismeans that the first sanction imposed on any participant after a Stateadopts JOBS counts as the first sanction for JOBS purposes, and all previoussanctions under prior work programs are ignored. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that the sanction provisionsof the regulations be stricken and States be allowed to operate all voluntaryprograms.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 402(a)(19) of the Act requires that all non-exemptindividuals participate in the program, and section 402(a)(19)(G) of theAct provides for specific sanctions for failure to participate. There isno provision for an all-volunteer program. Good Cause (andSection; 250.35 of the Final Regulations)  Sections 402(a)(19) (G) and (H) of the Act provide that a sanction mayonly be imposed if the individual does not have good cause for failingto participate in JOBS or refusing to accept employment. The concept of``having good cause'' covers a broad range of circumstances. Sometimessituations arise where an individual is unable to participate for a dayor several days because of such things as illness or a breakdown in childcare arrangements or transportation. These are often short-term situationsresulting from events beyond her control. There are other circumstancesin which good cause will give the individual an on-going reason for notparticipating (lack of available child care). Between these two, therewill be circumstances in which an individual will have ``good cause'' forturning down a specific job or assignment (``net loss of cash income'')but will be required to continue to participate.   Under the WIN program ``good cause'' was defined in the Federal WIN Handbook.Prior regulations for CWEP and employment search required the State todefine good cause in the State IV-A plan. The Family Support Act includesseveral specific provisions that give an individual ``good cause'' forfailing or refusing to participate or to accept employment. We have incorporatedthese requirements into the final regulations at andSection; 250.35 and describethem as follows:  (1) If the individual is a parent or other relative personally providingcare for a child under age 6 and the employment would require such individualto work more than 20 hours per week, the participant shall have good cause.  (2) For all individuals, good cause exists if child care (or day care forany incapacitated individual living in the same home as a dependent child)is necessary for an individual to accept employment or enter or continuein the program and such care is not available and the State agency failsto provide the care.   (3) If accepting a job would result in a net loss of cash income for anassistance unit pursuant to section 402(a)(19)(H) of the Act, good causeexists. However, if the State IV-A agency elects to make a supplementalpayment to the family so that it does not experience a net loss of cashincome, good cause does not exist.  In addition, the State IV-A agency must include in its State JOBS planother reasons for good cause which encompass circumstances beyond a household'scontrol.  These could include such events as inclement weather, breakdownof transportation and/or child care arrangements, short-term illness notrequiring a doctor's care, or a family emergency. While we believe thateach State is in the best position to establish its own additional reasonsfor ``good cause,'' we expect that States will develop standards that willinsure the integrity of the JOBS program.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters recommended that the final regulationsset minimum standards for good cause.  Alternatively, several suggestedthat the regulations specify that a State must identify minimum standardsand describe these standards in its State JOBS plan. Several suggestionswere received for additional good cause circumstances. Several agenciessuggested that good cause should be granted for non-delivery and/or non-receiptof mail. The commenters indicated this is a pervasive problem in poor neighborhoodsand housing projects and believed this problem should be acknowledged inthe regulations.  Another commenter suggested that the good cause definitionfor family emergencies should include psychological and psychosomatic behavioralemergencies of the children. One comment suggested that the lack of childcare for a non-dependent child for whom the JOBS participant is responsiblebe considered good cause.  <T3>Response: </T3>Although we have received many comments supporting aminimal standard for good cause set by regulation, we have elected notto do so. We believe that the State is in the best position to establishpolicy regarding the additional circumstances about what constitutes ``goodcause'' besides that set forth in the Act.  However, we also believe thatthere are circumstances that are beyond a household's control and haveamended the regulations at andSection; 250.35(d) to specify that the Statemust have a definition of ``good cause'' in its State JOBS plan that ata minimum includes circumstances beyond the control of the participant.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters were concerned about the qualifying statementin the preamble on ``good cause'' that said that the State IV-A agencyshould determine if there are any other individuals in the home who arecapable of providing the necessary child care in determining if good causeexists. Although there may be relatives or persons in the home who couldbe child care providers, the commenters raised serious concerns about aState forcing an unwilling or inappropriate household member into serviceas a child care provider with the recipient being sanctioned if she didnot accept such care for her children.   <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that it is entirely appropriate for the StateIV-A agency to discuss with the participant what care arrangements areavailable, as part of the assessment and employability plan. In general,the parent or caretaker makes the final decision about the necessity ofcare; however, if there are individuals in the assistance unit whose needsare met on the basis of their responsibility for caring for the child orthey have legal responsibility for caring for the child, we would presumechild care is not necessary.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked if a waiver would be allowed of theage limit in the good cause provision found at andSection; 250.35(a). Thisprovision allows the client to refuse employment requiring her to workmore than 20 hours per week, if she is personally providing care for achild under six.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 1115 of the Social Security Act governs thegranting of waivers for demonstration projects. In part, it provides thatthe Secretary may waive compliance with any of the requirements of section402 to the extent and for the period he finds necessary to enable the Stateto carry out a project that is likely to assist in promoting the objectivesof part A of title IV.  Demonstration projects under section 1115 of theAct must include an evaluation component. We would be willing to considerwaiver requests that meet the statutory requirements.   Calculating Net Loss of Cash Income  ``Net loss of cash income'' means that work-related expenses which wouldotherwise not be incurred must be subtracted from the gross income to determinewhether the resulting net income is at least equal to the cash assistancereceived at the time the employment is offered.  ``Gross income'' includes,but is not limited to, earnings, unearned income, and cash assistance.The calculation of the amount of cash assistance to be counted in ``grossincome'' must be based on the current determination including the applicationof the appropriate earned income disregards. The need for and amount ofa ``supplemental payment'' must be computed each month and include applicationof the appropriate earned income disregard.   Certain categories of expenses would logically be deducted from the grosssalary, e.g., mandatory payroll deductions. However, other necessary expensesrelated directly to work must also be deducted. The final regulations providethat the State must use actual, reasonable work-related expenses in determiningwhether a ``net loss of cash income'' will occur. This calculation mustbe figured on an individual basis. <T3>Comment: </T3>There were many comments on the ``net loss of cash income''provision. One of the main issues centered on the definition and determinationof necessary work-related expenses. Several commenters recommended thatthe net loss of income computation exclude work-related expenses.   <T3>Response: </T3>The Statute and legislative history do not specify whatexpenses are to be included in the calculation. The language of the Statuteimplies that Congress intended that a recipient's ``disposable'' incomeshould not decrease. Certain categories of expenditures would thus logicallybe included in the work expense deduction. For example, for there to be``no net loss'' mandatory payroll deductions must be deducted and net,disposable salary determined. However, there are other necessary, directlyrelated work expenses that should be considered in the calculation. TheState will be allowed to define these other expenses in its State JOBSplan.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter recommended that States be allowed to definethese expenses. Others asked that the work-related expenses be definedin the regulations and offered suggested definitions. These definitionsranged from limiting work-related expenses to standardized transportationcosts and child care expenses (up to the local market rate) only for thoseindividuals who would no longer receive AFDC benefits and not be eligiblefor transitional child care, to using standard disregards in lieu of actualexpenses to reduce the administrative complexity of tracking actual expenses.  <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that a State is in the best position to definework-related expenses for its State and to determine the reasonablenessof the expenses. Accordingly, we are not regulating in this area.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Another recommended that States be allowed to establisha flat rate work-expense standard with the client being able to documentand receive reimbursement for actual expenses in excess of the standard. <T3>Response: </T3>The use of actual expenses best serves the legislativepurpose of ensuring that a participant who is required to accept a jobis not penalized by having less income than was available while she wasreceiving assistance. The language of the Statute itself implies that theloss must be individually figured. This is also supported by the additionof the hearing process requirement, to the Senate version, to settle disputes. Disputes are most likely to arise when the permissible amount of expensesis debatable rather than when it is based on a reasonable allowance. Inaddition, the use of a flat-rate work-expense, while administratively simple,seems contrary to congressional intent insofar as Congress could have,but did not, specify such a flat rate work expense, as it did in section402(a)(18)(A)(ii) of the Act.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked for clarification on the inclusion offood stamp benefits as income for purposes of establishing net loss ofcash income.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(H) of the Act specifies that theState IV-A agency can require a participant to accept a job only if thatparticipant experiences ``no net loss of cash income'' (emphasis added).As the Act specifically notes ``cash'' income, we have interpreted thatto mean any ``in-kind'' benefits, such as food stamps, are not to be consideredas income in determining if a net loss of income has occurred.   Treatment of Supplemental Payments  Supplemental payments are treated as AFDC expenditures under sections 403(a)(1)or (2) of the Act. Families receiving such payments shall not be consideredcategorically eligible for AFDC and are not eligible for Medicaid as AFDCrecipients.   Eligibility for extended Medicaid (or transitional benefits after April1, 1990) will be determined as of the month the family becomes ineligiblefor AFDC as a result of increased hours of or earnings from employment,or the loss of the earned income disregards.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter recommended that the language in the lastsentence of the ``Treatment of Supplemental Payments'' subsection be changedto reflect that eligibility for extended medical benefits was not basedsolely on acceptance of employment, but also on increased hours of earningsor loss of earned income disregards.  <T3>Response: </T3>We agree, and the preamble has been revised to reflectthis recommendation.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked whether the supplemental payment shouldbe considered a title IV-A or title IV-F expense.   <T3>Response: </T3>As stated above the supplemental payment is treatedas an AFDC expenditure.   Application to Unemployed Parent Cases   The definition of ``net loss of cash income'' does not supersede the 100-hourrule as applied to unemployed parents (UPs). Since the Act does not allowfor AFDC payments to two-parent families where deprivation does not exist(i.e., two-parent families where neither parent is incapacitated and inwhich the principal earner is working more than 100 hours per month), itfollows that a supplemental cash payment may not be made to a UP familyif the parent who is the principal earner is working more than 100 hoursper month. Congress did recognize that the current definition of ``unemployment''for the purposes of qualifying for aid under section 407 of the Act shouldbe studied and authorized several demonstrations in which alternative definitionsto the 100-hour rule could be tested.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters questioned the legal basis for notallowing supplemental payments to a principal earner working more than100 hours per month. The Statute makes no distinction between AFDC familiesand AFDC-UP families in making the supplemental payment option availableto States.  <T3>Response: </T3>Although the Statute does not make a distinction betweenAFDC and AFDC-UP families in providing a supplemental payment, a familywhose principal earner is working over 100 hours, does not meet the definitionof deprivation for purposes of AFDC eligibility. Similarly, a family thathad no child that met the deprivation requirement would not be eligiblefor a supplemental payment. As the supplemental cash payment is consideredan AFDC payment and deprivation does not exist, no such payment can bemade.   Other Comments  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that the regulations make clearthat it is up to the recipient to claim ``good cause'' upon her failureto participate in the program or refusal to accept employment. The StateIV-A agency should be able to assume that there is no ``good cause'', unlessotherwise informed by the recipient.   <T3>Response: </T3>The recipient is responsible for providing the necessaryinformation so that a good cause determination can be made by the StateIV-A agency. Without this information, the State IV-A agency is unableto determine that ``good cause'' exists.Conciliation and Fair Hearings (andSection; 250.36 of the Final Regulations) Conciliation  Prior to the Family Support Act, there was no statutory requirement fora conciliation process. However, Federal regulations at andSection;andSection;224.60, 224.62, and 224.63 outline procedures for dispute resolution andconciliation in the WIN Program.  Section 482(h) of the Act requires that a State IV-A agency establish aconciliation procedure for the resolution of disputes involving an individual'sparticipation in the JOBS program. We believe that it was Congress' intentthat the State have a conciliation procedure that is neither so short asto be meaningless nor so long as to undermine the mandatory nature of theprogram and the imposition of sanctions.  An effective conciliation process can resolve misunderstandings or disagreementsbefore they get to the point of resulting in a sanction. For example, aconciliation process could be used to resolve disagreements over the employabilityplan. It could also be used when a participant's attendance at an assignedactivity has been irregular but not yet sanctionable. Even if it appearsthat the failure to participate or refusal to accept employment is clear,the conciliation process can prevent the need to go to a hearing.  We believe that an effective conciliation process has the following features.Either the recipient or the agency can request conciliation. At some pointin the conciliation, the individual's rights and responsibilities underthe program should be clearly explained, and she should be informed ofthe consequences of her continued failure to participate. The conciliationshould be time-limited, and the individual should be made aware of this.We recommend that the period be no more than 30 calendar days. The agencyshould attempt to schedule at least one face-to-face meeting between theindividual and a representative of the agency. It may be appropriate fora disinterested third-party to participate in such a meeting.  If the agencyinitiates the conciliation process and, after reasonable efforts to scheduleand hold a conciliation meeting, the individual does not appear for suchmeeting, the agency may end the conciliation process. The State's effortsat conciliation should be well-documented in the case file.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked us to require, rather than simplysuggest, that certain features be included in any conciliation process.These suggestions included some or all of the features we describe aboveor components from the present WIN conciliation process. Some commenterssupported mandating the 30-day procedure we suggest, while others supporteda longer period, such as 60 days. Other suggestions included the establishmentof a rebuttable presumption of good cause, mandatory arbitration, providingfor alternative arrangements, and mandating participation by the case manager.Some supported establishing a shorter conciliation process in cases ofsubsequent non-compliance. One commenter believed our approach would allowa State to use one phone call as its conciliation procedure.  <T3>Response: </T3>We decline to mandate additional standards in this area.We believe that this is an area where State flexibility is warranted asthe variety of the comments suggested a wide range of ideas about whatconstitutes conciliation. Each State must explain its procedure in itsState JOBS plan. While we suggest some or all of the above features, werealize different circumstances in States warrant variations among States.Use of a telephone could be reasonable if agreed to by both parties.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked that in components administeredby a contractor, we explicitly allow the contractor to be responsible forconciliation.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 250.10 of the final regulations provides thata State may contract out various services, including conciliation, as longas the entity under contract follows the rules and regulations establishedby the State IV-A agency. Although another entity may perform the conciliation,the State IV-A agency must make the determination of whether the individualhad good cause. In addition, the State IV-A agency should assure that anyconciliation performed by a contractor be fair and impartial.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked that we not require States to providefor conciliation before giving any notice of intent to sanction and withholdthe AFDC grant. These commenters cited the burden this extra procedurewould place on local social service agencies.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(h) of the Act requires the State to establisha conciliation process. Furthermore, we believe that conciliation can resolvedisputes in an amicable and informal fashion before commencement of theformal hearing process. In fact, conciliation is itself a way to notifythe recipient that there is a potentially sanctionable problem that canbe solved.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked that we require that noticebe given before conciliation, and some suggested that the notice be inwriting so it would be documented in the case of a hearing.  <T3>Response: </T3>Conciliation begins when the State IV-A agency (or acontractor) or the recipient contacts the other party. This is, in effect,notice. A State's process may then involve the scheduling of a meetingbetween the recipient and the JOBS worker. Written documentation, includinga written notice of the dispute, is one of the features of a conciliationprocess that we suggest States adopt.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked if the fair hearings office canbe used to conduct conciliation, or if the State must create another levelof hearing officers.  <T3>Response: </T3>The State has the flexibility to use any reasonableentity to conduct conciliation. We do not require that an additional administrativestructure be created. The State must describe its conciliation processin its State JOBS plan.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked if a sanction can be lifted ifthe problem is resolved during conciliation or if the recipient cooperatesduring conciliation.  <T3>Response: </T3>Sanctions can not be instituted until after the conciliationprocess is complete. If conciliation solves the problem, sanctions willnot be instituted, thereby making the issue of lifting them moot.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked whether States have the option to stopa sanction from being applied if the client agrees to participate withinthe notice period provided in a notice of adverse action.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(h) of the Act provides for a conciliationperiod during which an attempt is made to resolve any disputes. This isalso the client's opportunity to try to resolve a dispute either by agreeingto cooperate or reaching some other solution. Once conciliation ends andthe notice of adverse action has been issued, the individual may contestthe proposed sanction through the fair hearing process. If she contestsand loses, or does not contest, then a sanction will be imposed for theappropriate time period.  Fair Hearings Under section 482(h) of the Act, the State IV-A agency must provide a hearingwhen the conciliation process does not resolve a dispute. The Act providesStates with two options. The State may follow the hearing and notice proceduresof andSection; 205.10. As an alternative, the State may establish a separatehearing system. However, the State IV-A agency may not contract out theresponsibility for providing a hearing to any other agency. An alternativehearing system could provide for a hearing only on the issues associatedwith JOBS disputes. It should be noted, however, that before an individual'sgrant could be reduced, suspended, discontinued, or terminated, she mustbe afforded an opportunity for a hearing that meets the standards of <T3>Goldberg </T3>v. <T3>Kelly,</T3> 397 U.S. 254 (1970).   <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked that a recipient be given noticeprior to the imposition of a sanction, and that benefits not be terminateduntil after the hearing process is complete.   <T3>Response: </T3><T3>Goldberg</T3> v. <T3>Kelly</T3> requires notice to clients prior to any action that wouldaffect benefits and requires that clients be given an opportunity to requestthat benefits be continued until the hearing process is complete. Benefitscan not be terminated during conciliation.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters suggested that we place an affirmativeduty on the State to ascertain whether the State worker erred in not findinga legitimate basis for good cause, as part of the conciliation and hearingprocess.   <T3>Response: </T3>The conciliation and fair hearings processes are theproper ways for the participant to pursue a claim that a State worker erredin not finding ``good cause.'' We expect that in the course of operatingany program a State would regularly review decisions about ``good cause''to determine that the policy was implemented correctly. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Operation of State Jobs Program/Program  Components  </ITAG>Providing Program Information to AFDC Applicants and Recipients (andSection;250.40 of the Final Regulations)  Section 482(c) of the Social Security Act requires the State IV-A agencyto provide all AFDC applicants and recipients with information on the JOBSprogram including education, training, and employment opportunities; availablesupportive services, including child care and transitional child care,for which they are eligible; the State IV-A agency's obligations; and theparticipant's  responsibilities.   Although the Act only requires that this information cover the JOBS program,the Conference Report (H.R. Rep. No. 100-998, 100th Cong., 2d Sess. 132(1988)) indicates that it is also important that the information coverchild support responsibilities. Thus, this section of the final regulationsrequires that the State IV-A agency provide information on securing childsupport and establishing paternity as well as related requirements.    The purpose of providing program information on JOBS and child supportis to ensure that all applicants and recipients are encouraged, assistedand required to fulfill their responsibilities to support their childrenby preparing for and obtaining employment and by ensuring their cooperationin the establishment of paternity and enforcement of child support obligations. To provide a State IV-A agency with the flexibility to administer its programsto accommodate variations in local resources and needs, the final regulationspermit a State IV-A agency to develop the processes and methods for providingthis information consistent with timeframes for phasing in the JOBS program.As the JOBS program is phased in by geographical area, a State IV-A agencymust provide this program information to applicants at the time of applicationand to recipients at the time of the first redetermination after implementation.There is no requirement to provide this information in areas without aJOBS program.  According to section 482(c)(5) of the Act, after the State IV-A agencyprovides a recipient with the information described above, it must, withinone month, notify the recipient of the opportunity to indicate her desireto participate in JOBS. The agency must provide a clear description ofhow to enter the program. The Act does not, however, provide specificsregarding this notification process. To allow the State IV-A agency latitudein providing such notification to applicants, except those assigned tojob search, this section permits the State IV-A agency to make such notificationwithin one month of eligibility determination. Thus the State IV-A agencydoes not have to provide information to all applicants, many of whom maynever become eligible. Following the language of the conference report,the regulations indicate that such notification must be in writing. H.R.Rep. No. 998, 100th Cong., 2nd Sess. 132 (1988). Because the idea of participant preference can be confusing as it appliesto non-exempt recipients, the regulations clarify that an indication bya non-exempt individual that she does not want to participate does notprevent a State IV-A agency from requiring that individual to participate.Alternately, consistent with other due process guarantees, a State IV-Aagency may not interpret a lack of response or indication of a preferencenot to participate in JOBS by a non-exempt individual to constitute, byitself, failure to participate. Also, a State IV-A agency must inform anon-exempt participant before she decides to voluntarily enter the programthat she would be subject to sanction if she stops participating in theprogram without good cause.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters sought clarification as to whetherthe explanation of the JOBS program and the written notice must be repeatedat each redetermination. Two organizations recommended that States be requiredto repeat the process at each redetermination. Most State commenters feltthis would be administratively burdensome. One State recommended that recipientsnot be informed at all, as it might generate an overwhelming number ofvolunteers.  <T3>Response: </T3>To the extent applicants and recipients have been notifiedof the program and given the opportunity to volunteer, the Act does notrequire that the process be repeated. However, there may be situationsin which an individual who had qualified as a dependent child becomes aparent and establishes her own case or drops out of school and becomesa non-exempt participant. In such situations, the information and noticewould have to be provided for those individuals, since the original explanationand opportunity to volunteer would have been given to her parent(s). Wedo, however, recommend that when the State IV-A agency reviews exemptionstatus at redetermination, it use that opportunity to remind the recipientof the availability of JOBS services.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter objected to combining information on securingchild support with information on JOBS. Two others felt that the requirementsto inform applicants and recipients of child care services and child supportobligations should be moved to andSection; 206.10, which addresses applications,determination of eligibility and furnishing assistance. One commenter thoughtthe requirements under andSection; 250.40 applied equally to the staff operatingthe JOBS program, if different from the title IV-A staff. As such, he feltit appropriate that should the JOBS staff discover relevant child supportinformation, they should report it back to the income maintenance unit.  <T3>Response: </T3>The requirements under andSection; 250.40 are responsibilitiesof the income maintenance unit insofar as they take place at applicationand redetermination of eligibility, and prior to participation in JOBS.On-going child support activities were not intended to be the responsibilityof the JOBS program staff.   In regard to combining information on child support with information onJOBS, the discussion of child support obligations and cooperation at thetime of application or redetermination is not new nor is a discussion ofwork programs or self-support. What is new is the intent of Congress tohave both subjects discussed in the context of parental responsibilityto support children. Although the means to achieve that end are embodiedin two different programs, the purpose of each is to reinforce the notionof parental responsibility.  We do not believe that the requirements to provide information on childcare and child support properly belong under andSection; 206.10. The reasonis technical rather than substantive. Section 206.10 relates to State planrequirements under title IV-A. Section 250.40 relates to State plan requirementsunder title IV-F, which we have incorporated in the final regulations atandSection; 250.20. In any event, the requirements under both sections arebinding on the State IV-A agency.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Three States wanted to do away with the written noticerequirement found at andSection; 250.40(c)(2). Another State wanted the timeframefor this requirement to extend to 45 days after the recipient is firstinformed of the JOBS program, rather than 30 days.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(c)(5) of the Act requires the State IV-Aagency to notify a recipient of the opportunity to indicate her desireto participate in the program and a  description of how to enter the program``within one month'' from the time the information is first provided tothe recipient. Therefore, there is no basis for doing away with this provisionof the regulations. Further, because the language specifies ``one month,''there is no basis for extending this period.  The conference report (H.R. Rep. No. 998, 100th Cong., 2nd Sess. 132 (1988))indicates that it was the intent of Congress that the notice be in writing,and we believe that a ``clear description'' of how to enter the programcan best be accomplished if it is in writing. Thus we have maintained theprovision that the notice must be in writing.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter said that the 30-day timeframe for thewritten notice represented a barrier to providing immediate service andasked that States be allowed to omit it.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 250.40(c)(2) of the regulations states thatthe notice must be sent within one month of providing the information,meaning it can be sent anytime sooner than 30 days. Furthermore, andSection;250.40(c)(3) specifically provides that States are not prohibited fromrequiring non-exempt recipients, or applicants in the case of job search,from participating prior to the notice being sent.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter recommended that a timetable be requiredfor States to respond to a recipient's request to participate.   <T3>Response: </T3>While we feel that States should respond to such requestsas expeditiously as possible, such a requirement would reduce State flexibilityin operating programs. It will be in the State's best interest both interms of running a credible program and serving interested participantsto respond to positive inquiries in a timely manner.Initial Assessment and Employability Plan (andSection; 250.41 of the FinalRegulations)  Initial Assessment  The final regulations require the State IV-A agency to conduct an initialassessment of each participant's employability based on: (1) her educational,child care and other supportive services needs; (2) the participant's proficiencies,skills deficiencies, and prior work experience; and (3) a review of thefamily circumstances, which may include the needs of any child of the participant.   The final regulations further provide that the initial assessment canbe conducted through various methods including interviews, testing, counseling,and self-assessment instruments. Self-assessment instruments generallyinclude check-off lists or survey forms designed to help the individualidentify supportive service needs such as child care and transportation,and accomplishments such as educational level completed, prior work experienceand skills acquired through employment, volunteer activities, or hobbies. Appropriate assessment methodologies may vary among State IV-A and localprograms due to differences in caseload size, program resources, and programphilosophies.  A State IV-A agency may also use different assessment methodologiesto address individual recipient needs. For example, a State IV-A agencymay find it cost-effective to do a limited, initial assessment for recipients,followed by a more in-depth assessment only as participant needs dictate.Since the Act does not provide specific details about assessment servicesand the conference report eliminated the requirement for testing literacyand reading skills, we believe Congress intended to give the State IV-Aagency broad flexibility in this area.   We recommend that, where appropriate, State IV-A agencies use nationallyrecognized, standardized, or industry-developed tests to determine literacylevels and aptitude skills before assigning participants to specific educationaland vocational training programs. Such testing may help the State IV-Aagency assure that limited resources are used effectively and that participantsare not placed in activities that are inappropriate for them.   The final regulations do not set forth timeframes (except for those individualsin job search pursuant to andSection; 250.60) or establish a process forconducting the initial assessment. However, the final regulations providethat a State IV-A agency must conduct the initial assessment within a reasonabletimeframe prior to participation.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters recommended that minimum standards beestablished for assessment. A few thought that periodic reassessments shouldbe required. One commenter suggested different types of assessment, suchas basic academic assessment, vocational assessment or self-assessment. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that the final regulations do contain minimumstandards for the factors the State IV-A agency must consider in performingan initial assessment.  However, there is nothing in the Act to suggestthat there is one preferred method of conducting assessments. We thinkit would limit State flexibility to mandate periodic reassessments, and,therefore, have elected not to do so in the final regulations.  Employability Plan  Section 482(b) of the Act requires that the State IV-A agency develop anemployability plan in consultation with the JOBS participant based on theinitial assessment. It further specifies that the employability plan mustcontain an employment goal, describe the supportive services to be provided,and the JOBS activities to be undertaken. The final regulations followthe requirements of the Act as to the basic content of the employabilityplan but leave design and administration of the actual employability planto the State IV-A agency.  Congress was particularly concerned that employability plans reflect theavailability of jobs in the local job market so that JOBS resources wouldbe expended efficiently. This concern is discussed in more detail in thepreamble to andSection; 250.12 on coordination.  The employability plan may identify services to be provided to addressthe needs of a participant's child, such as drug education or life skillsplanning courses.  Many services for children are generally available tolow-income community residents at no cost through local educational programsor volunteer services.   The employability plan should reflect a direct path to available employment.States might consider including a schedule of activities that would leadto employment by a specified date to achieve this goal. The employabilityplan should include activities which are selected to achieve self-sufficiencyin an expeditious manner.  Section 482(b)(1)(B) of the Act provides that the employability plan mustalso take into account participant preferences as much as possible withinthe limits of the State's JOBS program. We interpret this to mean thatin developing an individual's employability plan, the State IV-A agencymust consider the needs and preferences of the participant in the contextof agency goals and constraints (including program resources, availableservices and local employment opportunities). The final regulations specifythat final determination of the contents of the employability plan restswith the State IV-A agency. This approval provision is particularly importantin establishing the State IV-A agency's authority to determine the appropriatenessof self-initiated activities as provided in andSection; 250.48.  In developing employment goals and establishing appropriate participationrequirements, the State IV-A agency should not limit a participant's optionsbased upon traditional views of appropriate male and female roles.  Suchlimitations would be inconsistent with the requirements on non-discriminationat section 484(a)(3) of the Act, and could contravene the self-sufficiencygoals of the program.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters objected to the statement in the preamblethat the employability plan should reflect a direct path to available employment.Some felt it undermined what they perceived to be the purpose of the FamilySupport Act, namely, the education, training and employment of recipientsin order to avoid long-term dependency. Others felt the implication wasto minimize training and emphasize low-paying, low-skill jobs.  <T3>Response: </T3>We do not think that suggesting that an employabilityplan reflect a direct path to available employment undermines the purposeof the Family Support Act. The statutory requirement that the employabilityplan contain an employment goal suggests that Congress expected that theeducation and training provided under JOBS would lead to employment. Thefinal regulations define the content required for the employability plan.It should be based on an initial assessment and describe the supportiveservices to be provided and the JOBS activities to be undertaken. Theseare the real determinants of a participant's path to self-sufficiency. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked that we modify the requirementthat the employment plan contain an employment goal. They said that, especiallyfor young custodial parents who have not finished high school, establishinga specific employment goal in an employability plan would be premature. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(b)(1)(B) of the Act requires that the employabilityplan ``set forth an employment goal for the participant''. We recognizethat for the young custodial parent, this may not be a specific occupation. However, we do think that it is important that the participant understandthat the ultimate goal is employment and that she can, indeed, see a pathto achieving that goal within a time certain. We further point out thatthe employment plan should not be a static document, and, particularlyin the case of the young custodial parent, should be frequently reassessedto assure that it reflects the needs of the individual. We, therefore,decline to change the wording of the final regulation, in the belief thatthere is enough flexibility in the concept of an ``employability plan''to allow for preliminary or tentative employment goals, especially foryoung participants. Agency-Participant Agreement (andSection; 250.42 of the Final Regulations) Section 482(b)(2) of the Act provides that, following the initial assessmentand the development of the employability plan, the State IV-A agency mayrequire the JOBS participant (or the adult caretaker in the family of whichthe participant is a member) to negotiate and enter into an agreement withthe State IV-A agency.  This is not a new concept. Currently, some State IV-A agencies requireWIN/WIN Demonstration participants to sign a written agreement or contractwith the welfare agency.  Usually, this agreement is included as part ofthe employability plan and specifies the actions the recipient will taketo implement the plan and the agency services and resources to be madeavailable to the recipient.  Generally, the agreement or contract includeswell-defined time lines and benchmarks for progress for both the recipientand the agency. Thus, the agency-participant agreement is viewed as thebasic tool for outlining the mutual responsibilities, expectations andspecific tasks of the recipient and the agency.  The final regulations follow the conference report and permit a State IV-Aagency to consider the agreement a contract. H.R. Rep. No. 998, 100th Cong.,2nd Sess. 129 (1988). Such a contract is subject to applicable State lawsand regulations. This section of the regulations provides that the option need not be statewide.However, the State IV-A agency will be required to describe in its JOBSplan the types of participants for whom they will be used. Section andSection;250.21 contains the State JOBS plan content requirements.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters suggested that we require that participantssign any agreement under this section.  <T3>Response: </T3>We believe the States should retain flexibility as towhether to require participant signatures on agreements under this section,as they retain the flexibility to decide whether to have such agreementsat all. We may question the utility of agreements that are not signed,but we can also envision circumstances where States could use these agreementsas a way of clarifying how the employability plan will be implemented.In such cases signatures may not be necessary. We also note that if a Statechooses to regard these agreements as contracts, State contract law mayaddress whether signatures are required. We do not want to supersede Statecontract law by regulating in this area.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters suggested that contracts in this areashould be generic in nature and not include specifics such as the numberof hours of participation per week or the length of participation, dueto the fluctuating nature of these numbers.  <T3>Response: </T3>Employment goals and the path to self-sufficiency shouldbe set out in the employability plan.  There is no need to repeat themhere. The Act establishes these agreements as a means to explicitly setout the specific responsibilities of each party, in a manner that is straightforwardand easily understood by both parties.  It can serve as a daily or weeklyguideline of responsibilities for the client, as well as a listing of servicesto be expected from the State. Whereas the employability plan addresseslong-term self-sufficiency, we read the Act as requiring the agreementor contract to set out what must be done by each party in the present. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State believed that regarding such an agreement asa contract would put the State at a disadvantage since its staff woulddraft the contract without the aid of an attorney.  <T3>Response: </T3>If a State is concerned about this, it should not regardthe agreement as a contract. The Act and regulations clearly specify thatthis is a State option.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters believed that the Act requires agreementsunder this section to be regarded as contracts.  These commenters alsobelieved that if an agreement is not considered a contract, there wouldbe a dubious distinction between it and the employability plan.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(b) of the Act uses the term ``agreement,''while the Conference Report accepts the Senate amendment, which uses theterm ``contract.'' We believe there is a subtle, but important, differencebetween the two terms. A contract is enforceable in court against bothparties under State contract law. A mere agreement is not.  We believeCongress, in using both terms and making them at the option of the States,intended both to be State options. We also believe that an agreement thatis not a contract can still be different from the employability plan. Theemployability plan contains long-term goals and could contain a sequenceof several steps toward obtaining those goals. In more complex cases, Statesmay wish to use agency-participant agreements to clearly spell out themutual obligations of each step as it begins, without bringing on all therequirements of a legally-enforceable contract. States may also developother uses for non-contractual agreements. We do not wish to limit States'options by requiring that all agreements be fully enforceable contracts.Case Management (andSection; 250.43 of the Final Regulations)  Generally, a case management system is designed to support and strengthenthe participant's capacity to become self-supporting and to help assurethat participants and their families have access to the resources and opportunitiesrequired for self-support. Case management may be advocated on the groundsthat the activities and services a recipient may need to progress to self-supportare so scattered among programs and agencies that a case manager is neededso that progress is not delayed and frustrated.  Under the final regulations, a State IV-A agency that chooses to establisha case management system is given flexibility to design its case managementservices and procedures. Case management does not have to be offered inall political subdivisions that have a JOBS program. Section 250.21 providesthat the State IV-A agency must describe in its JOBS plan its case managementsystem, including how services will be delivered and by what entities andhow the State will assign case managers to individuals.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to make case management a mandatoryfeature of a State's JOBS program. Some commenters also believed a Stateshould not offer case management in only some areas or only to some individuals. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe the Act is very clear on this matter. Casemanagement is an option for the States and is not to be mandated. The Actalso clearly provides that States may offer case management to some participantsand not to others, as the State determines appropriate.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters, while recognizing that case managementis optional, asked us to give States stronger encouragement to use it. <T3>Response: </T3>We recognize that advocates of case management believethat it is a very effective tool for assisting participants to achieveself-sufficiency. However, we also realize that there are reasons thata State may not use case management or use it only in certain instances.Cost may be one such reason. We believe that each State can best decidethe proper utilization of case management for the needs of that State. <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked us to provide a detailed descriptionof case management and noted the importance of training case managers invarious skills. Some commenters offered detailed descriptions for us toadopt.  <T3>Response: </T3>We thank those commenters who provided an in-depth discussionof case management and urge them to share this information with the States.However, for the reasons stated above, we decline to mandate that specificfeatures of case management be adopted or that case managers be requiredto receive specified training. We leave these matters to the discretionof the States.Mandatory Components (andSection; 250.44 of the Final Regulations)  Education Section 482(d)(1)(A)(i) of the Act provides that the required educationalactivities are: (1) high school education or its equivalent; (2) basicand remedial education to achieve a basic literacy level (our definitionis discussed in andSection; 250.1); and (3) education for individuals withlimited English proficiency. The conference report (H.R. Rep. No. 998,100th Cong., 2nd Sess. 142 (1988)) states that where enrollment in regularhigh school programs is deemed inappropriate, the State IV-A agency isexpected to identify or develop alternative education activities to meetthe needs of JOBS participants.  Many of the comments we received on the educational content of this sectionrevolved around definitions of ``basic literacy level'' and ``limited Englishproficiency'' found in the regulations at andSection; 250.l and around thematerial in the preamble concerning those definitions. The definitionshave been modified as indicated under andSection; 250.l and in the correspondingpreamble. The regulations here have been revised in accordance with thechanges made in the definitions. For example, the reference to educationin English proficiency lists the same skills as are contained in the definition. The regulations provide at andSection; 250.32(b) that if a State requiresparticipation in JOBS of an individual age 20 or over who has not completedhigh school, it must include educational activities consistent with heremployment goal.  There are two exceptions: if the individual demonstratesa ``basic literacy level,'' or if her long-term employment goal does notrequire a high school level of education. In responding to these two requirementsin the Act, we note that levels of education between ``basic'' educationand ``high school'' are not explicitly specified. Nonetheless, they areclearly allowable as JOBS educational activities.  Section 250.44(a) providesthat the educational activity may include any activity below the postsecondarylevel, which means that an intermediate educational goal between basiceducation and high school is acceptable if the State IV-A agency concludesthat it corresponds to the individual's long-term employment goal.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A few groups suggested that andSection; 250.44 be revisedto emphasize that the education offered to the JOBS participant shouldbe appropriate to the individual's ``long-term employability goal,'' insteadof being appropriate to the participant's ``employment goal.''  <T3>Response: </T3>We will retain the phrase ``employment goal,'' sincethe term is the same one used in andSection; 250.41, which describes initialassessment and the employability plan.  In that section, the ``employabilityplan'' must contain the ``employment goal'' of the JOBS participant. Theseare the terms that are used in the Act.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Two literacy groups suggested that the final regulationsspecifically recognize the services of the voluntary literacy communityas providers of basic literacy services for JOBS.  <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations discuss the kinds of services appropriatefor JOBS participants but do not address the types of providers, eitherto include or exclude groups. State IV-A agencies may choose to employthe services of the voluntary literacy community if they are appropriateto meet participant needs.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One group stated that andSection; 250.44 should mandate``adult special education'' for those 22 years of age and older who lackthe necessary comprehensive ability to grasp basic training skills andthat the section also should provide for ``entrepreneurship activities.'' <T3>Response: </T3>Terms for the mandatory activities under this sectionfollow those used in the Act. However, ``adult special education'' wouldnot be precluded from the activities a State may offer under this section. ``Entrepreneurship activities'' would fall under andSection; 250.47 of theseregulations.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A small number of commenters stated that they thoughtthe list of the three educational activities included under andSection; 250.44(a)(high school or equivalent, basic and remedial education, and educationin English proficiency) was unnecessary or confusing. One of these entitiessaid that the inclusion of ``basic education'' on the list, would, in viewof our definition of ``basic literacy level,'' mean that education notleading to completion of the eighth grade would not be eligible for JOBSfunding.  <T3>Response: </T3>The three forms of education are listed because theyare specifically listed in the Act as mandatory educational activities.We believe that the wording of andSection; 250.44(a) clearly provides thatall types of educational activities are covered under JOBS if they areless than the postsecondary level and if the State IV-A agency determinesthem to be appropriate to the participant's employment goal. <T3>Comment: </T3>A research organization suggested that HHS encourageStates to provide remedial education integrated into job skills training,rather than provide such activities sequentially.  <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations at andSection; 250.44 provide that theStates may combine several activities into a single program activity. Weencourage the selection of activities that are appropriate to the individual'semployability plan, whether they be integrated or sequential.  Work and Training Programs  The Family Support Act provides no definition for the required work andtraining programs. It does, however, require reporting of activities andof costs related to each selected program or activity. We, therefore, adoptedfunctional definitions for the three remaining mandatory components of``job skills training,'' ``job readiness activities,'' and ``job developmentand placement.''   We sought available definitions of these terms from the Department of Labor,principally with reference to definitions used by the State employmentsecurity agencies and the Job Training Partnership Act programs. Not allprograms required by the Family Support Act, such as ``job readiness activities,''are defined in Department of Labor programs. Other programs or activitiesare defined differently, such as ``job development'' and ``job placement'',which are established in the Act as a single, combined, required programactivity, but which are each defined differently by JTPA and the EmploymentService.  In a two-day meeting with selected State welfare agency directors and theirwork program directors, strong opinion was voiced that wherever possible,definitions of employment and training terms correspond with existing definitionsused by the State agencies from whom State IV-A agencies would often beseeking both contracted and non-reimbursed services. While we have endeavoredto be responsive to these State concerns in this regard, we had to choosebetween or combine definitions. We invited comment on the operational usefulnessof the distinctions we proposed for such purposes as program design anddata maintenance in case records. We received no comments in this area. Job Readiness Activities  Under these regulations, ``job readiness'' centers on pre-employment preparation,and excludes activities that would readily fit within the scope of otherdefined components, such as vocational skills training. The Departmentof Labor advised us that ``job readiness activities'' are not defined bythe Employment Service.  However, employment security agencies define severalclosely related terms. Thus, a ``non-job-ready'' person is one who is deficientin work attitudes, behaviors or skills and is therefore unable to get andkeep a job; a ``job ready individual'' is one who, among other things,has no physical, mental or job skill barriers that preclude employment;and ``employability'' is defined as, among other things, work behaviorand attitudes that are necessary to compete successfully in the labor market.We agree with the Department of Labor observation, and in the regulationswe provide that an activity related to removing such barriers would bedefined as a job readiness activity.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter thought the Act lacked a framework forthe implementation and funding of critically needed job readiness activities. <T3>Response: </T3>The Act and the regulations recognize the mandatorynature of job readiness activities. However, the regulations permit Stateflexibility in providing these services and encourage interagency cooperationin developing the JOBS program. State IV-A agencies should use availablejob readiness activities and seek appropriate advice on the developmentof additional activities when such resources do not already exist.  Job Skills Training  We adhere to what we believe is the commonly understood meaning of theterm_pre-employment training in technical job skills. It would, for example,correspond approximately to what was understood in the WIN and WIN Demonstrationprograms as institutional training.  In order to assure that skills training offered through JOBS results inan increase in participants' skills and competencies, and that progresscan be monitored by the State IV-A agency, we require that qualitativemeasures for ``satisfactory progress'' be developed for all skills training.Based upon the comments we received, we decided not to require measuresof ``satisfactory progress'' in order to qualify a training program asa component activity under JOBS but to retain the concept with respectto reassessment and providing supportive services. This is discussed inmore detail in andSection; 250.1 in relation to the proposed definition of``making good or satisfactory progress in a training component.''   Job Development and Job Placement  The final regulations define ``job development and job placement'' as agencyactivity on behalf of participants to create or discover openings, andto market participants for those openings. This is consistent with a longstandingapproach in employment programs. We have followed that historical patternas a means of distinguishing agency activity that is relatively intenseon behalf of a participant, from a participant's intense activity in jobsearch. Based on this distinction, we have excluded this component fromthe definition of ``participation'' found in andSection; 250.78.  We also do not intend that this component should have any connection withthe longstanding concept in employment security agencies of a ``placement''as an outcome. The specialized meaning of this outcome measure for employmentsecurity agencies does not correspond to the requirements or expectationsof JOBS.  Optional Components (andSection; 250.45 of the Final Regulations)  In addition to the four required components, the State IV-A agency mustalso offer at least two of the following four activities in its JOBS program:(1) Group and individual job search; (2) On-the-job training; (3) Work supplementation; and  (4) Community work experience, or other approved work  experience program. Except for on-the-job training, these optional components are generallybased on existing law and program regulations. The Act provides for a fewchanges to programmatic aspects of these components which are discussedin Subpart G. Otherwise, we have adopted as much of the existing regulationsas possible. Since the Act establishes common sanctions, eligibility criteria,FFP guidelines, target populations and service area coverage for the JOBSprogram, the regulations governing the optional components will no longerhave specific language addressing these areas as there was when they werediscrete IV-A work programs.  Like the required components, the optional components need not be operateduniformly throughout the State.  However, the additional State optionsdo provide an opportunity for the State IV-A agency to develop a programmeeting specific needs of individuals while recognizing State economicand environmental factors. Congressional conferees (H. R. Rep. No. 100-998,100th Cong., 2d Sess. 141 (1988)) stressed the desirability of programsthat respond to varying circumstances, including changes in the unemploymentrate and different needs that exist in rural and urban areas. Our regulationsseek to reflect this congressional intent.Postsecondary Education (andSection; 250.46 of the Final Regulations)  We define postsecondary education in andSection; 250.1. We interpret thelanguage of section 482(d)(1)(B)(i) of the Act to mean that the offeringof postsecondary education is an entirely optional matter for the StateIV-A agency to address in its JOBS plan, except that we have limited sucheducation to that which is directly related to the attainment of an individual'semployment goal, i.e., to obtain useful employment in a recognized occupation.Within this occupational limitation, the State IV-A agency must set forthin its State JOBS plan the bases upon which it will determine whether postsecondaryeducation is appropriate.  We believe that the restriction of postsecondary education to educationrelated to the goal of obtaining useful employment in a recognized occupationis consistent with the intent of the JOBS program. The program's aim toreduce long-term welfare dependence would not be served by permitting aJOBS participant to embrace the broader, more general educational goalsthat also fall within postsecondary education but that have a less well-definedoccupational connection.  While we do not prohibit the use of JOBS funds for this activity, we areconcerned about the potential cost. Thus, we encourage States to use resourcesthat are otherwise available to fund postsecondary education for JOBS participants.A State should consider the wide range of other, in some cases less wellfunded, components which must be included in its JOBS program when determiningwhether to fund postsecondary education as well as the fact that most welfarerecipients are considerably more educationally needy and less able to supporttheir families than those who are ready to enter postsecondary education. We will monitor State expenditures in this area for the purpose of determiningthe extent to which investment in postsecondary education for JOBS participantsproduces more beneficial returns, such as longer term self-sufficiency,than are produced by other levels of education or training.  We exclude the costs of such education, including tuition, books and fees,from coverage as special needs under andSection; 233.20(a)(2)(v). Since theAct now provides funding for this activity and places a specific cap onthe overall JOBS funding, we would be circumventing the Act were we toallow additional funding under special needs.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Although there were few comments regarding the definitionof ``postsecondary education,'' many groups, including a number of postsecondaryinstitutions, commented upon the statement in the preamble that encouragedStates to limit expenditures of JOBS funds on postsecondary education.They saw the statement as discouraging the placement of participants intopostsecondary programs and objected to having that area singled out forspecial monitoring of JOBS expenditures. Therefore, they asked that thefinal regulations not appear to discourage States from placing JOBS participantsinto postsecondary education, since the reports of recent studies indicatethat most of the new jobs being created will require postsecondary education.Objecting to our preference for short-term programs leading to employmentover postsecondary education, the commenters stated their belief that postsecondaryeducation is more likely than lower levels of education to produce returnsof long-term self- sufficiency.  <T3>Response: </T3>In view of the availability of State, Federal, and privategrants and loans for postsecondary education, we do not believe that itis unreasonable to encourage States to take advantage of other means ofsupport for postsecondary students who participate in JOBS. This will enablethe program to serve more individuals and to use JOBS funds to bolster,where necessary, scarce resources needed to serve the great number of potentialJOBS participants who are educationally disadvantaged through lack of basicand high school education, or those who can benefit from short-term programsdesigned to address job readiness, job skills, or training. Our discussioncontained under andSection; 250.32 points out the general consensus amongthose who commented that adequate resources are not available for thosebelow the postsecondary level, particularly those for whom regular highschool is not appropriate. While we encourage States to consider how theyuse limited resources and to serve as many individuals as possible underJOBS, the regulations do not prohibit States from placing JOBS participantsinto postsecondary educational programs.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Comments were mixed concerning the language that permitsa State to refer a participant to postsecondary education when the educationis linked to ``meeting individual goals that are directly related to obtaininguseful employment in a recognized occupation.'' Several groups stated theirspecific approval of the language, indicating that they saw the languageas following the intent of the Statute. A couple of groups objected torelating such education ``directly'' to occupational goals. One of themsaid that the language would make States hesitant to use postsecondaryeducation as a JOBS activity. Another said that the language of the Actis broad enough to offer a wide range of postsecondary educational activitiesthat can improve employability. Some of the commenters observed that anykind of postsecondary education is relevant to employment.  <T3>Response: </T3>We are maintaining our original position that the relationshipof postsecondary education to the participant's employment goal is consistentwith the intent of JOBS. While we concur that broader, less job-relatededucation can provide skills related to employability, we believe thata specific occupational linkage more readily assures that the postsecondaryeducation will lead to the employment goal that the Act requires to bepart of each participant's employability plan.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A few entities, including several States, did not approveof the exclusion of postsecondary education costs from FFP as special needs.Some of them also mentioned exclusion of supportive services from specialneeds funding. Some of them sought an explicit statement that the costsof postsecondary education are covered through JOBS.  <T3>Response: </T3>We continue to believe that the exclusion from specialneeds funding of postsecondary educational expenses (along with the costsof other education resulting from participation in JOBS) constitutes thebest reading of the Act, since it now provides JOBS funding to be usedfor educational activities except in the case of self-initiated educationor training as treated in andSection; 250.48. JOBS funding can be used forsuch expenses as tuition, books, and fees, except in the case of self-initiatededucation or training. Supportive services such as child care now are providedto JOBS participants and certain other categories of individuals throughthe supportive services provisions of the Act. However, we encourage Statesto take advantage of the other resources that are available to supportthe postsecondary educational activities of JOBS participants. Other Education, Training, and Employment Activities (andSection; 250.47of the Final Regulations)  Section 482(d)(1)(B)(ii) of the Act provides that the Secretary may approveadditional components not specified in the Act. Because public serviceemployment was specifically considered as a potential optional componentand finally rejected by the conferees, we have expressly excluded publicservice employment from the acceptable possibilities. By public serviceemployment we mean what that term meant under the WIN and CETA programs:a fully subsidized job in a public agency.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter applauded our decision to bar public serviceemployment, while one commenter said that we should leave it as an optionto the States.  <T3>Response: </T3>We are persuaded by the fact that public service employmentwas specifically considered as a potential optional component and finallyrejected by the conferees. Furthermore, we note that section 141(p) ofthe Job Training Partnership Act (Pub. Law 97-300) specifically bars fundingfor public service employment under JTPA.  We also point out that if an appropriate job is available in the publicsector, and the State IV-A agency wants to place an individual in the slot,it could use the OJT component. While 100% funding would not be available,our regulations at andSection; 250.61 on OJT do allow States to vary therate of reimbursement to employers so that a higher rate could be offeredat the beginning of the OJT as long as it averaged 50% over the periodof the contract.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Another commenter said that we should define public serviceemployment in the regulations so that States could propose alternativesunder andSection; 250.47 if the job would lead to full-time employment. <T3>Response: </T3>We have decided to modify our definition of public serviceemployment and include it in the final regulations. The modification isthat we have dropped the phrase that the job ``is not expected to convertto unsubsidized employment.'' Whether a public service job will lead tounsubsidized employment is not the controlling factor. Rather it is thatsubsidizing any employer at 100% is not an effective use of limited resources.  We are also concerned that routine costs of State and local governmentswould be inappropriately shifted to the Federal government under such aprogram. Self-Initiated Education or Training (andSection; 250.48 of the Final Regulations) This section describes State options, in areas of the State where the JOBSprogram is available, with regard to individuals already engaged in educationor training at the time they would otherwise commence participation inJOBS.  In the NPRM, this section referred only to self-initiated educationor training that met the requirements of section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act.As a result of comments we received and our further review of the languageof the Statute, we have amended andSection; 250.48 by adding paragraph (b)to address another group of participants: individuals who live in areasof the State where there is a JOBS program and are enrolled in a self-initiatedactivity that does not meet the requirements of section 402(a)(19)(F) ofthe Act at the time they would commence participation in JOBS.  We have also identified a third category: AFDC applicants and recipientswho live in non-JOBS areas and are engaged in education or training forwhom the State may provide child care and other supportive services pursuantto the State's approved Supportive Services plan. However, such educationor training in non-JOBS area is not part of the JOBS program, and, therefore,is not covered by this section of the regulations. Approval of educationor training in non-JOBS areas for the purpose of providing child care andsupportive services necessary for participation is addressed in the preambleand regulations at andSection;andSection; 255.1 and 255.2.  For purposes of this section, we will use the term ``self-initiated educationor training'' to mean education or training that meets the requirementsof section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act, and which is described at andSection;250.48(a) of the final regulations. We will use the term ``other educationor training pursuant to andSection; 250.48(b)'' to mean a self-initiatedactivity that does not meet the requirements of section 402(a)(19)(F) ofthe Act but which the State may approve under the JOBS program. Finally,we will use the term ``self-initiated activity'' as a generic term to describeall such activities.Self-Initiated Education or Training under Section 402(a)(19)(F) of theAct  Section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act describes the circumstances in which theState IV-A agency may permit an individual who is in self-initiated educationor training that meets certain requirements, at the time she would otherwisecommence participation in JOBS, to continue such course of study. The finalregulations at andSection; 250.48(a) provide that: (1) the individual mustbe attending (in good standing) an institution of higher education (asdefined by section 481(a) of the Higher Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C.1088) or a school or course of vocational or technical training in a courseof study that is consistent with her employment goals; (2) she must beattending at least half-time; (3) she must be making ``satisfactory progressin such institution, school, or course''; and (4) she must meet the State'scriteria for determining the appropriateness of the self-initiated educationor training.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter thought that we had narrowed the applicationof section 402(a)(19)(F) by referring to individuals who ``would otherwisebe required to commence participation'' rather than using the statutorylanguage ``would otherwise commence participation.'' The commenter thoughtthat such a provision would exclude persons not required to participatefrom being counted as participants.  <T3>Response: </T3>We did not intend this exclusion, and we have amendedandSection; 250.48(a) using the statutory language.  Therefore, exempt andnon-exempt individuals engaged in self-initiated education or trainingthat meets the definition of section 402(a)(19)(F) are covered by andSection;250.48(a). Half-time Attendance  While the wording of the Act could lead to an interpretation that the half-timeattendance provision of section 402(a)(19)(F) pertains only to the schoolor course of vocational or technical training, this would leave a questionas to the amount of time the participant would have to be in attendanceat an institution of higher education. We see no reason to distinguishan ``institution of higher education'' from a ``school or course of vocationalor technical training'' in applying a minimum attendance requirement. Rather,we see the application of the half-time attendance requirement to highereducation as serving three beneficial purposes. First, it provides guidanceas to minimal expectations of participation. Second, it serves as an indicatorassociated with making satisfactory progress in the institution, as definedin andSection; 250.1. Third, the half-time requirement is consistent withsuch requirements for half-time attendance contained in certain studentfinancial aid programs operated under the Higher Education Act. For example,the Guaranteed Student Loan Program requires a student to be enrolled atleast half-time in order to receive aid from that program.  Vocational or Technical Training The meaning of the term ``vocational or technical training'' is incorporatedinto andSection; 250.48(a). The term includes vocational or technical trainingoffered by postsecondary institutions. As a result of comments we received,the definition has been expanded to include such training offered by otherentities such as secondary schools, and public and private agencies andorganizations that offer adult vocational or technical education. The termrefers to training that both leads to useful employment in a recognizedoccupation and results in other than a baccalaureate or advanced degree.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Two organizations objected to the exclusion of secondaryvocational education from this section.  <T3>Response: </T3>Secondary vocational education is not excluded fromJOBS by virtue of the provision at andSection; 250.44(a), which providesthat any educational activity below the postsecondary level that the Statedetermines to be appropriate to the participant's employability plan fallswithin the mandatory educational components of JOBS. However, we realizefrom comments we received that there might be instances in which such trainingis self-initiated within the meaning of section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act. Therefore, we have refined our definition of the term ``school or courseof vocational or technical training'' at andSection; 250.48(a) to includesuch education at the secondary level.  Assessment of Self-Initiated Education or Training  In supplying definitional information, the Department of Education statedthat one of its primary concerns was ``whether welfare recipients who areenrolled in postsecondary schools have the ability to benefit from theprograms in which they are enrolled. The Division of Adult Education believesthat the State should perform an educational assessment of the abilityto benefit of any JOBS participant * * * before enrollment is consideredsatisfactory participation * * * .''  Other groups that we consulted in the regulations development process assertedthat there is potential for abuse by some of the institutions cited insection 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act that would enroll welfare recipients asa means of securing indirect funding by means of student aid under theHigher Education Act. We believe that, in the case of this category ofeducation or training which the State IV-A agency might find to be satisfactoryfor participation in the JOBS program, an educational assessment of theparticipant is crucial for the protection of both the participating studentand Federal funds.  Therefore, the regulations require an assessment anddevelopment of an employability plan before the State applies its criteriafor determining the appropriateness of the individual's pre-existing educationor training activity to her defined employment goal. In andSection; 250.48(a)we now specifically refer to the State's criteria for determining appropriatenessof self-initiated education or training, which were implicit in the NPRM. <T3>Comment: </T3>There were a few commenters who did not approve of performingan assessment on an individual governed by andSection; 250.48(a), or as fullan assessment as would be performed on other individuals. They asked forState flexibility in assessing and preparing an employability plan forthose in self-initiated education or training. Some of them stated thatdeference should be given to individual choice, since they believe thatthe person has taken considerable initiative in enrolling. They saw ourconcern with assessment of the individual's ability to benefit from theself-initiated education or training as demeaning the abilities and judgmentof welfare recipients. A few commenters specifically stated their approvalof the provision, however, fearing that the individual might have had aninadequate assessment by the enrolling institution.  Some commenters specificallyapproved of the State's having final authority over the employability planas provided by andSection; 250.41 of the regulations.  <T3>Response: </T3>We maintain our position that the IV-A agency must performan assessment that will enable a judgment to be made regarding the suitabilityof the self-initiated education or training in which the individual isenrolled.  Our reasoning is based upon comments we received prior to thedevelopment of these regulations and is reinforced by those who commentedon the NPRM in support of the use of assessment for those enrolled in self-initiatededucation or training. Some States have already seen what they believeare inappropriate recruitment of welfare recipients by for-profit institutionsseeking to bolster their enrollments. It is our desire to encourage Statesto take measures that ensure that JOBS participants are engaged in educationor training from which the individual can benefit and move toward self-sufficiency.The Department of Education is currently confronted with high student loandefault rates associated with some educational institutions, many of whichare for-profit trade schools.  These defaults can be the result of thestudent's not being able to obtain employment after completing or droppingout of educational programs in which they have been inappropriately enrolled. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked if a person meets the ``attending'' requirementof this section if she has enrolled but has not started attending classes. <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations provide that the State may permit anindividual who is attending self-initiated education or training at thetime she would otherwise commence participation in the JOBS program tocontinue to attend if she meets the requirements established in the regulationsat andSection; 250.48(a). The regulations apply as well to individuals whohave enrolled in an activity, but have not yet attended class. In eithercase the State must make a determination of the appropriateness of theeducation or training before approving it under andSection; 250.48(a). Forpurposes of counting as participation pursuant to the requirements of andSection;250.78, the activity must have started.   State Restrictions on Approvable Activities  In order to maintain consistency with the regulations on postsecondaryeducation found at andSection; 250.46, we provide in andSection; 250.48 thatthe State IV-A agency may place restrictions upon the self-initiated postsecondaryeducation or training covered by section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act. Forexample, the State IV-A agency might restrict such postsecondary educationto a maximum of two years. Further, a State IV-A agency might choose topermit an individual who is within two years of completing a four-yearprogram to complete it if the requirements of this section are otherwisefulfilled. We would encourage States in delineating restrictions to bemindful that the goal of self-initiated training should be to move theparticipant from welfare dependence within a reasonable time. Therefore,shorter programs leading to specific occupational goals are preferableto longer educational programs that may have far less specific employmentgoals.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A small number of commenters indicated that they didnot support the statement in the preamble that encouraged States to restrictthe length of self-initiated postsecondary education that would count towardsparticipation in JOBS. One of them saw the preamble on this section encouragingeven more stringent State restrictions on postsecondary education thanthe preamble on andSection; 250.46, Postsecondary Education. One of themsought clarification as to whether self-initiated training could includethe baccalaureate degree. Another State specifically supported having theauthority to restrict such education.   <T3>Response: </T3>It is not our intention to suggest that the State'soption to restrict self-initiated education should result in more stringentrestrictions than it chooses to exercise regarding postsecondary educationunder andSection; 250.46.  The intent in both cases is to encourage the participant'sattainment of an occupational goal within a reasonable period of time.The definitions associated with this section of the regulations do permitenrollment in a baccalaureate degree program if the program is offeredby an ``institution of higher education.'' However, in the case of suchenrollment, the State could choose to restrict the period for which enrollmentis approved and an individual is, therefore, eligible for supportive services. Prohibition on FFP  Section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act specifically states that the costs of``such school or training'' shall not constitute federally reimbursableexpenses under JOBS. The regulations on funding at andSection; 250.75(a)define such costs to include tuition, books, fees, room, and board. Thecosts of necessary child care and other supportive services for participantsin self-initiated education or training are eligible for Federal reimbursement,as provided at andSection; 255.4.    <T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters said that self-initiated postsecondaryeducation should be funded under JOBS. They noted that if it is not, theindividual might decide to drop out of the educational program in orderto re-enroll under JOBS.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act states that the costsof such school or training shall not constitute federally reimbursableexpenses under JOBS. Furthermore, in the preamble to these regulations,States are strongly urged in andSection; 250.46, Postsecondary Education,to use resources other than JOBS funds to pay for a participant's postsecondaryeducation. Also, supportive services under the Act are available to eithercategory of student, self-initiated or State-assigned, as long as the activityis approved. Therefore, in many instances there should be no benefit inmaking such a change.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State commented that the regulations restrictingfunding for self-initiated education would impede clients who will benefitfrom retraining offered by vocational rehabilitation.   <T3>Response: </T3>If the individual's vocational rehabilitation programmeets the definitions applicable to paragraph (a), and if the other conditionsof the paragraph are met, the individual could be considered a JOBS participant.The financial support for the individual's educational program, as is thecase with support for other educational programs falling under the paragraph,would have to come from sources other than JOBS. It is also possible forthe individual in self-initiated vocational rehabilitation to participateunder components of JOBS as provided by paragraph (b) of this section.There appear to be no special problems associated with participation ina referral to vocational rehabilitation activities under JOBS.   <T3>Comment: </T3>A few groups objected to the exclusion of the use ofspecial needs funds under andSection; 233.20(a)(2)(v) to pay for supportiveservices for those in self-initiated activities.  Some included books andfees as supportive services. One asked for clarification as to what supportiveservices were available under JOBS for this category of participants.  <T3>Response: </T3>Supportive services, such as child care and transportation,are otherwise available under title IV-A and JOBS respectively for thiscategory of individuals, so these services are not available under specialneeds. As required by the Act, andSection; 250.75 prohibits FFP for costsof self-initiated education or training, as provided at andSection; 250.48(a).We define educational costs to include tuition, books, fees, room and board;they include items which are directly connected to educational activitiesand traditionally funded as educational assistance. Thus, these educationalcosts are distinguishable from such adjunct items as transportation, whichare matchable as supportive services.  Non-Interference  The regulations state that, consistent with the Act, the State IV-A agencymust not permit other JOBS activities to interfere with approved self-initiatededucation or training. However, a State may require an individual to acceptemployment if the State IV-A agency has notified her at the time it firstapproves the self-initiated education or training that it may periodicallyreview the approval and make such a change.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked that a bona fide job offer not be consideredto be an activity that interferes with education or training, so that theState could require the individual to accept the job.   <T3>Response: </T3>While the Act and implementing regulations prohibitinterference by other JOBS activities with a self-initiated education ortraining, they do not prohibit the State IV-A agency from reviewing andrevising the individual's employability plan based on changed circumstances,such as an improved job market. In addition, only interference by otherJOBS program activities is precluded. Employment, other than through thework supplementation or OJT programs, is not a JOBS program activity. Thus,States could require the individual to accept a job.   In so doing, the State should consider such factors as whether the jobhas the potential for leading to long-term self-sufficiency and whetherthe individual will be left with an educational loan to repay that willimpact upon her economic status. The regulations have been revised to clarifythat, at the time of preparation of the initial employability plan, theState IV-A agency must make certain that the JOBS participant is awarethat her plan is subject to this kind of review and revision.  Other Education or Training Pursuant to andSection; 250.48(b)  We have renumbered andSection; 250.48 to clearly acknowledge that there willbe AFDC applicants and recipients who will be enrolled in self-initiatedactivity that does not meet the requirements of section 402(a)(19)(F) ofthe Act. For example, the individual might not be attending at least half-timeor the institution might not be covered by section 402(a)(19)(F) of theAct. Section 250.48(a) now refers to education or training that meets therequirements of section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act, and andSection; 250.48(b)refers to any other self-initiated activity that does not.   The State may approve other education or training pursuant to andSection;250.48(b) as a JOBS activity according to the regulations and State criteriaapplicable to similar JOBS component activities covered under andSection;andSection;250.44 through 250.47. The State must perform an assessment and developan employability plan pursuant to andSection; 250.41, as an individual isconsidered a JOBS participant if the State approves the activity. The costsof child care and of other supportive services for participants in approvedother education or training pursuant to andSection; 250.48(b) are eligiblefor Federal reimbursement pursuant to andSection; 255.4.   Because other education or training pursuant to andSection; 250.48(b) doesnot meet the requirements of section 402(a)(19)(F) of the Act, participantsin such approved  activities are not subject to the statutory provisionsof that section. This means that such participants are not subject to theprinciple regarding non-interference with the self-initiated educationor training that is contained in section 402(a)(19)(F)(iii) of the Act.However, it also means that the State may pay for other education or trainingpursuant to andSection; 250.48(b), so long as the State approves the activityin accordance with the regulations and criteria that govern JOBS activitiesand observes the restrictions regarding non-supplantation and servicesotherwise available on a non-reimbursable basis.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked if a person in self-initiated activityis considered to be in a JOBS component and also if such a person couldbe considered to be in a target population when the criteria are met. <T3>Response: </T3>If the individual is participating in self-initiatededucation or training approved by the State IV-A agency, pursuant to andSection;250.48(a), she is considered to be in a JOBS component and in a targetpopulation if the criteria were met. Likewise an individual in approvedother education or training pursuant to andSection; 250.48(b) would be consideredto be in a JOBS component and in a target population if the criteria weremet. However, an individual in education or training in non-JOBS areasof the State is not a JOBS participant as there is no JOBS program (andtitle IV-F funds may not be expended on such education or training). Expendituresfor supportive services for that individual, if she is in a target population,can be included in the calculation of whether 55 percent of the State'sexpenditures was spent on the target populations.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart G_Optional Components of State Jobs Programs </ITAG>Job Search Program (andSection; 250.60 of the Final Regulations)  Section 482(g) of the Act provides for group and individual job searchas an optional component under JOBS.  Although we describe all mandatoryand optional components in separate sections, we recognize that it willbe appropriate for States to combine them for certain clients. Job searchis an excellent example. While job search by itself is an appropriate activityfor the job ready who have basic workplace skills, job search for thosewho are skills deficient should be coupled with other education and trainingactivities.  The Act generally retains the provisions of the current law at section402(a)(35) of the Act with some modifications. The first change is thatCongress expressed its intent that job search be ``intensive''. We interpretthis to mean that, in order to qualify as an optional component in whichparticipation counts for the purposes of calculating participation ratespursuant to andSection; 250.74, a job search program must be well-structuredand include specific activities to be undertaken by the participant orthe agency on behalf of the participant. Such activities must be describedin the State JOBS plan.  Current law provides that a State IV-A agency may require an initial periodof up to 8 consecutive weeks of job search which may begin at the timeof application for aid. Some States have used this initial period to doa preliminary screening of the individual's employability prior to assessmentand development of the employability plan. The Act amends this provisionto provide that the State IV-A agency may not require an individual toparticipate in job search for longer than 3 weeks without performing anassessment as defined at andSection; 250.41. The 3 weeks of job search priorto assessment count as part of the 16 weeks of job search that are allowableas a JOBS component during the application period and first year. If theemployability plan that the State IV-A agency develops based on the assessmentprovides for an activity that is more appropriate for the individual, thejob search activity must be terminated. The Act also permits an additional 8 weeks of job search in any subsequentperiod of 12 consecutive months.  We are adopting the existing interpretationof ``an additional 8 weeks'' to mean 8 weeks or its equivalent. For example,an equivalent would be one week a month for 8 months or one day a weekfor 40 weeks. Based on a comment, we are clarifying that after the additional8-week period (or its equivalent) job search cannot be treated as a JOBScomponent for purposes of ``participation''.  The Act also provides that a State IV-A agency may require additional jobsearch after the close of the 8-week period only as part of some othereducation, training or employment component which is designed to enhancethe individual's employment prospects. For example, if a State IV-A agencyrequires an 8-week period of job search for a recipient and then assignsthe individual to skills training, it is permissible to require her toengage in job search at the end of the training as part of the training. Participation in job search as an activity under the program is not allowablefor FFP or participation rates under the JOBS program if an individualhas participated in job search for more than 4 months out of the 12 precedingmonths. We interpret ``4 months'' to be 4 months or its equivalent. Forexample, job search for one week a month for 8 months (after an initial8 weeks of participation in a job search component) would be allowable. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter recommended that a stronger emphasis beplaced on job search activities, and suggested that the full-time ``job''of every AFDC client should be looking for work. States should be encouragedto place all clients in job search upon completion of any other JOBS componentif no employment has been obtained. Another commenter, however, proposedthat only those individuals who have prior relevant work experience andusable job skills be assigned to job search. By assigning the ``non-job-ready''to job search, job search becomes a ``make-work'' activity which does notpromote self-sufficiency. Another commenter recommended that States beallowed greater flexibility in assigning participants to job search despitethe time limitations imposed by the regulations.   <T3>Response: </T3>We agree that non-exempt AFDC applicants and recipientsshould be looking for work. However, we also agree that it is importantfor each State to have flexibility in designing its JOBS program to meetthe specific needs of its clients and utilize those components that, inits judgment, will effectively promote self-sufficiency. Through JOBS,the client can be assisted to prepare for the occupation defined in heremployability plan by participating in a range of components. The timelimits contained in the regulations are taken directly from section 482(g)of the Act.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter felt the proposed regulations on how andwhen clients were to participate in job search were too complex. Trackingthe participation of the clients in job search would be too complicatedand would hamper the State's ability to contract and coordinate with otheragencies. They suggested a simpler definition: States should receive FFPfor up to 16 weeks of job search activity per participant. Another commentersupported the idea that 16 weeks of job search be allowed not only forthe applicant during the first year but also for recipients in each periodof 12 months.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(g) of the Act is very explicit as to theparticipation requirements of the job search program.  Moreover, therewere few changes made to the existing job search regulations from the previouslaw. States have the flexibility to define ``eight weeks of participation''for the recipient which could lead to less intense job search over a longerperiod of time. Also, additional job search beyond the 16 weeks initialperiod (first year) or 8-week period (later years) can be required if combinedwith other activities.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked whether if a family becomesineligible for AFDC and reapplies the 16-week participation requirement(8 weeks of job search as an applicant and 8 weeks as a recipient) beginsagain.   <T3>Response: </T3>Upon the filing of a new application, the potentialJOBS participant is eligible for a ``new'' 16-week job search requirementif assigned to that component.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters noted that andSection; 250.60(a) (1)and  (2) include the provision of counseling and training. One commenterasked if these activities were required to be included under job search.Another commenter was concerned that the term ``training'' be clarifiedto mean job-seeking skills training_not occupational or academic training.  <T3>Response: </T3>The description of ``individual job search'' has beenclarified to say ``job-seeking skills training'' rather than simply ``training.''Although not mandated by the Act, counseling and training activities relatedto developing job-seeking skills, resume writing, and interviewing techniquesare a major part of assisting the client as she conducts a job search.It is expected, but not required, that the State would provide these typesof activities for job search participants.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters indicated that the regulations leaveunclear the relationship between the requirement of an assessment afterthree weeks, and the State's option to require up to eight weeks of jobsearch at the time of application. They further state that the regulationsdo not mandate any action by the State based on the results of the assessment.They suggest that the job search should only continue after assessmentif it is determined appropriate during the assessment.  <T3>Response: </T3>If the employability plan developed as a result of theassessment determines that another activity is more appropriate, the jobsearch should be discontinued.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked that the option be given to stretch thesecond eight week period of job search (after the initial applicant periodof 8 weeks) over an extended period of time.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(g) of the Act is clear that the second periodof job search cannot exceed a total of 8 weeks in any period of 12 consecutivemonths. We continue the same interpretation of ``an additional 8 weeks'',as under prior regulations, to mean 8 weeks or its full-time equivalent.After that 8-week (or its equivalent) period, job search cannot count as``participation''.<T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked for clarification on the limitsimposed on job search participation and the additional job search thatis permissible.   <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(g)(2) of the Act limits participation injob search by an applicant to up to eight consecutive weeks from the timeshe files an application for AFDC. Following this initial period, an additionaleight weeks (or its equivalent) of participation may be required in anyperiod of 12 consecutive months. Once this period of job search has beencompleted, additional job search activities may be mandated only if performedas part of an educational, training, or employment component.  These jobsearch activities must be identified as activities of the component. Forexample, the client might be required to conduct an intensive job searchfollowing the completion of a skills training class, or to participatein a one day per week resume writing class while attending an eight-weekbusiness course. For participation purposes, the education, training, oremployment component is considered the JOBS activity. For FFP purposesany expenditures directly related to the completion of the approved JOBSactivity are allowable subject to the limitations at andSection;andSection;250.73, 250.75, and 250.77. Therefore, FFP is available for the administrativeand supportive service costs of the job search-related portion of the approvedJOBS component.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked for clarification of the date on whichthe initial eight weeks of job search begins for an applicant. The Staterecommended that the regulations specify that the eight weeks begin whenthe applicant is first assigned to, or becomes a participant in, the jobsearch component.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(g)(2)(A) of the Act clearly states thatthe initial eight week period of job search begins on the date the individualapplies for AFDC.On-The-Job Training (andSection;  250.61 of the Final Regulations)  Section 482(d)(1)(A)(ii)(II) of the Act provides for on-the-job training(OJT) as one of the four optional components in JOBS. Section 250.61 containsthe regulations for OJT.  Our definition of OJT is based on the definition contained in WIN regulationsat andSection; 224.42(a) and information provided by the Department of Labor.JTPA regulations do not define OJT, although it is an allowable activity. There are a few basic principles that govern OJT. The participant is hiredfirst by the employer. While engaged in productive work, she is providedtraining which gives her the knowledge or skills essential to the fulland adequate performance of that job. She is compensated at a rate (includingbenefits) comparable to that of other employees performing the same orsimilar jobs, and the employer is reimbursed by the State IV-A agency orits agent for the extraordinary training and the additional supervisionthat is required. At the end of the OJT, the participant is retained asa regular employee.  In order to assure that OJT assignments offered through JOBS result inan increase in participants' skills and competencies, and that progresscan be monitored by the State IV-A agency, we are requiring that qualitativemeasures for progress be developed for all OJT assignments that are includedunder JOBS. This is discussed in more detail in the definition of makinggood or satisfactory progress in a training component in andSection; 250.1. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters expressed concern that the regulationsdid not prevent or discourage employers from recycling JOBS participants,i.e. using a participant until the OJT subsidy runs out and then dischargingthat participant and obtaining another.  <T3>Response: </T3>It is not our intention to allow employers to recycleJOBS participants in OJT slots. Upon satisfactory completion of the OJT,the employer is expected to retain the employee. When a State developsOJT contracts with employers, provisions for retaining the OJT participantupon satisfactory completion of the OJT should be included.  Rate of Reimbursement  The rate of reimbursement to employers will be limited to no more thanan average of 50 percent of the wages paid by the employer to the participantduring the period of the OJT. The operational experience of the six federally-fundedgrant diversion demonstration projects in which subsidy levels ranged from25 percent to 83 percent did not suggest that higher rates significantlyincreased job opportunities. Furthermore this limitation is consistentwith JTPA policy. We believe that by adopting this comparable policy, weavoid fostering competition among programs as to the reimbursement levelsthey provide.  Section 250.61(b) contains this provision.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that to eliminate windfall profitsfor employers, the reimbursement should be limited to a flat 50 percent,rather than the average of 50 percent of the wages paid to the JOBS participantduring the OJT.  <T3>Response: </T3>An average of 50 percent was chosen to be consistentwith JTPA policy. This policy affords States flexibility to vary in settingreimbursement rates for the length of the contract for a particular individual.  Duration of OJT  We have decided against limiting the length of time an individual can spendin OJT because we believe that a State should have the flexibility to designthe program that both meets the needs of the State and the individualsit plans to serve, especially if it uses OJT for target populations.  Whilewe permit State flexibility, we strongly recommend that the State IV-Aagency take into account the guidance that is available, such as the Dictionaryof Occupational Titles, in determining the appropriate length of trainingand that the State IV-A agency assure that training is only for as longas is reasonable to learn the necessary skills.  Eligibility for Services during Participation Wages from OJT are considered to be earned income for any purpose of thelaw, which is consistent with current AFDC policy. A person who loses eligibilityfor AFDC because of earned income in accordance with andSection; 233.20 orbecause of the application of the 100-hour rule in the case of the principalearner in an unemployed parent case will continue to be considered a participantin JOBS for the duration of the OJT. This will allow the agency to makepayments to the employer through the completion of the OJT. This is comparableto the WIN regulations at andSection; 224.42 which provide that a personin an OJT is considered to be a WIN registrant for the duration of theOJT even if she is no longer receiving AFDC. It also means that the participantwill be eligible for the supportive services available to other participantsin JOBS even though she is not receiving an AFDC grant. However, sincethe participant will have earned income, we believe that the State IV-Aagency, in determining the need for supportive services, should treat theparticipant as it would treat an individual who finds unsubsidized employment.  As a participant in JOBS, the individual will be eligible for child careas determined by the State IV-A agency to be necessary for participationfor the duration of the OJT. We have considered how to handle child carewhen the OJT ends in the case of an individual who became ineligible forAFDC during the period of participation in the OJT. The following approachis defined in the regulations. Since the individual was not in receiptof AFDC in the previous month, she is not eligible for the twelve monthsof transitional child care when the OJT ends.  However, if she would havebeen eligible for transitional care at the time that she lost eligibilityfor AFDC due to going into the OJT, she can receive transitional care forthe number of months left in the 12-month eligibility period.For example, an individual who goes into OJT loses eligibility for AFDCin January. The OJT continues until April during which time she receiveschild care as a participant. If she would have been eligible for transitionalchild care under Part 256 in February, she is eligible for the remaining9 months (from May to January). She would, of course, have to meet therequirements of eligibility and would have to contribute to the cost ofthe child care in accordance with the State's sliding fee scale. Alternatively,a State IV-A agency may simply provide child care as transitional childcare from the time the individual becomes ineligible for AFDC due to incomefrom the OJT if she would otherwise qualify. This approach has the advantageof being fairly simple although those individuals who did not meet othereligibility criteria (for example, did not receive AFDC benefits for theminimum 3 of the 6 preceding months) under Part 256 would not be eligiblefor the transitional care. However, these OJT participants could continueto receive child care under Part 255 for the duration of the OJT. We believethat our approach of providing up to 12 months of transitional child careto eligible OJT participants assures that individuals who enter employmentthrough OJT are treated equitably regardless of whether the employmentis unsubsidized or subsidized. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters raised concerns that those clientsparticipating in OJT who become ineligible for AFDC due to earned incomeor the 100-hour rule in the case of an unemployed parent case, will notbe deemed AFDC recipients during participation in OJT for purposes of establishingeligibility for transitional child care and Medicaid extensions. Severalalso suggested that the 12-month extended benefits should not begin untilafter the OJT had ended. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482 of the Act, which provides for OJT, doesnot provide for deeming eligibility for AFDC to a family which has losteligibility for AFDC during the period of the OJT, for purposes of transitionalchild care or extended medical assistance. Furthermore, sections 302 and303 of the Statute describe the eligibility requirements for transitionalchild care and extended medical assistance. Nothing in these sections allowsthose clients participating in OJT to be treated differently from otherJOBS participants. We, therefore, do not believe that the Statute authorizesproviding a full 12 months of transitional child care after the OJT periodends if the participant lost eligibility for AFDC during the period ofthe OJT. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked if under andSection; 250.61(f) a Statemust establish State policy on whether to implement the transitional childcare provisions at the time AFDC eligibility is lost or at the end of theOJT. If the State chooses to treat all child care provided after an individualin an OJT loses eligibility for AFDC as transitional child care, does theindividual who does not meet the minimum eligibility requirements receiveno child care for the remainder of the OJT? The commenter felt the languagein the preamble and the regulations appeared discrepant. <T3>Response: </T3>A State does not need to establish one policy whichit applies to all individuals who lose eligibility for AFDC while participatingin OJTs. A State can determine on a case-by-case basis which child caretreatment will be of most benefit to the client who is no longer AFDC eligible;i.e. whether the child care will be considered as transitional care atthe point eligibility for AFDC is lost during the OJT or at the end ofthe OJT for the remaining months left in the 12-month eligibility period.However, pursuant to Part 255, the State must guarantee child care fora participant during her participation in OJT. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter was concerned that if an OJT participantbecomes ineligible for AFDC while in the OJT, continuation of supportiveservices appeared to be an option for the State. <T3>Response: </T3>The State does not have an option whether to offer continuingsupportive services for an OJT participant who has become ineligible forAFDC. The participant is eligible for supportive services if there is aneed, and we have revised the regulations to reflect this policy. However,as the participant has earnings, the State IV-A agency, in determiningthe need for these supportive services, should treat the participant asit would any individual who finds employment. Eligibility for Medicaid Extensions Eligibility for Medicaid extensions is determined at the time the individualloses eligibility for AFDC. In other words, there is no provision, as thereis under work supplementation, by which an OJT participant who is no longeran AFDC recipient may be eligible for Medicaid based on her status as aparticipant. Differences Between OJT and Work Supplementation Under JOBS, OJT and work supplementation are two of the four programs fromwhich a State must choose its optional components. We carefully consideredthe differences between OJT and work supplementation under the Act. Sincethe Deficit Reduction Act of 1984 broadened the kinds of jobs that couldbe filled under work supplementation to include jobs in the private sector,many State IV-A agencies have used the existing work supplementation programauthority to run what is essentially an OJT program. The diverted grantsare used to pay for a portion of the training and supervision providedto the participant by the employer. There have been many recommendations to make OJT and work supplementationas compatible as possible in our regulations so as to allow States maximumflexibility in program design. We have carefully considered all the argumentsand conclude that OJT and work supplementation must be considered separatecomponents. We have two major reasons for reaching this conclusion. The first is a new provision (section 484(c) of the Act) which specificallybars any participant in a work supplementation component from being assignedto ``fill any established, unfilled position vacancy.'' The same prohibitionhas always existed in CWEP and is carried over to CWEP by the Statute.However, it is a new provision as it applies to work supplementation andlimits the use of the work supplementation component to jobs that did notpreviously exist. A more complete discussion of this provision is containedin the preamble in andSection; 250.62 on work supplementation.  The second reason is that the Act allows the State IV-A agency to applyspecial rules to participants in work supplementation jobs that are notavailable to persons in OJT. The State IV-A agency may reduce or extendearned income disregards as they apply to work supplementation participants(section 482(e)(2)(G) of the Act). The State IV-A agency may exempt worksupplementation participants from retrospective budgeting requirements(section 482(e)(3)(D)). In addition, the State IV-A agency must extendMedicaid coverage to participants in work supplementation who would otherwisebe eligible for AFDC under the State's plan if such State did not havea work supplementation program (section 482(e)(6) of the Act). There isno basis for extending any of these special rules to OJT participants and,if we did not make any distinction, there would be no way to determinewhich rules should apply to a given participant.  Furthermore, there is no compelling reason in OJT to invoke the specialrules which are necessary to divert grants to a wage pool in work supplementation.Since, in OJT, JOBS funds are used for the training provided by the employer,the State IV-A agency, in its planning process, should calculate how manyOJT training opportunities the State will develop and proceed accordingly. For States which are concerned that diverted grants will not provide anadequate wage pool for their work supplementation component, we point outthat they may earmark JOBS program monies at any time to add to the divertedgrant money in the wage pool to ensure that sufficient funds are availablefor subsidy. This money could be unused OJT money, or any other JOBS programmoney.  However, it is not permissible to use diverted AFDC grants in theOJT component.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters noted that the language in the proposedpreamble and regulations contained references to ``subsidies.'' It wasrecommended that the term ``reimbursement'' be used. This distinction clarifiesthat OJT slots are used for training with the employers being reimbursedfor the training and additional supervision.   <T3>Response: </T3>We agree that this distinction is important and changeshave been made in the preamble and regulations where appropriate.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked whether the spouse of the principalearner would be allowed to continue in an OJT or job skills training componentunder JOBS if the principal earner was no longer AFDC eligible.  <T3>Response: </T3>As a JOBS participant, the second parent who is participatingin an OJT or job skills training component under JOBS would be allowedto complete the activity, as provided in andSection; 250.73(e).   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked if an individual can be considered aparticipant in an OJT component if she is in a JTPA placement and no JOBSfunds are being expended.  <T3>Response: </T3>If an individual is placed in a JTPA OJT through a JOBSreferral, it is appropriate to count the client as participating in a JOBSOJT even though no JOBS funds are being expended. With the limitationsset by the JOBS funding cap it is expected that the State IV-A agency willcoordinate with and utilize other agency services and activities to enhanceits JOBS program components. Work Supplementation Program (andSection; 250.62 of the Final Regulations) Section 482(e) of the Act provides for a work supplementation program (WSP)as an optional component under the JOBS program. This component allowsthe State IV-A agency to pay, or ``divert,'' all or part of the AFDC grantto an employer to cover part of the costs of the wages paid to an AFDCrecipient who is participating in the program. The Family Support Act adoptedmost of the existing law. However, there were a few changes made to thework supplementation program by the Statute which are discussed below. Under the prior law, only those individuals who would have been eligiblefor AFDC under a State IV-A plan as it was in effect in May 1981, or asmodified thereafter as required by Federal law, could participate in worksupplementation. The Act does not carry over this provision to the JOBSprogram.   Participation in the work supplementation program was voluntary, i.e.,the AFDC recipient could elect to participate in work supplementation byaccepting an offer of work. However, once the individual entered the program,she became a mandatory participant to insure that the agreements with employerswould be carried out. Under the Act, the State IV-A agency may requirean individual who is not exempt to participate in any appropriate component,including work supplementation. We have clarified that the State may chooseto operate WSP as a voluntary or mandatory program.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters questioned whether it is appropriateto apply the displacement language from CWEP to work supplementation andOJT programs as provided at andSection; 250.62(b)(2). They point out thatparticipation in these slots is an employment situation; thus, the protectionneeded for regular employees at a work experience site does not apply inwork supplementation/OJT situations. In addition, several organizationsand private businesses suggested that JOBS participants should be ableto be placed in established, unfilled positions if the placement does notviolate union agreements or affect union organizing, existing collectivebargaining agreements, or other employer/employee policies.  <T3>Response: </T3>The provision at andSection; 250.62(b)(2) prohibitingplacement in established, unfilled position vacancies applies to work supplementationpositions. It does not apply to OJTs under andSection; 250.61. However, webelieve that section 484(c) of the Act is clear in applying the prohibitionto both work supplementation and CWEP.  The argument that the last two sentences of section 484(c) of the Act canbe read together to allow CWEP and work supplementation placements in established,unfilled vacancies if the placements do not assist, promote, or deter unionorganizing is not persuasive. The first sentence refers to ``[f]unds availableto carry out the program under this part'' not being used to assist, promote,or deter union organizing; it is not limited to funds for CWEP and worksupplementation positions.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked that ``employee status'' be defined.Is it limited to providing such things as insurance coverage, workmen'scompensation, leave and other benefits, or, since wages are consideredearned income, should Federal, State and FICA withholdings be deducted? <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(e)(5)(B) of the Act requires wages to beconsidered as earned income for any provision of law.  This includes Federaland State withholding for income tax, FICA withholding, advance EarnedIncome Tax Credit if requested, etc. Employee status confers the benefitsavailable to regular employees of that employer. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter was concerned that a WSP participant isnot deemed an employee for 13 weeks. The commenter stated that this lackof employment status would negatively affect an individual's entitlementto unemployment compensation, workers' compensation and health benefits.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(e)(5)(A) of the Act allows a State the optionof not considering a WSP participant an employee during the first 13 weeksof participation. Any employer who wishes to treat her as an employee duringthat period may do so.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked if FFP would be paid for any periodpast the nine-month limitation on participation if the agency establisheda longer period of participation.  <T3>Response: </T3>No, we are limited by the provisions of section 482(e)(4)of the Act.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked that the OJT provisions for the samepay and benefits as similarly situated workers be made applicable to WSPalso.   <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(e)(5)(A) is clear that the State has theoption of not considering a WSP participant an employee  during the first13 weeks of employment. If the State chooses not to grant ``employee status,''the provisions for the same pay and benefits as similarly situated employeesor trainees cannot be applied.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked that States be given the option ofsetting up WSP as either a mandatory or voluntary program.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 482(e)(3)(A) of the Act gives the State authorityto implement either a mandatory or voluntary program. We have specifiedthis in the regulations at andSection; 250.62(c)(2).  Retrospective Budgeting/Monthly Reporting  The Deficit Reduction Act of 1984 and interim final rules at andSection;233.36, published September 10, 1984, provide that the State IV-A agencymust require monthly reports from those assistance units with earned incomeor recent work histories. Additionally, andSection; 233.31(a) provides thatall assistance units required to file monthly reports must have the amountsof their assistance payments determined retrospectively. Because work supplementationprogram participants have earned income, they have been subject to monthlyreporting and retrospective budgeting rules. The  State, however, had theoption to request waivers to exempt such participants from these two requirements. The regulations at andSection; 250.62(g) permit the State IV-A agency toexempt individuals who are participating in work supplementation from retrospectivebudgeting requirements and to determine their monthly payments prospectively. This means the amount of assistance payable to the participant's familyfor any month will be based on the income and other relevant circumstancesin that month.  While the legislation does not specifically address the monthly reportingissue, we have decided to permit State IV-A agencies to exempt participantsin supplemented jobs from monthly reporting without seeking a waiver. Thispolicy is consistent with past practice. Furthermore, exemption from monthlyreporting will allow the State to have one policy for all recipients whosepayments are computed prospectively.   Calculating the Diverted Grant  The regulations at andSection; 250.62(f) allows the State IV-A agency to``freeze'' a participant's AFDC grant as an alternative to monthly recomputation.Under this procedure, upon taking a supplemented job, the  participant'sAFDC grant is recalculated considering her earnings from the job and anyother sources. If her earnings and other income reduce her grant to zero,the entire amount of the former grant is ``diverted'' to a wage pool fromwhich the employer is paid. If the earnings and other income do not causethe complete loss of the grant, she receives a ``residual'' payment. Thedifference between the former grant and the residual payment is divertedto a wage pool.   A wage pool is a mechanism which allows a State to pool (divert) AFDC grantsnot paid to the WSP participant and pay employers an amount for each WSPparticipant. From the Federal perspective, the pool is an account or listingfor accumulating and tracking the diverted amounts so that FFP can be claimedwhen payments are made to employers.  The following example illustrates: The potential participant is a parentin a regular AFDC case receiving a monthly grant of $450 with no otherunearned income. A full-time supplemented job is found which would pay$720 per month. The individual is currently eligible for the $30 and \1/3\and standard earned income disregards, and she has no other income. Childcare is being provided at no cost, and no changes are foreseen in the family'sneeds, income, or resources.<ITAG tagnum="16">Countable Income=$720^$90 (work expense  after 10/1/89)^$30=$600;$600^(\1/3\ of $600)=$400  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">Residual Payment=$450 (AFDC grant)^$400 (countable income)=$50  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">Diverted Grant=$450 (AFDC grant)^$50 (residual payment)=$400</ITAG>If a State elects to ``freeze'' a participant's residual payment, the StateIV-A agency must determine at the time of placement what payment amount,if any, the participant will be eligible for while participating in a supplementedjob, given the hours of work, wages and other circumstances. Once thisinitial payment is determined, the amount is ``frozen,'' and the participant,if otherwise eligible, receives the same amount (residual payment) foreach month of participation regardless of changes which occur during theparticipation. If a participant becomes  otherwise ineligible for AFDCbenefits, she can continue to participate in WSP, and the State can continueto receive FFP for payments to an employer on her behalf.  Although the basic concept of ``frozen'' grants is attractive, States maybe concerned about their ability to make adjustments in certain limitedcircumstances (for example, when the household size changes). Therefore,the State IV-A agency is permitted to make limited adjustments to a participant'sresidual payment within a ``frozen'' grant policy. Under such a ``partial''freeze, for example, one State might make adjustments only in cases wherethe State's need or payment standards change. Another State might makeadjustments not only under those circumstances, but also where the familysize changes. If a State chooses a partially frozen grant policy, it mustbe consistently applied. That is, if a State IV-A agency provides adjustmentsfor factors which would increase the payment amount, it must also makedownward adjustments if changes  in those same factors would cause a decreasein payment amounts.  The use of the terms ``frozen'' and ``partially frozen'' grants is notnew. This policy is retained from the previous work supplementation programbecause States feel that freezing grants eases administration of the program. It is also consistent with andSection; 250.62(b)(2) which gives the StateIV-A agency broad discretion in establishing the terms and conditions underwhich jobs, payments, wages, and the conditions of participation are defined.  If a participant becomes ineligible for AFDC for any reason other thanearnings from the supplemented job, the individual does not receive a residualpayment. However, she may continue in the supplemented job. The amountof the residual payment is diverted to the wage pool. For example, if afamily becomes ineligible because of the receipt of a lump sum payment,the family would no longer receive a residual payment, but participationin the supplemented job could continue.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked what FFP would be paid for JOBS fundssupplementing the wage pool.  <T3>Response: </T3>No FFP is available for any funds supplementing thewage pool until the funds are used to pay the employer.  Section 482(e)(3)(A)of the Act states the payments to individuals or employers under WSP, i.e.,the AFDC grant funds that are being transferred to the wage pool and subsequentlypaid to an employer, shall be treated as IV-A expenditures. However, ifJOBS funds are used to supplement the wage pool, FFP would be paid at theFMAP or 60% rate, whichever is higher, when expended, as a program costhas been incurred. The State IV-A agency must be able to segregate andtrack these program costs in order to claim the higher match.<T3>Comment: </T3>Although noted in the preamble, one State recommendedthat the final regulations should specify that JOBS program funds may beadded to the wage pool to subsidize wages of the participants. In addition,the regulations should specify that title IV-F funds used for this purposeare to be treated as an administrative cost of the work supplementationprogram.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have chosen not to add this language to the finalregulations as the preamble often provides discussion of operational issuesthat do not necessitate regulation. Title IV-F funds used to supplementa wage pool and paid to an employer, are considered a program cost andwould receive the higher JOBS match rate.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked how an AFDC grant would be computedfor a client who is simultaneously participating in WSP and in OJT andhow the budgeting would be done if two members of the same household wereboth participating in one or both of these components.  <T3>Response: </T3>As pointed out in the discussion of OJT, there are importantdistinctions between OJT and WSP. No one is allowed to be in both componentsat the same time. There is no difference in budgeting from any other casewith earned income by one or more family members.  Wage Pool Sampling  Section 482(e)(2)(F) of the Act allows the State to use a sampling methodologyto determine the amount of money available for the wage pool. By selectinga sample of work supplementation cases to determine available monies forthe wage pool, the State IV-A agency will not need to track all grantsdiverted on an individual basis. Reconciliation of the wage pool for eachparticipant served is eliminated. Reconciliation is still required basedon the results of the sample.  The State IV-A agency will need to develop a method to select an unbiasedsample of work supplementation cases of sufficient size to produce statisticallyvalid results when applying this method across the universe of work supplementationparticipants. The method used by the State IV-A agency must be describedin its JOBS plan.  Medicaid Eligibility  Currently, a State has the option to provide Medicaid to the participantand her family if they are otherwise eligible. Section 482(e)(6) of theAct requires that the State provide Medicaid coverage to the participantand family members who would be eligible for AFDC under a State's planif such plan did not have a work supplementation program. The Health CareFinancing Administration (HCFA) is responsible for issuing regulationsto implement this section of the Statute.  Child Care Eligibility  In andSection; 250.62(h) we allow the State IV-A agency to provide childcare to work supplementation participants according to the same policythat we apply to OJT participants. A more complete explanation of thispolicy is contained in the preamble to andSection; 250.61 on OJT.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State commented that except for andSection; 250.62(h)concerning transitional child care for WSP participants, the proposed regulationswere silent on supportive services for WSP participants. It was recommendedthat the final regulations specify that WSP participants shall be eligiblefor those supportive services that are available to other JOBS participants. <T3>Response: </T3>A WSP participant is eligible for supportive servicesas a participant in JOBS. However, as was discussed in the preamble toOJT, since the participant is working, she should be treated as any individualwho finds employment. We have chosen not to address supportive servicesin each section on the mandatory and optional components as an individualwho is participating in an approved JOBS component is considered a JOBSparticipant and eligible for all supportive services provided under theState's Supportive Services plan. Community Work Experience Program (andSection; 250.63 of the Final Regulations) Section 482(f) of the Act provides for a community work experience program(CWEP). The new program generally retains the provisions in the prior law,with modification.  The Act allows for training along with actual experienceas ways to improve the employability of participants. We interpret thisto mean that a State IV-A agency can include an element of training ina work experience position.  Under prior law, the maximum number of hours in any month that a participantmay be required to work is that number which equals the amount of financialassistance payable to the assistance unit divided by the greater of theFederal or the applicable State minimum wage. The Statute modifies thiscalculation to clarify that the State IV-A agency must deduct any childsupport collected (except the $50 pass-through) in making the calculationof maximum hours.  Reassessment  Section 482(f)(2) of the Act provides that after 6 months of an individual'sparticipation in CWEP and at the conclusion of each work and/or trainingassignment, the State IV-A agency must provide a reassessment and revision,as appropriate, of the individual's employability plan.  Section 482(f)(1)(B)(ii) of the Act provides that after an individual isassigned to CWEP for 9 months, she may not be required to continue in theassignment unless the maximum number of hours of participation is no greaterthan the amount of the assistance payment (excluding child support collectedbut not the $50 pass-through) divided by the highest of: (a) the Federalminimum wage; (b) the applicable State minimum wage; or (c) the rate ofpay of individuals employed in the same or similar occupations by the sameemployer at the same site.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that minimum standards be includedin the regulations for the six-month reassessment process. The commenterproposed that in addition to requiring a face-to-face interview, a reviewwould be conducted of the specific skills acquired during the past sixmonths, and a determination made indicating whether extending CWEP participationwould lead directly to employment or acquiring additional skills neededfor employment.   <T3>Response: </T3>It is expected that the State will use the six-monthreassessment as a tool to determine the viability of the CWEP placementand the need for additional skill development for the participant. However,we believe that, as with the initial assessment, the State should havethe flexibility to develop the method by which CWEP participants will bereassessed.Excluding Child Support Collections  The provision requiring a State IV-A agency to exclude the amount of aidfor which it is reimbursed by a child support collection from the calculationof the maximum hours an individual must participate is new, although severalStates have done so under past law. After considering several methods bywhich child support collections could be used to calculate CWEP hours excludingthe child support collection, we have decided to allow each State to developits own approach. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters were concerned about the exclusionof the $50 pass-through from being treated as a child support collectionin calculating the maximum hours for CWEP participation. They believedthat section 482(f)(1)(B) of the Act says that any portion of the AFDCbenefit for which the State is reimbursed by a child support payment shallbe excluded from the CWEP calculation. If an absent parent pays $300 inchild support, the State has been reimbursed $300, even though in a separatetransaction, the State passes through $50 of that amount to the family.<T3>Response: </T3>Although the full amount of the child support collectedfrom the absent parent is credited towards his child support obligation,the State does not retain all of the collected amount to reimburse theAFDC benefit; i.e. $50 is distributed to the AFDC household. In the examplecited in the ``Comment,'' the absent parent is credited for having methis $300 monthly child support obligation. However, in the distributionof the collection, $250 of the $300 is retained by the State and is considereda reimbursement for the AFDC benefit. The remaining $50 is not considereda reimbursement to the State as it is not retained by the State; it is``passed-through'' to the AFDC family. Therefore, the $50 is deducted fromthe actual child support collected for purposes of calculating the maximumCWEP hours. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters made suggestions on procedures fortreatment of child support in the calculation of the CWEP hours. Thesesuggestions focused on how to calculate the CWEP hours if the child supportreimbursement is not received in the month for which the calculation ofthe CWEP hours is being made. One commenter suggested that when a caseis subject to retrospective budgeting, the income and child support fromthe budget month should be used to establish the maximum hours of obligationfor the payment month. If a case is subject to prospective budgeting, theState and family's best estimate of income and child support for the monthshould be used to establish the maximum hours of obligation. One Stateproposed that the amount of the court order be used in the monthly calculationto ease administrative burden. <T3>Response: </T3>As several logical options were received on this subject,we have decided to allow the State IV-A agency to establish its own proceduresto implement this provision. Other Work Experience Programs The Act allows a State to have other work experience programs. A Statemay offer such programs if they are described in the State JOBS plan andapproved by the Secretary. An alternative work experience program couldbe modeled after the WIN work experience program in which a participantis assigned to a full-time, temporary position for a limited number ofweeks. Such a program gives the participant the experience of working full-timeand learning what the demands of full-time employment are, both on thejob and at home. Alternative work experience programs offer States theopportunity to be more creative and may be less burdensome administratively.Any alternative work program is subject to the FFP limitations at andSection;250.63(j) and the general program standards contained in section 484 ofthe Act. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters questioned whether States should bepermitted to combine AFDC and Food Stamp benefits when determining themaximum hours of the CWEP obligation for purposes of participating in JOBS.<T3>Response: </T3>Upon further examination of this issue, we have decidedto remove andSection; 250.63(d)(2) which allowed States to include the valueof Food Stamp benefits in computing the maximum number of hours that aFood Stamp recipient, who participates in a CWEP program under JOBS, isrequired to participate. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter noted that section 482(f)(1)(A) of theAct provides that ``[t]o the extent possible, the prior training, experience,and skills of a recipient <T3>shall </T3>be used in making appropriate work experience assignments''(emphasis added). The comparable regulations at andSection; 250.63(f) says:``To the extent possible, a State IV-A agency <T3>should</T3> take into account * * *'' (emphasis added). The commentersuggested that the regulations reflect the Act as the term ``shall'' inlegal construction is sometimes viewed as a stronger direction than ``should.''<T3>Response: </T3>We agree. The appropriate change in the regulationshas been made. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State commented that since its inception CWEP hasbeen portrayed as a training program intended to facilitate employment.However, the general perception of this program has been one of work inreturn for assistance as the hours of participation have been based ona wage standard. The State suggests that this perception is strengthenedby the new regulations which provide that a participant's hours shall bebased on the prevailing wage rate for that position if she is assignedto a work site for more than nine months. Therefore, the State believesthat, in cases where an AFDC overpayment exists, States should be requiredto reduce the amount of the overpayment by calculating the value of thework performed by the CWEP participant using the formula of the hours workedtimes the applicable wage rate, instead of recouping the overpayment. <T3>Response: </T3>Neither section 402(a)(22) of the Act nor andSection;233.20(a)(13) of the regulations permit recovery of overpayments by allowinga State to count hours of participation performed by an AFDC recipientin a CWEP site to reduce/recoup the overpayment. No additional languagewas added by the Statute allowing this method to recover overpayments.<T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters questioned how the CWEP differed frompublic service employment. <T3>Response: </T3>The difference between CWEP and public service employmentis that the participant is paid a wage in public service employment. Amore complete discussion of public service employment is contained in thepreamble and regulations at andSection; 250.47.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart H_Funding  </ITAG>JOBS Allocation Entitlement (andSection; 250.70 of the Final Regulations) Federal funding for JOBS is provided as a capped entitlement. The regulationsat andSection; 250.70(b) implement the formula provided under section 403(k)(1)of the Act for determining the amount of Federal financial participationthat is available to match expenditures by each State with an approvedJOBS plan. The amount established by the formula is the limit of Federalreimbursement for a State for a particular fiscal year. If a State is unableto claim up to its limit because the State did not make sufficient expenditures,funds not obligated by the end of the fiscal year cannot be carried over,as provided in the regulations at andSection; 250.70(c).   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several States said that there is no language in theFamily Support Act that prohibits a State from carrying over unobligatedfunds for use in the next fiscal year.  <T3>Response: </T3>We assume by the nature of the comment that these Statesbelieve that they should have available for use in a subsequent year fundsthat they did not obligate in the current year, in addition to the allocationprovided for the subsequent year. However, the language at section 403(k)(1)of the Act provides that a State ``shall be entitled to payments * * *of expenditures to carry out the program under part F'' and that ``suchpayments for any fiscal year in the case of any State may not exceed thelimitation determined under paragraph (2) with respect to the State.''Therefore, the Act establishes a limit not on JOBS funding for each State,but on the amount of the reimbursement that the State is ``entitled'' tofor each year's JOBS expenditures. FFP is available for matching allowablecosts paid for by the State. There is, therefore, no entitlement to fundingif the State does not incur the costs.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State recommended that funds unobligated by Statesbe redistributed to other States for use in the JOBS program.  <T3>Response: </T3>The Family Support Act prescribes the formula for determiningeach State's limit of Federal reimbursement for JOBS. Any redistributionto another State would increase that State's limit for the fiscal yearabove the statutorily established limit and would, therefore, be impermissible.  Liquidation of Obligations  States will be required to liquidate all obligations incurred during afiscal year within one year after the end of that fiscal year. The liquidationperiod for grant programs subject to the regulations at Part 92 is normally90 days (andSection; 92.23(b)). However, we are permitting one year for liquidationin the regulations at andSection; 250.70(d) for the JOBS program becausewe recognize that a State may need more flexibility in administering theJOBS program as many services are likely to be provided under contract.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State strongly supported the regulations providingfor a one year period to liquidate obligations.  Another State maintainedthat a one year liquidation period was too short and recommended that thetime period be in quarters following the final delivery of the service,i.e., within eight quarters after the completion of a course of study.Another State suggested that the JOBS program be treated like other entitlementprograms under the Social Security Act and recommended that States be subjectto the two year limit for the filing of claims in accordance with the regulationsat Part 95 Subpart A.  <T3>Response: </T3>The recommendation of the second State would provideno defined period by which the Federal government would know the extentof outlays attributable to the JOBS program because such a method assignsa liquidation period according to the particular JOBS service or activity.  The suggestion of the third commenter cannot be adopted because the JOBSprogram cannot be treated in the same manner as the AFDC program. The FamilySupport Act, as explained previously, establishes an annual limit on JOBSfunds. Funding for programs which are open-ended, such as the AFDC program,are not bound by yearly limits.  The timely filing requirements for claiming expenditures in the regulationsat Part 95, Subpart A continue to apply to the JOBS program because theliquidation requirement is separate from the claiming requirement. Forexample, if a State obligates a document on September 30, 1989, and liquidatesthe obligation, i.e., makes the expenditures for this obligation, on September30, 1990, then the State has until September 30, 1992 to claim the expenditures. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State was concerned that the establishment of a oneyear liquidation period would require the State to audit contracts withservice providers within one year of the closure of the contract and thatsuch a requirement may be in conflict with State law.  <T3>Response: </T3>The liquidation period does not require a State to auditcontracts within this one year period. The only auditing requirements thata State operating a JOBS program must meet are the auditing requirementsof the Single Audit Act of 1984 as provided in the regulations at andSection;92.26.  However, this does not mean that the State is not responsible,outside of the auditing process, for monitoring the activities, services,and expenditures conducted under contracts. The State must maintain ongoingmonitoring of contracted activities, services, and expenditures. Allotment of JOBS Limit of Entitlement (andSection; 250.71 of the Final Regulations) All States are required to have a JOBS program effective October 1, 1990.However, States may begin operating a JOBS program before that date. FifteenStates began implementation of their programs on July 1, 1989.  A State's JOBS limit of funding is proportional to the number of quartersthat the program is in operation in the State in a given fiscal year asdescribed in the regulations at andSection; 250.71(a).   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State suggested that States that implemented theJOBS program on July 1 should have been allocated their annual share ofthe JOBS funding limit, rather than just a quarterly share of that limit.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 204(b)(1)(B) of the Statute provides that fora State that implements the JOBS program prior to October 1, 1990, itsJOBS funding limit for the fiscal year will be divided by 4 and multipliedby the number of quarters the program is in operation in the fiscal year. Therefore, under the formula in the Statute, States that began July 1receive one quarter's limit. <T3>Comment: </T3>This same State recommended that States receive an annualgrant award for the JOBS program instead of quarterly grant awards.  <T3>Response: </T3>An annual grant award pilot test program was initiatedseveral years ago as a result of the efforts of the Joint State/FederalCash Management Reform Task Force.  The pilot applies to seven States andfour of the Department's public assistance programs, such as the AFDC andMedicaid programs. Section 608(e) of the Statute extended this pilot testprogram through December 31, 1989.  The test program is to operate on thesame terms and conditions that existed as of September 30, 1988. Thus,its application has not been expanded beyond the original seven Statesand four programs. At this time it is the general practice in the AFDCprogram to issue quarterly awards. Because we have decided that the JOBSprogram should be operated similarly to the AFDC program, with certainexceptions, we believe that quarterly grant awards should be issued forthe JOBS program as well.   Allotments to the Territories  The JOBS limit of funding for Puerto Rico, Guam, the Virgin Islands, andAmerican Samoa is not subject to the funding restrictions at section 1108of the Social Security Act (see the regulations at andSection; 250.71(c)(1)).For these jurisdictions, the costs related to the provision of child careunder Part 255 are subject to the JOBS limit of entitlement. This includesthe costs of child care services and related administrative costs (seethe regulations at andSection; 250.71(c)(2)). The costs related to the provisionof transitional child care services under Part 256, including the costof the services and the related administrative costs, are eligible forFFP under section 1108 of the Act (see the regulations at andSection; 250.71(c)(3)). Funds Available to Indian Tribes and Alaska Native Organizations  The JOBS program provides direct funding to Indian Tribes and Alaska Nativeorganizations. The Federal funds available to Tribes and Alaska Nativeorganizations constitute a reduction to the allotment of the State in whichthe Tribe or organization is located. Regulations at andSection; 250.71(b)(1)describe how the reduction is determined.  The regulations at andSection;250.90 provide the specific requirements for Indian Tribe and Alaska Nativeorganization participation in the JOBS program. Maintenance of Effort (andSection; 250.72 of the Final Regulations)  Section 482(a)(3) of the Act specifies that ``Federal funds made availableto a State for purposes of the program shall not be used to supplant non-Federalfunds for existing services and activities which promote the purpose ofthis part. State or local funds expended for such purpose shall be maintainedat least at the level of such expenditures for the fiscal year 1986.''  We believe that Congress intended to provide for new or increased levelsof services under the JOBS program, rather than to subsidize or buy-outexisting programs. We believe that Congress also intended that the JOBSprogram bring together and make maximum use of existing resources.  Therequirements of the maintenance of effort provisions of the Act, as wellas language limiting funding for contracted services to services not otherwiseavailable on a non-reimbursable basis, are tests of whether a State is,in fact, meeting these goals.   One test has two parts: JOBS funds must not be used to supplant State andlocal funds, and JOBS funds must not be used to pay for services availableon a non-reimbursable basis. Another test is whether the State is maintainingthe FY 1986 level of expenditures for programs which serve the same purposeas the JOBS program.   We received many comments regarding the maintenance of effort provisionof the NPRM. Based on the comments, we have reviewed these issues and reconsideredthe language and legislative history of the Statute.   Non-Supplantation and Services Not Otherwise Available On a Non-ReimbursableBasis  The regulations at andSection; 250.72(a), which prohibits the use of JOBSfunds to supplant non-Federal funds for existing activities and services,is a general requirement of the JOBS program.   The regulations at andSection; 250.72 (c) and (d) require that FFP not beprovided for activities and services that are otherwise available to anAFDC recipient on a non-reimbursable basis. For program services, suchas high school, which a State is required by law, regulation or other ruleto provide to all residents without regard to availability of funding,FFP under JOBS would not be available. For other programs available tothe general public, or to low-income residents in particular, but whichmay be permissibly limited by availability of State or local funds, FFPis available for the increase in expenditures attributable to JOBS participants. The regulations at andSection; 250.72(e) extends the requirements of andSection;250.72 (c) and (d) to services provided directly by the State IV-A agency. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several States requested clarification regarding therequirement that a State not use JOBS funds for activities and servicesthat are available on a non-reimbursable basis. One State asked for clarificationon the availability of JOBS funds for a program which ordinarily providedservices to AFDC recipients on a non-reimbursable basis, but whose fundswere limited.   <T3>Response: </T3>The regulatory requirements regarding the use of JOBSfunds for activities and services that are ``not otherwise available ona non-reimbursable basis'' fall into two categories. The first category,established at andSection; 250.72(c), requires that providers under contractor agreement with a State IV-A agency maintain a level of service to AFDCapplicants and recipients that is guaranteed to these individuals, regardlessof the availability of JOBS funds. In this category, for example, we includethe Job Training Partnership Act (JTPA) Program.  Section 203(b)(3) ofthe JTPA provides that assistance under the JTPA program must be providedto AFDC recipients ``on an equitable basis, taking into account their proportionof economically disadvantaged persons sixteen years of age or over in thearea.'' Therefore, JOBS funds would be available for services and activitiesprovided by JTPA only insofar as they exceeded the level required by thissection of JTPA.   The second category is covered in the regulations at andSection; 250.72(d),which requires that providers under contract or agreement with the StateIV-A agency certify that the services being provided with JOBS funds arenot services that would have been available to AFDC applicants or recipientsunder a program providing general services to the community, includingAFDC recipients. An example would be the cost of a State GED program. Inthis instance, JOBS funds would be available for the costs of a GED programestablished for AFDC recipients specifically for the purposes of the JOBSprogram which is in addition to the GED programs provided to the generalcommunity. This would be the case as long as AFDC recipients remained eligiblefor the programs available to the general community and were served underthose programs to at least the same extent as they had been prior to JOBS,not just in absolute terms but also in proportionate terms. For example,if a State doubled its overall GED program level, JOBS would not pay foradditional GED slots until the number of AFDC recipients in non-reimbursableGED also doubled. However, special circumstances such as the need for moreintensive training might warrant additional or separate JOBS funding withoutregard to the level of regular GED slots. The essential test is that JOBSfunding not be used to supplant services which the State would otherwiseprovide through other arrangements and sources of funds.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State mentioned that its job development and placementactivities were provided by the State employment security agency whichhas been Federally-funded under the Wagner-Peyser Act. It further statedthat funding under the Wagner-Peyser Act has decreased considerably. TheState was concerned that the regulations at andSection; 250.72(c) would precludeuse of JOBS funds to offset Wagner-Peyser funding for State employmentservices.   <T3>Response: </T3>If funds under the Wagner-Peyser Act, or any other program,are insufficient, then JOBS funds may be used to fund additional activitiesand services that are necessary for JOBS participants, but only if AFDCrecipients continue to receive their proportionate share of the other program'sfunds.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Two organizations suggested that the final regulationsclearly state that activities not otherwise available on a non-reimbursablebasis are eligible for JOBS reimbursement and that these activities shouldbe delineated in each State's JOBS and Supportive Services plans.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 250.21 of the final regulations requires a Stateto identify in its State JOBS plans the extent to which services to beprovided through JOBS: are available on a non-reimbursable basis; are providedby the State IV-A agency; and are to be purchased. The plan also requiresthat the State identify other services which are available and appropriatefor JOBS participants based on its efforts to coordinate with other agencies. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked for a clear description of ``certificationfrom the provider.'' Another State asserted that the requirement that certificationfrom the provider or IV-A agency that the services provided are not otherwiseavailable on a non-reimbursable basis was very burdensome because it wouldrequire a certification on every service provided.  <T3>Response: </T3>``Certification from the provider'' is defined as awritten assurance from the provider that such service or activity or suchgroups of services or activities are not available from the provider ona non-reimbursable basis for the period of the contract or agreement. Wedo not believe that a certification from a provider regarding servicesit provides on a non-reimbursable basis is onerous.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State said that our interpretation of the phrase``not otherwise available on a non-reimbursable basis'' in the contractauthority section of the Act was erroneous. It indicated that the provisionmeant that States must not enter into contractual arrangements for servicesto JOBS participants if such services ``would be available for referraland assignment of JOBS participants in the absence of such contractualarrangements and without reimbursable expenditure.''  <T3>Response: </T3>From this comment, we understand that the State interpretedthis requirement to mean that a State could only contract for servicesthat the State itself was not already making available, without reimbursement,to AFDC recipients. We do not share this interpretation. In consideringthe requirement that a State not use JOBS funds to supplant non-Federalfunds for existing JOBS-like services and activities, we believe it necessarythat the non-supplantation requirement be extended to services and activitiesprovided under contract since many of these services and activities willcommonly be provided under contract. Therefore, the regulations at andSection;andSection;250.72 (c) and (d) provide that JOBS funds can only be used for servicesthat the provider is not already required to provide AFDC recipients andfor services that the provider has certified are not available to AFDCrecipients on a non-reimbursable basis. In addition, the regulations atandSection; 250.72(e) provides that a State, when providing services directly,must certify that such services are not otherwise available on a non-reimbursablebasis.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters expressed confusion regarding thetimeframe for establishing whether services and activities were not otherwiseavailable on a non-reimbursable basis. Specifically, they asked whetherthis requirement pertained to services and activities currently availableor available in past periods, particularly FY 1986.  <T3>Response: </T3>The regulatory provision regarding maintaining a levelof expenditures for programs with the same purpose as the JOBS programrefers to FY 1986; thus it requires retrospective consideration. The provisioncontaining the requirement that a State not use JOBS funds for servicesand activities that are otherwise available on a non-reimbursable basisrequires the State and its contractors to consider services and activitiesthat are currently available to JOBS participants; thus it requires considerationof present conditions. We recognize that the proposed regulations on thisissue were somewhat ambiguous. The regulations have been changed to clarifythis point.  FY 86 Level of Expenditure  We recognize from the comments that some States were unsure whether theywere required to maintain current levels of expenditures, or expendituresequal to the level of FY 1986. We want to be clear that the level of expendituresthat a State must maintain each fiscal year for the JOBS program must atleast equal State and local expenditures made in FY 1986 for programs withpurposes similar to those of the JOBS program. It is this requirement thata State must meet in the form of total aggregate expenditures. This provisionis retained at andSection; 250.72(b).  In determining a State's FY 1986 level of expenditures for purposes ofthis requirement, a State must include State and local funds for titleIV-A work programs and title IV-C (WIN and WIN Demo), including expendituresfor those programs which were unmatched. A State must also include otherState and local funds which were used for training, employment and educationprograms which had a defined purpose of preventing welfare dependency.For example, a specially-designed GED program for welfare or potentialwelfare recipients would be included. However, the overall costs of theState's GED program would not be included, even if some of the program'sparticipants are AFDC recipients, since such programs do not generallyhave the defined purpose of preventing welfare dependency.  In determining the level of expenditures for those programs included inthe FY 1986 base, the State must include expenditures for supportive services,including child care, provided to individuals in these programs.  Amountsrelated to in-kind contributions, to the extent that in-kind contributionswere used as the State share of expenditures for programs in FY 1986, mustalso be included.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several States asked whether in calculating the FY 1986level of expenditures, they were required to include only State and localIV-A expenditures, or also expenditures made by other State or local agencies. <T3>Response: </T3>For purposes of the maintenance of effort requirement,the State must include in the calculation other expenditures in additionto title IV-A expenditures.  The Act requires that a State maintain FY1986 expenditures that were made for the purpose of Part F. The purposeof Part F is ``to assure that needy families with children obtain the education,training, and employment that will help them avoid long-term welfare dependence.''The reference, therefore, is to a general list of activities and services,and there is no restriction to activities and services under only titleIV-A.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters have suggested that the proposed regulationsindicated that States had to base the FY 1986 maintenance of effort requirementon expenditures associated with separate component activities and services.They suggested that States should be required to maintain spending at theFY 1986 level based on total aggregate expenditures.  <T3>Response: </T3>Although the proposed regulations did not specificallyaddress this issue, it was our intent that total aggregate costs be usedto determine that a State had maintained its FY 1986 level of effort. Thisapproach makes allowance for adjustments a State has made in spending forvarious activities and services since FY 86. We have included a provisionregarding this issue in the regulations at andSection; 250.72(b).<T3>Comment: </T3>One State indicated that adult education agencies andother service providers do not determine whether persons who receive theirservices are AFDC applicants or recipients. The State would, therefore,not have information available to determine the FY 1986 level of expenditures.  <T3>Response: </T3>The final regulations clarify which expenditures constitutea State's FY 1986 level of effort. As a result, we believe that the Statewill have the ability to identify those expenditures made for programsthat are included for purposes of this requirement.   Matching Rates (andSection; 250.73 of the Final Regulations)  JOBS program activities are subject to three different rates of FFP.  Cost Matched at 90 Percent  The FFP rate for that part of a State's total JOBS funds that equals theState's WIN or WIN Demonstration allotment for FY 1987 is 90 percent. Thisrate may be applied toward any allowable cost of the JOBS program. A State's10 percent share may be in the form of cash or in the form of in-kind contributions.Section 403(l)(1)(B) of the Act does not provide a definition of ``in-kind'';it states only that it be fairly evaluated. Therefore, in order to provideflexibility in this area, we are permitting a State's share of in-kindto be State in-kind or third party in-kind contributions. This has beenthe practice for the WIN program and we are incorporating this practicein the JOBS program, but only for this portion of the funding for JOBS.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked if there were any restrictionsfor claiming JOBS costs at 90 percent.  <T3>Response: </T3>A State may claim Federal reimbursement at 90 percentfor any allowable JOBS costs. In addition, expenditures at 90 percent neednot be claimed at the beginning of the fiscal year. The State can designatecosts to be matched at 90 percent throughout the fiscal year.   Costs Matched at the FMAP Rate with a 60 Percent Floor  Federal matching under the JOBS program is also available at a State'sMedicaid matching rate (the FMAP) for certain costs of the program thatexceed a State's WIN or WIN Demonstration allotment. For the purposes ofthe JOBS program, the minimum matching rate is 60 percent. We shall referto this matching rate as the ``higher rate'' in the following discussion. Costs eligible for matching at the higher rate are:  (1) the personnelcosts of full-time staff working full-time in any capacity in the JOBSprogram, and (2) all direct costs associated with providing JOBS programservices to individuals, including assessment, development of the employabilityplan, case management, and JOBS component activities. These costs includesalaries and benefits of employees for the time and effort devoted specificallyto these activities, whether they work on a full-time basis or not. Inaddition, costs of materials acquired or expended specifically for theseactivities, space, and other costs directly associated with the provisionof these services are matched at the higher rate. For example, if a Statecontracts for a job club, the costs of staff, telephones used by participants,and the room used for the job club are matchable at the higher rate. Indirectcosts are not matchable at this rate.  The definitions of ``direct'' and ``indirect'' costs are those definitionswhich are included in OMB Circular   A-87, ``Cost Principles for Stateand Local Governments.'' The term ``full-time staff working in any capacityin the JOBS program'' is defined as those individuals working a normalwork week as defined by the State and who are working in the JOBS programonly. A normal work week, however, cannot be based on a full-time equivalencymeasure.   The assessment of child care needs and referral to appropriate servicesfor JOBS participants can be matched at the higher rate when these activitiesare provided as part of a JOBS assessment, development of an employabilityplan, or case management. Alternatively, these activities are availablefor match as child care administrative expenditures under title IV-A withan FFP rate of 50 percent. Costs Matched at 50 Percent Costs eligible for match at 50 percent are costs associated with the generaladministration of the JOBS program. In this category, we include: indirectpersonnel costs which are excluded from JOBS matching at the higher rate.Non-personal services costs associated with these indirect personnel costsare also matchable at 50 percent. These costs include space, travel, utilities,equipment, and supplies. Also matched at the 50 percent rate are: the costsof such items as JOBS program planning, monitoring, letting contracts,systems, title IV-F fair hearing activities, and other indirect costs ofproviding JOBS services and activities. In addition, transportation, work-related expenses, and work-related supportiveservices are also available for match under the JOBS program at 50 percent.The requirements regarding these supportive services are at Part 255. As a result of the clarification of policy regarding application of thedifferent matching rates to program expenditures, it will not be necessaryto distinguish between types of costs in most contracts for the directprovision of JOBS services and activities to individuals. However, contractswhich, for example, provide multiple services and activities, to the extentthat they involve significant indirect costs, could continue to be subjectto segregation of costs. For example, if a State IV-A agency contractswith a single provider to deliver several components, administrative costsnot directly related to the delivery of services, such as the salary ofthe head of the agency, would have to be segregated. In addition, contractsfor general administrative functions, e.g. payroll and accounting, wouldbe at the 50 percent match rate. This is an area we expect to monitor closely,and should it be necessary, we will revise the regulations accordingly.<T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters asked that the higher rate be applicablefor the costs of part-time staff involved in any capacity of the JOBS program.<T3>Response: </T3>Section 403(l)(1)(A)(ii)(I) of the Act clearly stipulatesthat the higher rate applies to full-time staff employed in the operationof the JOBS program. Given this language, we conclude that the costs ofpart-time staff can be matched at the higher rate for the time they spendon the actual provision of activities and services, but that time spenton activities not matchable at the higher rate must be matched at 50 percent.For example, if an individual's work week is 20 hours, and she spends 10hours running a job club and 10 hours doing administrative work, the 10hours on job club is matched at the higher rate, but the rest is matchedat 50 percent. However, the final regulations significantly increase theactivities for which the higher rate applies so that all of a part-timeindividual's activities might be matchable at the higher rate. <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters stated that activities such as assessmentand case management should be available for match at the higher rate. Othercommenters suggested that orientation activities be matched at the higherrate. <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations now provide that this rate applies tothe costs of assessment and case management activities. Costs of orientationcan also be matched at the higher rate. As an alternative, costs of orientationcan be matched as title IV-A expenditures, if provided by IV-A staff, asdescribed in andSection; 250.77. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters stated that any social service providedto remove barriers to participating in JOBS, such as assistance with housing,health and family problems and the costs of alcohol and drug abuse rehabilitation,should be available for match at the higher rate. <T3>Response: </T3>The services described in the comment are supportiveservices, matchable at 50 percent. Alcohol and drug abuse rehabilitationmay be considered as supportive services, if the State so provides in itsSupportive Services plan. Use of JOBS funds for supportive services should be related to assistingthe individual to participate in JOBS or to accept employment. As such,we believe that it is appropriate for JOBS staff to make referrals to appropriateproviders for such needs as housing, health, and for family problems. JOBS funds can be used for remedial medical services necessary for an individualto participate in a JOBS component or to accept employment. An item inthis category might be a pair of glasses. However, JOBS funds for thissupportive service would only be available if funding from other sources,such as Medicaid, were not available. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked whether JOBS funds could be used forprograms designed to serve at-risk youth, i.e., younger recipients, whoare not young parents, and are not eligible for participation in the JOBSprogram. The State also suggested that matching for such programs shouldbe at the higher rate. <T3>Response: </T3>Programs designed to serve at-risk youth may be matchedas supportive services under the JOBS program. Expenditures for these programscan therefore be matched only at 50 percent. In order to be matched, suchprograms must be included in a State's Supportive Services plan and mustbe designed to include activities and services which assist the familyin achieving self-sufficiency and enable these children to avoid welfaredependency in their adult years.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked if the costs of a first-line supervisorsupervising staff directly involved in both the JOBS program and the FoodStamps employment and training program are available for match at the higherpercent. <T3>Response: </T3>The distinction regarding first-line supervisors hasbeen deleted from the final regulations. If a supervisor is directly involvedwith an activity for which the higher rate is applicable, then that partof her time associated with this activity is available for match at thisrate. However, the costs of that part of her time that is associated withthe Food Stamps employment and training program cannot be claimed underthe JOBS program. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State mentioned that it was not clear whether a Statewould be able to claim the higher match rate for full-time staff who areengaged in JOBS activities for only part of the time. <T3>Response: </T3>If full-time staff are involved in non-JOBS activitiesin addition to JOBS activities, the higher rate is only available for thatpart of their time spent on activities matchable at the higher rate. Other Matching Issues A State's share of costs available for match at the higher rate or at 50percent must be in cash. In-kind contributions, whether State in-kind orthird party in-kind, cannot be used as the State's share. State agencies are encouraged to seek financial support from private sourcesto develop and enhance JOBS program activities and other activities whichhelp individuals to become self-sufficient. Funds donated from privatesources for the JOBS program may be considered as a portion of a State'sshare of matching costs, a policy consistent with the use of such fundsfor the AFDC program. The conditions under which donated funds may be usedas the State's share are set forth at andSection; 235.66(b) and G-4000 ofPart 5 of the Handbook of Public Assistance Administration. Thus, andSection;250.73(d)(2) provides that donated funds may be used for State match ifsuch funds are transferred to the State IV-A agency and are under its administrativecontrol, are donated without any restriction which would require use fora particular individual in the JOBS program or for a particular facilityor institution involved in the JOBS program, and do not revert to the donor'sfacility or use. Donated funds may be used as the State share of JOBS expendituresfor any of the three FFP rates.<T3>Comment: </T3>Can JOBS funds be used to match the costs of servicesor activities provided to a JOBS participant after she is no longer anAFDC recipient, either because she has found unsubsidized employment orfor other reasons? This question pertains to those activities or servicesother than those included in the child care or Medicaid transition benefit.  <T3>Response: </T3>If included in a State's JOBS and Supportive Servicesplans, the State may provide case management and supportive services forup to 90 days after a participant loses eligibility for AFDC. For JOBScomponent activities, if an individual loses AFDC eligibility after fundshave been obligated or expended for such activities, FFP is available,regardless of the length of the activity. For example, if an individualis already participating in a course of vocational education which hasbeen paid for, and the individual loses AFDC eligibility before the activityends, then she may complete the course. Language incorporating this policyhas been added at andSection; 250.73(e).  <T3>Comment: </T3>Two States asked that the regulations provide flexibilityin permitting States to use State funds not under the administrative controlof the IV-A agency but used for purposes of the JOBS program as part ofthe State's share of JOBS expenditures for matching purposes.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have included requirements at andSection; 250.73(d)(1)for the use of public funds as the State share of match under the JOBSprogram. The State IV-A agency must have administrative control of suchfunds in order to request Federal matching, in order to satisfy the singleState agency requirement at andSection; 250.10.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters expressed concern regarding the requirementthat contractors and vendors segregate costs according to different matchingrates. One commenter noted that segregating costs was not compatible withperformance-based contracting, which makes payments to contractors basedon outcomes, such as job placements.  <T3>Response: </T3>Changes in the final regulations regarding matchingrates will, for the most part, eliminate the need for segregation of costsin contracts. Contracts which include costs not matchable at the higherrate will require cost segregation. The State may use performance-basedcontracts which include such costs, if the State, in calculating the unitcost, estimates the percentage of costs matchable at each rate.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked whether, if title IV-F funding is usedfor systems interface, such funds would be subject to the JOBS cap undertitle IV-F?  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 250.81 provides that the costs for interfacingwith an existing or planned title IV-A system are matchable under titleIV-A. However, a State may choose to use title IV-F funds for this purpose,subject to the State's limit of entitlement.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State mentioned that related Federal programs arebased on a forward funding policy whereby the allocation amount is availableto local planners during the planning process and that a similar processfor the JOBS program would be helpful in coordinating the planning of theseprograms.  <T3>Response: </T3>The basis for forward funding in other Federal programs,such as JTPA, is statutory. The Statute does not include such a provisionfor the JOBS program.  Although funding under the JOBS program is available only from the quarterthe State implements the program, provided the State JOBS plan and SupportiveServices plan have been approved, funding for planning for the JOBS programis available as an AFDC administrative cost matchable at 50 percent.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State mentioned that the three matching rates forthe JOBS program were administratively burdensome and that there shouldbe an alternative of one matching rate.  <T3>Response: </T3>The three matching rates applicable in the JOBS programare specifically provided for in the Act.Reduced Matching Rate (andSection; 250.74 of the Final Regulations)  TargetGroups  For the JOBS program, the Act provides certain safeguards to assure thatthe increased Federal funding intended to assist individuals in avoidinglong-term dependency is directed largely towards those individuals whoare most in need of assistance. The regulations at andSection; 250.74(a)provides that if, in any fiscal year, a State fails to expend 55 percentof its JOBS expenditures on members of the State's target population asdefined in andSection; 250.1, the Federal matching rate for all JOBS expendituresfor that same year will be reduced to 50 percent. The Secretary, however,may waive this reduction if a State can satisfactorily demonstrate thatthe characteristics of the caseload in that State make it infeasible tomeet the requirements of the regulations at andSection; 250.74(a) and thatthe State is targeting other long-term or potential long-term recipients.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked when a State would be required todemonstrate that the characteristics of its caseload make it infeasibleto meet this requirement and target other long-term or potential long-termrecipients.<T3>Response: </T3>A State must include in its JOBS State plan, or in anamendment to the plan, its reasons for concluding that the characteristicsof its caseload make it infeasible to meet the requirement, and must identifyat the same time other long-term or potential long-term groups which itplans to target.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One State said that there was no indication in the regulationsabout how the reduction for failure to spend 55 percent of JOBS expenditureson the target population would be taken. It recommended that the reductionbe a prospective reduction.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 403(l)(2)(A) of the Act provides that the penaltyfor failure to meet this requirement, i.e., the reduction to 50 percent,is applied to the year that the State fails to meet the requirement. Thelanguage is clearly different from the language regarding the participationrate penalty which specifically states that the penalty is to be appliedprospectively.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked whether the data collection requirementsfor determining if a State had spent 55 percent of JOBS expenditures onthe target population could be waived if the State did not seek fundingat the enhanced levels.  <T3>Response: </T3>In principle, we have no objection to waiving data collectionrequirements related to meeting the targeting standards where a State waivesits entitlement to the higher matching rates. However, the same data areneeded to meet some of the uniform data collection requirements containedin sections 203 and 606 of the Family Support Act. These sections do notspecifically include the requirement for reduced funding if a State failsto spend 55 percent of its JOBS expenditures on the target population,but they do require data on the average amount spent per family in eachJOBS component. Thus, a State would have to meet these latter data collectionrequirements even if it did not seek funding for JOBS at enhanced rates.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State suggested that administrative costs not beincluded in the 55 percent target requirement.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 403(l)(2) of the Act requires a State to spend55 percent of its title IV-F expenditures on the target population in orderto qualify for FFP at the rates specified in section 403(l)(1) of the Act.We have interpreted this to mean all JOBS expenditures because no categoryof costs was excepted. The regulations reflect this position.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State suggested that if an individual is in a targetgroup any time within the fiscal year but is moved out of the group withinthe fiscal year, the State should be allowed to count the individual asa participant in the target group for the entire year.   <T3>Response: </T3>A participant's target group status is established atthe time of the initial assessment.  Therefore, JOBS funds expended onbehalf of this participant while she remains an AFDC recipient are countedas target group expenditures. A State may reassess target group statusperiodically as an individual may acquire target group status over time.  Participation Rates  Section 403(l)(3)(A) of the Act establishes participation rates that aState must meet for fiscal years 1990 through 1995 in order to qualifyfor enhanced matching rates. The term ``participation'' is defined in theregulations at andSection; 250.78, and andSection; 250.74 contains the formulafor calculating participation rates.   The participation rate for FY 1990 is 7 percent; however, a State is notsubject to a reduction in the Federal matching rate for FY 1990. FY 1992is the first year in which a State will be liable for reduction of FFPfor failure to meet the participation rates (for FY 1991.)  Failure tomeet a State's participation rate for a fiscal year will result in a reductionof its matching rate to 50 percent in the subsequent fiscal year.  The Secretary may waive in full or in part any penalties applicable toa State for not meeting these participation rates. The regulations at andSection;250.74(b)(5) provide the conditions under which such a waiver may be granted.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked whether certain groups of participantswould be deemed not required to participate and, therefore, not includedin the calculation. The groups suggested were: those in a political subdivisionin which the program is not offered; those who are exempted based on remoteness;and those who have ``good cause'' not to participate.   <T3>Response: </T3>We have amended the final regulations to clarify thatthe calculation of participation rates will exclude:  (1) a person whois exempt, including for remoteness, (2) a person living in a politicalsubdivision in which there is no JOBS program, and (3) a person determinedby the State to have ``good cause'' not to participate, for each monthin which the ``good cause'' finding pertains.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Another group of commenters suggested that it would unfairlypenalize a State if the calculation were to include those who cannot participatebecause the State determines that it has insufficient resources.  <T3>Response: </T3>We interpret the term ``insufficient resources'' asused by the commenters to mean that the State IV-A agency does not haveadequate State funds to match available federal resources, and we disagreewith this suggested change for the following reason. We believe that participationrates that only require 20 percent of the mandatory population to participateby FY 1994 already consider lack of State resources. Furthermore, the Statuteprovides specific relief from meeting this requirement in section 403(l)(3)(E)of the Act.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Another group of commenters suggested that we excludefrom the calculation those for whom the State cannot guarantee child care. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(B)(i)(I) of the Act provides thatthe State must guarantee child care if it requires an individual to participate.If it cannot guarantee child care, then the individual cannot be requiredto participate and is not counted in the calculation. The determinationthat a State cannot guarantee child care must be made on an individualbasis for each participant.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked how the calculation would treatparticipants entering or leaving a component in mid-month.  <T3>Response: </T3>The definition of participation at andSection; 250.78and the minimally required data elements at andSection; 250.82 have beenamended to include the date of assignment to a component.  We have notspecified a methodology for counting activity that does not occur throughouta calendar month. We will include the methodology in an Action Transmittal. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters approved of the proposal that personssanctioned from a component be excluded from the calculation. Conversely,other commenters suggested that a State be allowed to include such persons.They argued that the issue in any sanction is participation, that sanctionsare never undertaken lightly, and that they represent a high level of agencyinvestment in maintaining the integrity of the program and the agreementsbetween the program and the participants.  <T3>Response: </T3>We do not agree that sanctioned individuals should becounted as participants. We agree that sanction activity tends to involvesignificant staff time and effort. A fair and effective sanctions systemis important to the integrity of a program. However, sanction activityis not participation. The regulations continues to provide that a sanctionedperson will not be included in the participation calculation for the monthshe is sanctioned and any subsequent months she is under sanction.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that the Department's methodologyfor the participation rate calculation be made available to the States,including indication of how automated records are sorted, the number ofrecords received, and the reason(s) for our exclusion of any records. <T3>Response: </T3>We intend to involve a joint State/Federal work groupin the precise working out of the calculation. The procedures and definitionsresulting from that effort will be issued in Action Transmittals. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State said that measuring participation rates ratherthan program outcomes defied the intent of the Family Support Act. <T3>Response: </T3>The Act specified the applicable participation ratesfor several fiscal years, the methodology for determining a State's abilityto meet them, and the penalty to be assessed for failure to meet the applicableparticipation rate. The regulations restate these provisions. AFDC-UP Participation Rates Participation rates for the AFDC-Unemployed Parent (AFDC-UP) program havealso been established by the Act and appear in the regulations at andSection;250.74(c)(1). AFDC-UP participation rate requirements go into effect inFY 1994, and the first penalty would be imposed in FY 1995. While the statutory language refers to waiving the penalty for not meetingthe participation rates, and sets the waiver criteria, the actual penaltyis not defined in the Act. We believe it is appropriate that the penaltyfor failure to meet the AFDC-UP participation rates be a reduction to 50percent in FFP. This penalty is identical to the penalty established inthe Act for failure to meet the general participation rates. It is alsoconsistent with the penalty established for failure to expend 55 percentof JOBS funds on targeted groups. As an alternative, we considered applying the penalties cited under section404 of the Social Security Act for failure to substantially comply withthe provisions of section 402(a) of the Social Security Act. The appropriatepenalties under this section include the withholding of all AFDC grantfunds to a State or the withholding of certain funds limited to specificcategories. However, we concluded that these penalties would be too harsh.The Secretary may waive in full or in part any penalties applied to a Statefor not meeting the participation rates for the AFDC-UP program. The regulationsat andSection; 250.74(c)(3) provide the conditions under which a full orpartial waiver may be granted. <T3>Comment: </T3>One organization noted that section 403(1)(4)(D) of theAct provides for waiver of the penalty for failure to meet the applicableAFDC-UP participation standards if the State submits a proposal which islikely to achieve the required percentage of participants for the subsequentfiscal years. The commenter asked why the proposed regulations at andSection;250.74(c)(3)(iii), on the other hand, specified that the proposal mustbe for both the current and subsequent fiscal years. <T3>Response: </T3>The penalty for failing to meet a particular participationrate is enforced prospectively, i.e., it results in reducing a State'smatch to 50 percent for the year following the year for which the rateis not met. The ``following year'' is what we interpret the term ``currentfiscal year'' to mean because a decision regarding participation ratesis only made after the end of a fiscal year. For the regular participationrate waivers, section 403(1)(3)(E) of the Act provides that a proposalin support of a waiver request must contain a plan to achieve the applicableparticipate rate ``for the current fiscal year and the subsequent fiscalyears * * *'' In the ``current fiscal year'' the State is already subjectto a requirement that it meet a higher participation rate for unemployedparents, so it is appropriate that a plan to meet the higher rates shouldcover not only subsequent years but also the year in which the State submitsthe proposal. Otherwise, the State may also fail to meet the requirementfor the ``current fiscal year'' and thus be subject to new penalties. Thus,although the language of the Family Support Act did not include the term``current fiscal year'' for the AFDC-UP program, we believe that it iscorrect to do so.  Activities Excluded from FFP (andSection; 250.75 of the Final Regulations) There are certain activities for which Federal matching under the JOBSprogram is not available under any circumstance. These are identified inthe regulations at andSection; 250.75. In addition, there are certain costsunallowable for FFP that apply only to the community work experience programand alternative work experience programs included in an approved JOBS plan.The regulations at andSection; 250.63(j) detail these prohibitions. Union Dues <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked about the availability of FFP forunion dues. <T3>Response: </T3>Union dues may be matched as a JOBS supportive serviceif an individual, as a condition of her acceptance of unsubsidized employment,is required to pay such dues and if union dues are identified in a State'sSupportive Services plan as allowable. Self-initiated Education and Training<T3>Comment: </T3>The regulations at andSection; 250.75 provides that thecosts of self-initiated education or training activities, specificallytuition, books, fees, room and board, are not available for Federal reimbursement.One State suggested that the Family Support Act only meant for this prohibitionto apply to tuition, but that FFP would be available for books, fees, roomand board under JOBS, either as a component activity or a supportive service. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 402(a)(19)(F)(iii) of the Act prohibits ``thecosts of such school or training * * * '' We believe it reasonable to includetuition, books, fees, room and board in the definition of such ``costs.''Therefore, FFP is not available for the costs of these items for thoseindividuals in approved self-initiated programs.  Individuals in theseprograms, however, are eligible for child care, transportation, and othersupportive services.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked if FFP would be available for the costsof school or training for an individual in a self-initiated program forsubsequent periods of enrollment, such as the next semester.   <T3>Response: </T3>We have reviewed the language of the Act and have determinedthat there is no flexibility regarding this issue. It does not providefor FFP for these costs at any time.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters recommended that the costs of self-initiatededucation or training be considered AFDC special needs and, therefore,be reimbursable under the AFDC program.  <T3>Response: </T3>The Family Support Act provides that such costs arenot Federally reimbursable for purposes of section 403 of the Social SecurityAct. Section 403 contains the requirements for payments to States not justfor the JOBS program, but for the entire AFDC program. Therefore, Federalreimbursement for these costs as AFDC special needs is also prohibited. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State was concerned that the prohibition for Federalreimbursement for education and training activities under andSection; 250.75pertained to all JOBS participants enrolled in any education or trainingactivity.  <T3>Response: </T3>The prohibition at andSection; 250.75(a) pertains onlyto the costs of education and training for individuals in self-initiatedprograms. JOBS component activities may include education and trainingfor which Federal reimbursement is available provided all other requirementsof the program are met, e.g., that the educational activity is not alreadyavailable on a non-reimbursable basis.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State maintained that FFP for child care licensingfees for individuals in a child care related self-initiated training programshould be available as a supportive service.  <T3>Response: </T3>Such a fee constitutes a one-time work related expensenecessary for accepting employment and therefore would be allowable asa supportive service under the JOBS program. However, we remind Statesthat FFP is not generally allowable for child care licensing either undertitle IV-F or title IV-A as a child care administrative expenditure.  Construction  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked if the prohibition of FFP for constructionincluded remodeling work. If so, it indicated that this would impose ahardship on States where building modifications are necessary to accommodatethe increase in JOBS participants and increase in activities.  <T3>Response: </T3>The prohibition on construction does not pertain tocosts for remodeling, rearranging, or altering facilities in order to makethe area more appropriate for JOBS. However, under the provisions of OMBCircular A-87, Attachment B, Item C.2.c, ``Rearrangements and alterations,''such costs require approval of the Family Support Administration. OMB CircularA-87 is made applicable to the JOBS program under the regulations at 45CFR 92.22.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One organization believed that the prohibition on theuse of JOBS funds for construction extended to the costs of tools, equipmentand materials used in training for construction trades jobs.  <T3>Response: </T3>JOBS funds may be used for expenses associated witha JOBS training activity. This provision prohibits the building of facilitiesonly. Financial Reports, Records, Statements and Audits (andSection; 250.76 ofthe Final Regulations)   Grants provided under the JOBS program of title IV-F are subject to thegrant management regulations at Part 92. These regulations apply to federally-assistedprograms that are not funded as open-ended entitlement programs, such asthe AFDC program. (For the AFDC program, the grant regulations at Part74 continue to apply.) The following provisions of Part 74 also apply togrants subject to Part 92: andSection;andSection;  74.62(a), 74.173, 74.174(b),74.304, 74.710, and 74.715.  In addition, all claims for Federal reimbursement must be supported byappropriate documentation. JOBS funds under title IV-F are subject to auditand financial and programmatic review. Claims for improper costs underthe JOBS program will be subject to disallowance. Disallowance proceduresfor JOBS funds will be similar to the disallowance procedures for the AFDCprogram. States are reminded that expenditures of the JOBS program arealso subject to other HHS regulations, such as those at 45 CFR Part 95and Part 16. Costs Matchable as AFDC Payments (andSection; 250.77 of the Final Regulations) Supplemental Payments to Avoid Net Loss of Cash Income  The Family Support Act specifies that costs incurred by the State for supplementalpayments to families so that they do not experience a net loss of cashincome, pursuant to andSection; 250.35, shall be treated as title IV-A costs. However, they are not considered AFDC benefit payments for any purpose. Payments to Employers Under the Work Supplementation Component  Payments to employers in the work supplementation program include partor all of an AFDC grant that has been diverted to cover part of the wagespaid to an AFDC recipient participating in this program (see regulationsat andSection; 250.62(l)). Because these payments are AFDC benefit payments,they are available for Federal matching under the AFDC program.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State noted that it currently made State-only supplementalpayments to work supplementation program participants when the family wouldreceive less disposable income than they would otherwise have receivedhad they not participated in WSP. For example, a participant in WSP whois in retrospective budgeting has a permanent reduction in hours. Due tothe time lag inherent in the retrospective budgeting system, a revisedresidual grant will not be issued until two months following the paymentmonth.  Therefore, a supplemental payment is also issued in the interveningmonths for the difference between the original residual and the revisedresidual. Would this supplemental payment now be eligible for FFP?   <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations at andSection; 250.77(a) provides thatsupplemental AFDC payments can be made to a recipient's family so thatthe family does not experience a net loss of cash income from the recipienthaving been required by the State to accept a job. When such payments aremade, a recipient may not claim good cause for not participating in theJOBS program.   The supplemental payments described by the commenter are of a differentnature. They result from the State's application of the AFDC retrospectivebudgeting requirements. However, the regulations at andSection; 250.62(g)permits a State to exempt from the retrospective requirements of Part 233individuals who hold supplemented jobs. The State should consider thisoption when determining AFDC payments to an individual participating inthe work supplementation program.   <T3>Comment: </T3>For the unemployed parent program, this same State alsoissues supplemental payments in those cases where a principal earner, whois working more than 100 hours and whose wages normally exceed the maximumaid payment, is ill for one week and his wages drop below the maximum aidpayment even though he continues to work more than 100 hours. Will thesesupplemental payments be eligible for match under the AFDC program?  <T3>Response: </T3>No. The current regulations at andSection; 233.100 providethat an individual is eligible for AFDC-UP payments only if she is employedless than 100 hours a month. In the State's example, the supplemental paymentswould be made to an individual working more than 100 hours a month.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several States indicated that they perceive some overlapbetween the activities of an AFDC eligibility or income maintenance workerin determining eligibility and informing a potential recipient or recipientof the requirements and opportunities under the JOBS program.  They askedunder what conditions FFP would be available under title IV-A for JOBSactivities.   <T3>Response: </T3>We permit a State to claim under the AFDC program at50 percent those costs related to JOBS orientation, determination of exemptions,and referral to the JOBS program when such activities are conducted bya title IV-A eligibility or income maintenance worker. The State may, ofcourse, choose to claim these costs as title IV-F costs. However, whenthe activities of JOBS orientation and referral are conducted by JOBS staff,and not AFDC staff, these costs can only be claimed under title IV-F. Definition of Participation for Enhanced FFP (andSection; 250.78 of the FinalRegulations)  The NPRM included a definition of participation in andSection; 250.1 thatrelated only to participation requirements for qualifying for enhancedFFP under andSection; 250.74(b). In the interest of avoiding any confusionwith all other definitions of participation in this regulations, we haveremoved this material from andSection; 250.1 and added a new andSection; 250.78.  Participation Standard  Participation will be measured in terms of a 20 hour-per-week standard.However, we will not limit the number of individuals considered to be participatingto those who are scheduled to participate in an activity for 20 or morehours per week. Instead, we will consider as participants the largest numberof individuals whose combined and averaged weekly hours equal or exceed20. This means, for example, that an individual who participates in anactivity for 30 hours per week will balance either one individual who participatesfor ten hours (counting as two participants), or two individuals who participatefor 15 hours each (counting as three participants). This does not meanthat four individuals each participating for five hours per week wouldbe counted as one participant.   In terms of the overall requirement, we provide the following example.In 1995, when the participation standard will be 20 percent, there mightbe 1,000 non-exempt individuals in areas of the State covered by the JOBSprogram. At least 200 individuals must be satisfactorily participatingin a given month, and their scheduled hours of participation must average20 hours per week. If this standard were met, additional individuals participatingin JOBS would not adversely affect the overall participation rate computation,even if their scheduled hours resulted in an overall average of less than20 hours per week.  Activities Considered in Determining Participation Rates  In determining participation rates, activity will be counted for the numberof hours scheduled. Activity in all components listed in the State JOBSplan, with the exception of Job Development and Job Placement, will qualify.In addition, participation in assessment and employability plan developmentwill be counted, but only in one month for each period on AFDC.   We intend to develop a method to allow counting of participation for aportion of a calendar month. However, we have not yet determined the methodologyfor counting activity that does not occur throughout a calendar month. We considered a number of options, including prorating such activity,or converting partial month activity to a weekly average. These and otheroptions would entail additional recordkeeping and reporting requirements.We have not included a specific methodology in the final regulations, butwe intend to do so in an Action Transmittal.   Job entries will also be counted, in the following manner. For the monthin which the job entry occurs, an individual will be considered to be participatingfor the number of hours required by the job. Hours of work will then beadded to scheduled hours of component activity, yielding an average weeklyactivity level for the individual. In addition, work in the following calendarmonth will also be counted. For either month, hours required by the jobwill be counted only to the extent the individual retains employment. Jobentries will only be considered for those who were participating in a JOBScomponent, or receiving job development and job placement services duringthe month of the job entry, or the preceding calendar month.   Satisfactorily ParticipatingIn setting the participation standard, we considered whether the 20 hourstandard should be based on scheduled hours, or on hours of actual attendance.We have determined that for purposes of measuring participation rates,activity will be counted for the number of hours scheduled, if an individualhas ``satisfactorily participated.'' In determining whether an individualhas satisfactorily participated, the State will apply the following standard:an individual who attends at least 75 percent of the scheduled hours ofactivity in a month will be counted for the number of hours scheduled;an individual who attends for less than 75 percent of scheduled hours willnot be counted. This policy is included in the regulations at andSection;250.78(b)(5).  In establishing this policy, we considered many factors and weighed a numberof options. Our primary goal was to reflect Congressional intent with regardto the participation rate requirement. At this point, the JOBS programdoes not require outcome measures or performance standards_the Statuterequires the Department to recommend such standards by October, 1993. However,as a temporary measure of State performance, Congress did include the participationrate requirement, which expires after FY 1995. We continue to believe thatCongress intended this interim participation measure to be meaningful,and therefore must go beyond mere assignment, and reflect actual participationin the assignment.   We were also concerned that measuring only assignments, rather than actualparticipation, would encourage States to emphasize assignment, with littlemonitoring of individual activity. There is some evidence from currentwork and training programs that where States do not monitor individualactivity there is a significant no-show and drop-out rate. The JOBS programwill be more likely to reduce dependency if individual participants actuallyattend component activity for which funds are expended. The modest administrativecosts should be more than offset by the improved effectiveness of the States'JOBS programs. In addition, States may be able to avoid situations wherethey are spending money to purchase slots for assignments which are thensporadically attended.  Further, we felt that States would choose to track individual activityfor reasons other than the participation rate requirement. For example,attendance should be considered for purposes of determining whether anindividual should be permitted to continue in an activity, or whether tocontinue to provide supportive services.   We were also concerned with the administrative burden on the State thattracking individual attendance for every participant would create, basedon comment to the NPRM and discussions with State and local officials.We therefore did not set specific verification requirements, nor did werequire that the State maintain a record of attendance for all participants.Instead, we require that attendance be verified for the cases sampled forpurposes of the reporting requirements, as described in andSection; 250.82of the regulation. In practical terms, this means that States should requireproviders to maintain some record of attendance, in order to assure thatindividual participation will be credited in determining participationrates. However, records for all participants need not be kept by the IV-Aagency. In addition, we will not require verification of attendance forindividuals who enter employment. In order to receive credit for job entry,the State need only verify that an individual has remained employed untilthe end of the sample month.  We have purposely not included reference to excused absence, or good causefor failure to attend the assigned activity, in setting the 75 percentstandard. While the States should consider such factors in providing continuedservices, and in determining whether an individual should be sanctioned,we believe that retaining records of excused or unexcused absence, or requiringproviders to determine if good cause for failure to attend exists wouldbe excessively burdensome.   For some component activities, providing attendance information will presentno additional burden. For example, a participant assigned to attend highschool will require no additional tracking, since attendance is regularlymonitored. If such an individual case is sampled, the State would verifyattendance with the school.  However, for other activities, States willneed to negotiate with providers so that attendance records are maintained.For example, attendance records are often not kept for adult educationclasses, since this type of activity is typically voluntary. Although someproviders may not agree to such requirements, others will react positivelybecause they will be supportive of efforts to reduce the drop-out rate.We have therefore concluded that the benefits of tracking attendance outweighthe burdens.   We considered a number of other options in establishing the policy of satisfactorilyparticipating.  For example, we considered crediting only actual hoursof attendance. We rejected this option for two reasons.  First, it wouldrequire verification of actual attendance for all participants. Second,it could result in including individuals who were clearly not participatingsatisfactorily as participants. For example, an individual who attendedonly 10 hours per week of an assignment that called for 40 hours attendancecould have been included as a participant.   We also considered requiring a higher percentage of attendance, or factoringin excused absences, in setting the 75 percent level. We believe that the75 percent level is a good compromise between an unreasonably high standard,such as 100 percent, and a low standard that would negate the concept ofmeaningful participation.   We also considered permitting States to define satisfactorily participating.We did not choose this option because it would provide incentives to setlow standards, and would not lead to uniform measurement of participation.A State with a strict definition of satisfactorily participating mightbe disadvantaged, and comparisons of State participation rates would bemisleading.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters suggested that intake activities suchas assessment, employability development planning, and orientation shouldbe included, since these often involve significant client activity, andrepresent a front-end investment in barrier identification that is centralto the goal of reducing long-term dependency. Some commenters suggestedthat these intake activities count without regard to duration; some suggestedlimits of one or two months; one suggested that a credit of 3 hours perclient be permitted, such that 7 clients would count for the equivalentof one week of participation.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have carefully considered the arguments made by commentersand have decided to modify our definition of participation. These activitieswill count for the purposes of calculating participation rates for thenumber of hours of the activity. However, because these are preliminaryactivities which lead to component participation, we will allow them tobe counted for an individual in only one month for each period on AFDC. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested inclusion of all componentactivities. This included counting Job Development and Placement, and removingthe ``full-time'' requirement for OJT and Work Supplementation. The reasonsoffered included the complexity of tracking different hours requirementsfor different components. The full-time requirement for OJT and Work Supplementationmight induce a State to not make a part-time assignment because of thehours requirement for participation.<T3>Response: </T3>The final regulations remove the differing hours requirementsamong the various components, but we have not included job developmentand job placement in the participation calculation. We continue to believethat job development and placement is primarily an agency activity. Manycommenters who wanted it counted as participation described activitiesthat more properly fit under individual or group job search, one of theoptional components. Such activities would count as participation if theState has individual and group job search as one of its optional components.However, entry to employment from job development and job placement countsas participation, as described andSection; 250.78. <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters suggested that the 20 hours per weekrequirement is unreasonable and unworkable since most component activitiesare not designed for that standard. Commenters suggested that a State wouldincrease the cost of a component to raise it to the level of 20 hours insteadof, say 16, thereby wasting training and child care resources. Other commenterssuggested that States would feel compelled to assign ``filler'' activityto meet the 20 hours requirement, and that such assignments would similarlywaste training, child care and transportation costs. Several commenterssuggested that if an hours requirement were retained, it rely either onthe Unemployed Parent requirement of 16 hours per week already in the Act,or on the Food Stamp requirement of 12 hours per month. <T3>Response: </T3>We have amended the regulations to provide for the combiningand averaging of the hours of those scheduled to participate. This provisionwill provide States with substantially greater flexibility, while assuringthat States provide meaningful activities for reducing long-term welfaredependency. The clear guidance of the legislative history is that participationshould be significant and not be permitted to become a token effort. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that the difficulty of trackingactual attendance in lieu of hours scheduled would be both costly and apoor use of staff time. <T3>Response: </T3>It was never our intention to require States to trackactual attendance hours. Therefore, we have clarified the regulations toindicate that we will count hours scheduled as long as the individual issatisfactorily participating in the activity; however, States are requiredto verify attendance for cases in the sample, as described in andSection;250.80. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that in lieu of countingonly those clients whose participation in a month was equivalent to 20hours per week, we permit all participation in qualifying activity to beaveraged to either the same 20 hour standard (one commenter) or to somelesser hour requirement (two other commenters). <T3>Response: </T3>We are persuaded that a combined and averaging approachwould provide States with greater flexibility in working with the broadrange of recipients within their caseloads. We have, therefore, kept the20 hours per week standard, amended as follows: at least the required percentageof the participants must average 20 hours per week of scheduled activityfor the month. For example, for each person scheduled for 40 hours perweek, the State could count an additional 5 persons who each had been scheduledfor 16 hours per week, or an additional 2 persons who each had been scheduledfor 10 hours per week. However, in no case can an individual with no hoursof participation count as a participant because the Statute specificallyprohibits counting mere registration as participation. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that we include activityin certain supportive services, particularly those related to drug andalcohol abuse and mental health services, in the definition of participation.<T3>Response: </T3>We carefully considered this possibility for the NPRM.Although such services may be important in allowing certain individualsto become prepared to participate, we have not amended the regulationsto include those receiving supportive services such as drug and alcoholabuse remediation, but not otherwise participating in a JOBS activity,in calculating participation rates. We do not believe that Congress intendedsuch services to constitute participation, since they are not mentionedin the Statute. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested counting certain kinds oftime that were not direct participation in a component as part of the hoursrequirement. Among these were transportation time, including time to transportchildren to and from child care. <T3>Response: </T3>While we agree that time spent on a daily basis in commutingis necessary, it is not participation, just as commuting to and from workis not work.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested counting educational activitieson a year-round basis, or counting semester or quarter breaks, or countingsummers even though courses were not being taken during the summer. Severalcommenters suggested providing for a ``homework'' allowance in additionto the actual scheduled hours in an educational component. <T3>Response: </T3>We have amended the regulations to provide that educationalactivities count for the amount of time scheduled, without regard to the``making satisfactory progress'' standard. We do not include a ``homework''time allowance. While we recognize that some educational programs do assignhomework, it would be too difficult to account for this administrativelysince there are so many different types of educational activities. We do believe that scheduled breaks during the school year, including timebetween semesters, should be counted as participation, and the regulationsnow provide that an individual in an educational activity will be consideredto be participating for her scheduled hours during scheduled breaks withinthe school year. We have also provided that if an individual is enrolledand attending high school for the last semester of a school year and isexpected to return to high school for the next school year, then she shallbe counted as a participant for the break between school years. The averagenumber of hours per week for the break between school years shall be thescheduled average weekly attendance level for the participant in the previousschool year. We make a distinction between attendance at high school andother kinds of educational activities (particularly postsecondary education)because other educational activities are often offered during the summerallowing the participant to continue the process of becoming self-sufficient. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested the inclusion of a creditfor job entry, on the ground that exclusion of such a credit inappropriatelyde-emphasizes the goal of employment, and would induce a State to purposelydefer job entry until the first of the succeeding month. <T3>Response: </T3>We agree that certain job entries should be includedin a State's count of participants. Therefore, we have amended the finalregulations to count job entry from a component or activity either in themonth participation in the component or activity ends or in the next calendarmonth. If the job entry occurs in the month component activity ends, wewill average the scheduled hours of participation in the component forthe portion of the month prior to job entry with the scheduled number ofhours of employment for the remainder of the month. If job entry occursin the subsequent month, we will count the average scheduled weekly hoursof work as participation. For all job entries, we will count the averagescheduled weekly hours of work for one additional month as participation.The final regulations provide participation credit for job entries froma component or through job development and job placement activities. <T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters suggested that participation creditbe given for any recipient employed part-time, or employed more than 30hours per week. <T3>Response: </T3>We have not amended the regulations to accommodate thissuggestion because the central issue is participation in the State's JOBSprogram. Job retention by AFDC recipients, whether part-time or full-time,is a desirable outcome, but the participation rate language of the Actdoes not contemplate the ongoing inclusion of persons no longer participating.<T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters suggested deleting all specific hoursrequirements, since they found no statutory basis for establishing suchrequirements.  <T3>Response: </T3>The Act provides, at section 403(l)(3)(D), that a Statewill establish requirements, ``consistent with regulations of the Secretary.''We continue to believe that it is well within the authority of the Secretaryand the provisions of the Act for the regulations to define, in effect,an hours-based benchmark for significant participation. The fundamentalbasis for minimal standards is that the Secretary is required by the Actto allow or disallow enhanced FFP to States based on whether the participationrates established in the Act are met. We believe the absence of a federallyset minimum would lead to non-comparable rates of participation among theStates, and to the inclusion of token activities as participation.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that the standard be basedsolely on each individual's employability plan.  <T3>Response: </T3>We continue to believe that participation should besignificant, and that Congress so intended. We note in this regard thecolloquy among Senators Dole, Bentsen and Moynihan (134 Cong. Rec. S7970-1)regarding congressional intent that participation in JOBS be meaningful.In the absence of a Federal standard, we believe that relying on the employabilityplan as the standard would allow States to include token activities asparticipation. Proposing disallowances on the basis of non-comparable dataamong the States is not evidently contemplated by the Act. Permitting a``least common denominator'' definition of participation to emerge is notresponsive to the congressional indication that participation be ``significant.''<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart I_Uniform Data Collection Requirements  </ITAG>Uniform Data Collection Requirements (andSection; 250.80 of the Final Regulations) The Family Support Act imposes substantial reporting requirements relatedto the JOBS program and its attendant child care provisions. Section 487(b)of the Social Security Act contains a minimum set of uniform reportingrequirements that may be augmented as the Secretary determines. Section403(e) requires, among other data elements, that a State provide informationon the use of child care by AFDC recipients.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters suggested that the reporting requirementswere drastically expanded beyond the requirements of the Act creating excessiveadministrative burdens and diverting funds from provision of services toreporting.  <T3>Response: </T3>With the exception of data elements needed to determineif a State qualifies for enhanced FFP, commenters cited no particular dataelements as being beyond the requirements of the Act. The final regulationscontain some additional data elements and some changes to those initiallyproposed. Most of the required data elements are directly related to anexplicit or implicit statutory requirement. The rationale for these isdiscussed below.  Implicit Data Requirements  Certain reporting requirements are implicit because enhanced FFP is basedon meeting certain levels of participation and on spending at least 55percent of the State's JOBS funds for specified target groups.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that implicit reporting requirementsto determine whether a State qualifies for enhanced FFP were beyond anyprovision of the Family Support Act.  <T3>Response: </T3>The language of section 487(b) expressly provides thatthe uniform reporting requirements may include ``* * * such other mattersas the Secretary may determine.'' We find reporting requirements implicitin the participation and target group provisions of the Act. We believeit would be unreasonable and infeasible to calculate a State's eligibilityfor enhanced FFP in the absence of data by which to make the percentagedeterminations required by the Act. We have not amended the regulations. Required Reporting  The final regulations provide for three kinds of reporting. First, it requiresthat the State submit electronically on a monthly basis a sample of unaggregatedcase records of JOBS participants scheduled to participate in a component,actively engaged in assessment or employability planning, or who had ajob entry in the sample month or the month previous to the sample month. The sample must include a minimal set of data as prescribed in andSection;250.82. The case records must be identified by a federally described, butState supplied, substitute for the Social Security Number. A State willbe required to maintain in its files a link between the identifier andthe Social Security Number.  The sample in a State must be of sufficient size to provide accurate dataat the State level, plus or minus two percentage points for an 0.2 attribute,at a 95 percent confidence level. This results in a maximum sample sizeof 1,537 cases annually for a State with a large JOBS program.   Second, the State must submit aggregate reports on a quarterly basis ofthe number of non-exempt AFDC recipients in political subdivisions of theState in which JOBS is operated, plus any additional aggregate reportsnecessary to fulfill reporting requirements not met by the sample.   Third, in lieu of a cost tracking system that would identify all titleIV-F funds spent on each individual member of the State's target population,a State may submit an annually updated table of average total unit costper component. The total unit cost per component must include  associatedadministrative and case management costs. The table must also include anaggregate unit cost for a precomponent activity (assessment and relatedtesting, and employability development planning) that includes associatedadministrative and case management costs. The State's sample of unaggregatedcase record data will be used in conjunction with the State's table ofcosts to determine whether the State has met the 55 percent requirement.In the same way we will develop the amounts spent per family by componentand activity, as required by section 487(b) of the Act.  Sample Reporting  We developed this approach as an alternative to requiring periodic aggregate,hard-copy reporting. We require this sample in lieu of aggregate reportingbecause it will enable States and the Department to meet statutory reportingrequirements, provide more useful information to Congress and the ExecutiveBranch of the Federal government, and be less burdensome to States.  The regulations provide that any State may submit 100 percent of its unaggregatedcase records, rather than develop a sample that would approach the universein order to achieve the required levels of precision.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that too large a samplewould be required to meet the proposed precision and confidence levels,and contended that the workload involved in the proposed JOBS sample wouldbe far in excess of the value of the precision obtained.  <T3>Response: </T3>We agree and have amended the regulations to requirea sample that will yield a precision of plus-or-minus 2 percent for an0.2 attribute at a 95 percent level of confidence. We note that this changeshould reduce a State's requisite sample size by a factor of six. On review,we concluded that a precision of plus-or-minus one percent would providea larger sample of case records than is necessary.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several States commented that their smaller AFDC populationsmade the option of submitting the universe in lieu of a sample attractive,and they requested that the option be retained in the final regulations. <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations clarify and retain the option.   <T3>Comment: </T3>A few States commented that electronic submission ofdata would be difficult without significant systems support and technicalassistance. Several other States commented that this would present no problem,and that they appreciated the option.  <T3>Response: </T3>We are providing systems support as described in andSection;250.81. We will be providing both technical assistance and technology transfersas the circumstances warrant.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several States commented that they would prefer to sendhard-copy data in tables of federally prescribed format, rather than unaggregatedcase record data. They  expressed concern about loss of control of useof the data, how the Department could use the data for unspecified purposes,and how they believed unaggregated data contravened congressional intent.Several other States commented that the submission of unaggregated caserecord data freed them from the tedious complexities of compiling derivativedata and assembling reports in federally prescribed formats.<T3>Response: </T3>We continue to believe that an electronically drawnsample of unaggregated case record data, transmitted to the Departmentby disk, tape or data transmission greatly reduces the burden on the Statesto meet the Federal reporting requirements. In addition, the data willenable us to provide much greater information to Congress and the ExecutiveBranch. We anticipate being significantly more responsive to governmentalneeds and to enhance public understanding of the program.   Outcomes Data  <T3>Comment: </T3>Numerous commenters favored the addition of outcome datato the case record requirements, while two commenters opposed their inclusionat this time. The comments in favor of outcomes expressed three broad sentiments.One was a perceived excessive emphasis on participation, which would driveprogram operations towards the meeting of quotas not necessarily relatedto outcomes connected to client self-sufficiency. A second was the generalbelief that outcomes should be reported, either because they will be betterindicators of program impact, or because the States anticipate there willultimately be federally required outcome data, and States should have thebenefit of being able to include the basic data elements in their automatedsystems now. The third was a small group of States that went beyond thegeneral suggestion, and submitted extensive suggestions of particular outcomemeasures.   <T3>Response: </T3>We have amended the regulations at andSection; 250.82to require certain outcome data concerning job entry. We include thesedata since employment as a means to self-sufficiency and independence fromwelfare is the objective of the JOBS program. We also understand States'concern that they be given sufficient indication at the program's inceptionto include outcome data in the design or modification of their automatedsystems, rather than face a future requirement for potentially costly andinconvenient systems modifications, and the possible necessity to reconstructdata on outcomes. However, we are not currently in a position to specifydata elements that might relate to the performance standards specifiedin the Statute. Nevertheless, States are permitted to add data elementsthey deem appropriate for State functions as long as Federal data requirementsare met.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Two commenters suggested that the potential for misinterpretationof outcomes data was so great that while the need was acknowledged, theyargued for deferral. One State suggested deferral at least until Federaland State staffs can review and assess the results of the studies calledfor in section 203 of the Statute. Another State argued that gross outcomeswould be inherently misleading, since the only meaningful measure of programimpact is the amount of net impact from the program, as compared to thelevels of outcomes that would have occurred without benefit of the program'sinterventions.  <T3>Response: </T3>We agree with the final comment and have decided tomaintain the distinction between the tallying of outcomes_particularlygross outcomes, even when limited to those that follow directly from componentparticipation_ and the legislative mandate to develop performance standardsand propose them to the appropriate committees of the Congress. Many ofthe suggested outcomes data were in fact proposals for performance measuresrather than outcomes data. We will retain these suggestions for our laterwork on performance standards.  <T3>Comment: </T3> One commenter noted that the Statute, while requiringa good deal of specific data, is silent about any outcomes data requirement.Another commenter indicated that the Congress was fully aware of the extensivedata reporting requirements that they placed in the Statute, yet suggestedthat were Congress to look favorably on any expansion of the specifieddata requirements, it would be in the area of outcomes.   <T3>Response: </T3>We have amended the regulations to require the inclusionof outcomes data related to job entry from or following participation,in the case record data. We have noted elsewhere that we will count thehours of work towards a State's participation rate if the job entry isdirectly from a component (including job development or job placement)or follows component participation by no more than 31 calendar days. Tobe consistent, we are restricting the tally of job entries that will beregarded as outcomes of the program. Persons who are assigned to JOBS butare never involved in a component by the State JOBS program and find jobson their own will not be included in the tally of ``JOBS outcomes.'' State Data Systems Options (andSection; 250.81 of the Final Regulations) Given the large number of individuals who may participate in the JOBS programand the detailed nature of the subcategories of data required by the Statute,we believe that it is unlikely that a State can either operate its programeffectively or meet the minimum requirements in the Statute without anautomated client-based information system. Therefore, andSection; 250.81permits various rates of FFP for different parts of the system needed tooperate the JOBS program effectively. For the sake of distinguishing thissystem from all others in a State's welfare data system, we refer hereand in the definitions in andSection; 250.1, to a State's JOBS AutomatedSystem, or JAS.  All requirements at andSection; 95.601 <T3>et seq., </T3>and andSection; 205.35 through andSection; 250.38 must bemet with regard to any funding for a State's JAS.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Numerous commenters were concerned that the NPRM wassilent on any phase-in period, and that States might consequently be heldresponsible for a fully functioning JAS at the time the State convertedto JOBS.<T3>Response: </T3>We have amended the regulations to indicate that Stateswill have a phase-in period available until at least October 1, 1991. Wehave developed and submitted to OMB for clearance interim hard-copy reportingforms to meet the minimum reporting requirements for determining eligibilityfor enhanced FFP, and for the requirements of section 487(b) and 403(e)of the Act. These reports will apply for FY 1990 and FY 1991 and may beextended if the situation warrants.   Title IV-F funding at 50 percent FFP is available for a State's JAS. TitleIV-A funding, also at 50 percent FFP, is available for the interface betweena State's IV-A system and its JAS, if the State's IV-A system is a non-FAMISsystem. For the interface between a State's JAS and a FAMIS IV-A system,title IV-A FFP is available at 90 percent. A State may, of course, usethe portion of its JOBS entitlement which is matched at 90% (the WIN orWIN Demo share based on FY 1987) for systems development.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that the exclusion of aState's JAS from 90 percent title IV-A funding was arbitrary and an abuseof discretion. Others commented that the JAS was fully as worthy of enhanced(i.e., 90 percent) funding as other systems that had qualified in the past.One State indicated it could not afford to develop a JAS without benefitof 90 percent funding.  <T3>Response: </T3>After careful review of the law and legislative history,we have not amended the regulations regarding enhanced FFP for a State'sJAS, as there is no statutory authority for it. Enhanced FAMIS matchingis only available pursuant to sections 403(a)(3)(B) and 402(a)(30) of theAct to develop title IV-A systems. We have allowed FAMIS funding for newor revised systems when they have met the functional requirement of section402(a)(30) of the Act, for systems ``under this part.'' This part is partA.  The JOBS program is contained in part F. There is no mention in thatpart or anywhere in the Statute of enhanced funding for JOBS systems. Congresshas specifically authorized enhanced funding for systems in other programs,and dealt with enhanced funding for IV-D systems in the Family SupportAct itself.   We define the interface of an automated JOBS program with the title IV-AFAMIS system, for verification of eligibility and reconciliation of data,to include planning, development and implementation of title IV-A sub-systems to: (1) manage information on eligibility factors or target groupmembership; (2) effect notifications and referrals including non-cooperation;(3) check records of applicants and recipients on a periodic basis withother agencies to verify continued eligibility; and (4) notify appropriateofficials when a recipient ceases to be eligible.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One State commented that the definitions of the termsused to describe the interface needed clarification.   <T3>Response: </T3>We agree that much clarification and elaboration willbe required, but we do not agree that this should be attempted in regulations.We have met and will continue to meet with State staff on the developmentof design specifications for both JAS and the JAS interface with a State'sFAMIS or other IV-A system. The products of that work will be providedto the States in Action Transmittals and technical manuals.  Required Case Record Data (andSection; 250.82 of the Final Regulations) This section contains the minimum requirements for the case record thatwill permit us to derive much of the data required by the Statute and theAct as described in andSection; 250.80. We specify this minimum, in part,to support the proposed submission of a sample of unaggregated case recorddata. However, we believe this approach will also assist States to recordsome of the minimum data necessary to operate the JOBS program effectively.States may add additional data elements they deem appropriate for thesepurposes as long as the Federal requirements are met.   In addition to the inclusion of limited outcomes data described in andSection;250.80, we have amended the content of the minimally required data where,upon analysis, we found that data required by provisions of the Statutecould not be derived from the data set as originally described. For instance,we had not originally included the date of birth of the youngest child;this has been added to enable capturing one of the target group populationsspecified in the Act. We have also added an identifier to indicate thatthe individual satisfactorily participated in the JOBS program, as describedin andSection; 250.78(b)(5). The case record data section has been renumbered;the new identifier is at andSection; 250.82(b)(12).  <T3>Comment: </T3>A few States commented that it seems infeasible to recordthe data only for the sample of cases, since it would not be known in advancewhich cases would be in the sample. These States suggested that the databe recorded for all cases.  <T3>Response: </T3>We agree that it will not be known in advance whichcases will be in the sample, and that data should be recorded for all cases.However, the determination that an individual has satisfactorily participatedfor participation rate purposes, in accordance with andSection; 250.78(b)(5),cannot be made until the end of the month, since the number of hours ofactual attendance will not be known until the end of the month. Therefore,a State may choose to collect this data only on sample cases.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A number of commenters suggested additions or clarificationsto the items proposed. These suggestions included: the addition of a codefor applicant status and the addition of a code for sanction.   <T3>Response: </T3>Applicant status was a separate element in the NPRMand is included in program status in the final regulations. We have removedseveral proposed fields and added fields in which to code the startingand ending dates for pre-component activity, component activity, and jobentry. We have not included a data element for sanction since sanctionedindividuals are not included in any calculation.   <T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters suggested the addition of codes forvarious demographics.  <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations at andSection; 250.82 require some demographicdata to be coded as part of the case record data. We expect that any additionaldemographic data that from time to time may be required will be availablefrom the IV-A data base if they are not part of a State's JOBS data base.  <T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters requested clarification of whether theestablishment of a literacy level, particularly through testing, was effectivelyrequired by the presence of a data element.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have clarified in the final regulations that testingis optional, but that where the State elects that option, the recordingof the result in the case record is required.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters requested clarification of how todeal with persons entering a component in mid-month, and how to recordpersons scheduled for more than one component or activity at a time.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have amended the regulations to provide for the beginningand ending dates of participation in pre- component activity and components,which will allow for consideration of partial month participation. Oncethe methodology for computing credit for partial month participation isdeveloped, it will be disseminated in an Action Transmittal.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several States commented that both Federal and Stateinterests in the JOBS program would be well served by State involvementin the development and refinement of the actual data element definitionsand reporting instructions and manuals.  <T3>Response: </T3>We fully agree. We have initiated steps to form workinggroups both for design and content specifications for JAS modules, andfor data element definitions and reporting instructions. We will also involveState staff in the design and specifications for electronic transfer ofdata from the States to the Department.Child Care Reporting We received a number of comments about the uniform reporting requirementsfor child care (found at andSection; 255.6). We decided to answer them herebecause of the substantial overlap between the JOBS and supportive servicessystems.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Two commenters requested clarification of specific childcare data items, such as a definition of ``length of time assisted.'' Onesuggested that ``types'' of family be defined to mean whether the familywas receiving cash assistance or not. <T3>Response: </T3>We do not believe it appropriate to specify the childcare data reporting requirements in more detail under regulations. Becausethese requirements under the Statute are much less extensive and detailedthan the JOBS requirements, we do not see the need for the same type ofelaborate data collection system as is needed for meeting the JOBS requirements.Therefore, the regulations at Part 255 are much less detailed. Furthermore,the level of detail suggested by the commenters (i.e., in terms of preciselydefining data elements) is more appropriate to include in reporting instructions,and we are taking these comments into consideration in developing instructions.In specifying the types of families for which data will be collected, consistencywith the JOBS reporting requirements and the potential burden on Stateswill be primary considerations. However, by law, we must collect data thatdistinguish between recipients and non-recipients, as well as between thosewho have earnings and those who do not have earnings. <T3>Comment: </T3>Two commenters wanted us to require States to reportor document additional child care information, such as receipt of transitionalbenefits; reasons for non-receipt of child care or other services; dateswhen specific information was provided and specific services were received;numbers requesting or needing services; numbers not receiving services;number of children receiving care, by age of child and type of care; amountsspent by type; and methods used to provide care. <T3>Response: </T3>We have amended the regulations at andSection; 250.82to include some of these data in the requirements for the JOBS case record.The additions include information on receipt of child care and other supportiveservices. The value of data on reason for non-receipt of care has beensubstantially reduced because of the changes to Part 255 regarding requirementsto provide child care and supportive services. The Supportive Servicesplan will provide information on the methods used to provide services,and local market rates will provide information on costs for differenttypes of child care. Consistent with our approach under JOBS, and in the interest of limitingthe reporting burden on States, we tried not to go substantially beyondthe child care reporting requirements specified in the Statute. However,we did decide to add one additional item _``type of paid child care arrangements.''This information will be especially helpful in showing how States are implementingthe new child care provisions. The amendment is incorporated in andSection;255.6. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State opposed the requirement for documentation ofchild care data in the case record because such data is not related tothe AFDC budget. It argued that data sufficient to establish an audit trailshould be sufficient. <T3>Response: </T3>Information sufficient to establish an audit trail isrequired for financial purposes. However, that information does not addressthe specific uniform reporting requirements at section 403(e) of the Act.Also, the argument of relationship to the AFDC budget is not relevant.Normally, child care assistance information would not be part the AFDCcase record; rather, it would be part of the JOBS case record or separateIV-A records on child care. <T3>Comment: </T3>Two States wanted us to delay reporting requirements.One suggested that individual-based data not be required immediately. Rather,it wanted States to be allowed to include in their Supportive Servicesplan a description of what data were available, together with its expectationsabout dates when all reporting requirements would be met. <T3>Response: </T3>The Statute does not provide delayed effective datesfor the reporting provisions. However, we recognize that many States willneed time to set up automated systems which will be capable of providingdetailed case record information. Therefore, we have developed interimreporting forms, based on specific statutory requirements, which will bein effect upon OMB approval until more elaborate systems can be put intoplace. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter wanted us to specify that reporting oftransitional child care assistance would cover only State contributions,and not recipient contributions. <T3>Response: </T3>Assistance will be defined more specifically in thereporting instructions. Of course, our primary interest lies in child careassistance actually paid by the State IV-A agency. However, we also needinformation on recipient contributions paid directly to the State becausesuch contributions could require adjustments to claims for Federal matching.Furthermore, as we indicate in our discussions about fee payment systemsin the preamble to Part 256, the State must monitor and enforce contributionsdue directly to providers. If our experience with these requirements indicatesthat such data would be necessary for the proper administration of theprogram, requirements may be established in the future. <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart J_Operation of Jobs Programs by Indian Tribes and Alaska NativeOrganizations </ITAG>Scope and Purpose (andSection; 250.90 of the Final Regulations) The Statute provides that Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizationsmay apply to the Secretary by April 13, 1989 for direct funding to conducta JOBS program. Tribal (refers to both Indian Tribes and Alaska Nativeorganizations) groups had to apply by this date in order to receive directJOBS funding in any future year.  The Department issued initial application guidelines (FSA-AT-89-11) onFebruary 24, 1989, to officials of federally recognized Indian Tribes andAlaska Native organizations. Based on comments received from Tribal leaders,requesting that the April 13, 1989 application not be treated as a finaldocument, and on the fact that we were still developing Federal policyat the time these guidelines were issued, we advised Tribal applicantsthat we would not disapprove their applications based on their initialsubmittal. We issued further guidelines (FSA-AT-89-14) on April 27, 1989to specify final documentation required in order to permit Tribal granteesto begin their JOBS programs prior to the issuance of final regulations.  Eligible Indian Tribe and Alaska Native Organization Grantees (andSection;250.91 of the Final Regulations) The regulations clarify the general eligibility requirements of the Actconcerning Indian Tribes. They reflect congressional intent that an IndianTribe must be recognized by the Federal Government as eligible to receiveservices from the Bureau of Indian Affairs (BIA) in order to be eligiblefor the JOBS program. Specifically, Report 100-37 of the Senate Committeeon Finance (p. 39) states that ``* * * an Indian tribe is any tribe, band,nation, or other organized group or community of Indians * * * that isrecognized by the Federal government as eligible for services from theBureau of Indian Affairs and is located on a reservation * * *.'' In addition, consortia or Tribal organizations representing eligible Tribesmay operate a JOBS program if they meet certain conditions. These conditionsprovide that such consortia or organizations have the managerial and administrativecapacity to operate the program and have received documented authorityfrom the participating Tribes to conduct the program on their behalf.<T3>Comment: </T3>Three commenters stated that a consortium should notbe unnecessarily limited by ``geographic proximity.''  They proposed thatwe should take into account similar governmental status, organizationalstructure, population characteristics and existing consortium arrangements.One State advised that it has Tribal consortia for Administration of Agingprograms, WIC nutrition programs and JTPA that are not based on contiguousgeographic boundaries and have a long history of operating very effectively. <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations do not limit a consortium or Tribe tooperating a JOBS program on behalf of eligible Tribes which are geographicallycontiguous to each other.  We will take into account existing consortiumarrangements.  By requiring geographic proximity, we intend to precludeconsortia from forming to serve Tribes that are scattered throughout thecountry. Selection Criteria for Eligible Alaska Native Organizations (andSection;250.92 of the Final Regulations)  The Act is very specific about the program eligibility of Alaska Nativeorganizations. It limits Departmental approval to only one applicationfrom an Alaska Native organization for each of the 12 geographical regions. These regulations establish criteria which the Department will use todesignate the Alaska Native organization grantee. The criteria are verysimilar to those used by JTPA in designating Native American grantees forits program. However, since under the JOBS program the Alaska Native granteemust serve all eligible Native Alaskans residing in the region in whichthe grantee is located, we have specifically required that the granteedemonstrate either that it has previous experience in operating regionwideprograms or that it can establish the capability to effectively administerthe program throughout the region. Funding Formula (andSection; 250.93 of the Final Regulations)  The Act specifies that JOBS funding for an Indian Tribe is based on thenumber of adult members of the Tribe receiving AFDC compared to the totalnumber of adult AFDC recipients in the State. The formula for Alaska Nativeorganizations is based on the number of adult Alaska Natives receivingAFDC who reside within the boundaries of the region which the Alaska Nativeorganization represents compared to the total number of adult AFDC recipientsin the State of Alaska.  Since the Act does not establish a designated geographical service areafor Tribes, as it does for Alaska Native organizations, the regulationsdefine such an area. The Tribe will receive JOBS funds based on the numberof adult members of the Tribe receiving AFDC who reside in the designatedservice area as compared to the total number of adult AFDC recipients inthe State. As defined, the designated area creates a manageable programservice area which includes Tribal members who could realistically be servedby the Tribe. The State IV-A agency will be expected to provide JOBS servicesto Tribal recipients outside of the designated area. A designated servicearea concept is used in various other programs such as JTPA, the CommunityServices Block Grant and those under the BIA.   The State IV-A agency and Tribes or organizations have a mutual responsibilityto share all available information so a funding level can be calculated.Accordingly, the regulations specify that the State IV-A agency and theTribe or organization must exchange available information on adult TribalAFDC recipients needed to determine the estimated number of the eligibleTribal recipients and to define the designated service area, if other thanthe reservation or trust lands, as appropriate. This requirement reflectsthe fact that the State IV-A agency is the most appropriate source of datarelating to AFDC recipient status. However, many State IV-A agencies cannotidentify individuals in their caseload by Tribal affiliation and thus willprobably need membership or residence information from Tribes or organizationsto verify Tribal AFDC recipient status.  We recognize that the State IV-A agency and Indian Tribes or Alaska Nativeorganizations may have difficulty developing data on adult Tribal AFDCrecipients, especially using the definition of adult recipient containedin the Act (i.e., an individual other than a dependent child,  includinga minor custodial parent of another dependent child, who is receiving AFDC).  Because of these data deficiencies, we strongly encourage Indian Tribesor Alaska Native organizations and State IV-A agency to enter into agreementswhich establish population estimates, as well as service area definitions,as appropriate. If a State IV-A agency and Tribe or organization cannotagree on the number of Tribal eligible recipients or the designated servicearea, the Department will, in consultation with the Tribe or organizationand the State IV-A agency, make the final determination.   Non-Tribal recipients in a designated area are subject to the requirementsof the State's JOBS program. However, a State IV-A agency may through contract(or other referral arrangement) authorize an Indian Tribe grantee to servenon-Tribal members residing in the designated service area.  The StateIV-A agency may only delegate to an Indian Tribe grantee those functionswhich do not involve agency discretionary judgment, as discussed in andSection;250.10 and related sections of the preamble.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters proposed that we use the  currentdefinition and procedures contained in the BIA regulations at 25 CFR 20.1(r)which define ``near reservation.'' Another commenter asked that we define``reasonably accessible'' as it is used in andSection; 250.93(a)(1) whichdefines designated service area. In this regard, questions were raisedas to whether a Tribe can exclude from the designated service area a portionof the reservation and whether Tribes can redefine the service area ata later date.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have amended the regulations to specify that thedesignated service area can not extend to areas or communities which arenot designated by the Commissioner of Indian Affairs as ``near reservation''as defined at 25 CFR 20.1(r). We chose this definition because the BIAservice areas are well established and recognized by other Federal programsand States and Tribes, and we believe that it is an acceptable standardfor JOBS purposes. We have further revised the regulations to allow a Tribeto exclude from its designated service area a portion of the reservationwhich is remote from that part of the reservation where JOBS services areprovided. This will permit greater participation in JOBS by Tribal membersliving in the excluded area of the reservation to whom a State JOBS programis available. A Tribe may redefine the designated service area by submittingan amendment to the application as provided at andSection; 250.97(d).<T3>Comment: </T3>A number of commenters proposed that regulations at andSection;250.93(a)(1) which describe the JOBS funding formula be changed from ``thenumber of adult members of the Indian Tribe'' to ``the number of NativeAmerican adults.'' This would permit Tribes or organizations to serve allIndians receiving AFDC and living in the designated service area.  OneState that commented suggested that this would be better than contractingwith the Tribe to serve non-Tribal members because of the necessity ofrunning two different programs. Furthermore, it would be consistent withthe approach taken by JTPA and BIA Tribally-contracted programs. Anothercommenter stated that there was nothing in the regulations which specifiesthat a State agency may contract with a Tribe to serve non-Tribal members. <T3>Response: </T3>The Secretary has no authority to provide direct fundingto a Tribe on behalf of an individual who is not a member of the Tribe.The statutory language and legislative history specify that the amountof funds provided to an Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organization is basedon the ``number of adult recipients of such tribe'' receiving AFDC. However,we have defined Tribal member in the regulations at andSection; 250.93(a)(3)to mean a person who is enrolled in, or certified as meeting the membershiprequirements by the designated official of, that Indian Tribe or AlaskaNative organization. Under regulations at andSection; 250.13, however, Statesmay through contract (or other referral arrangement) authorize a Tribalgrantee to provide services under JOBS to non-Tribal members living inthe designated service area. Also, the Tribe can serve non-Tribal memberson a voluntary basis.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked whether AFDC applicants and recipientscan be required as a condition of eligibility to provide Tribal statuson their applications.  <T3>Response: </T3>We are amending andSection; 250.93 to provide that a Statein which there is a Tribal JOBS program in operation or a pending applicationmay require applicants and recipients living in the designated servicearea to provide Tribal membership status as a condition of eligibilityfor AFDC under certain conditions.   There are programmatic reasons why this is necessary.  However, in orderthat the State IV-A agency exercise care in requesting this information,Tribal status may only be required under the following conditions: (l)the information is necessary either to determine the number of adult membersof an Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organization who receive AFDC, or tohelp determine whether such individual is to be served by a State or TribalJOBS program; (2) upon requesting Tribal status, the State must explainthe reason this information is requested and refer an individual who isa Tribal member to the Tribal JOBS program for further information; and(3) such information is only requested in those areas in which there isa Tribal JOBS program or an application pending and where State JOBS programsare also in operation; and (4) the information requested must relate onlyto membership in those Indian Tribes or Alaska Native organizations operatingor expected to operate a JOBS program in the area.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter was concerned that if the State servesor contracts with the Tribe to serve non-Tribal members it would createthe potential for inequitable treatment because of the variation in thetwo programs.  The commenter asked whether the State would be liable fordeficiencies if the State program requirements were not met.  <T3>Response: </T3>While the State may contract with the Tribe or organizationto serve non-Tribal members, the State is not required to ensure identicalservices to non-Tribal members living in the designated service area. However,the State must assure that the services provided through the Tribal programare appropriate in terms of the assigned individual's assessment and employabilityplan. If a State contracts with the Tribe or organization to serve non-Tribalmembers, it may limit the contract to the same services as are providedfor Tribal members but it must retain responsibility for ensuring thatthe Tribe or organization fulfill the terms of the contract. Any differencesin program services should be identified in the State plan.   <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter asked whether a member of a Tribe thatadministers a JOBS program is considered a non-Tribal member if the individuallives on a reservation with another Tribe. The commenter also asked whether,if a Tribe serves non-Tribal members, through a contract with the Stateor on a voluntary basis, the Tribe is required to report activities subjectto Federal reporting requirements to the State.   <T3>Response: </T3>Section 250.93 of the regulations provides that a Tribalgrantee's share of program funds is based on the ``number of adult membersof the Indian Tribe receiving AFDC who live in the designated service area.''This means that a Tribe may not receive direct funding on behalf of anAFDC recipient who resides outside his or her Tribe's designated servicearea regardless of the fact that he or she lives on a reservation withanother Tribe who has also implemented JOBS. If a Tribe agrees to servenon-Tribal members in its designated service area based on a contract withthe State, the Tribe will be required to report to the State informationon activities subject to Federal reporting requirements.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that an Indian AFDC recipientliving in areas served by both a State program and a Tribal program shouldbe able to choose the program in which he or she will participate as ispermitted in some other Federal programs. Two of the commenters proposedthat if a Tribal member chooses a State JOBS program, the funding shouldtransfer to the State. One commenter asked that we clarify whether a TribalJOBS program has the power under andSection; 250.93(a)(1) and andSection; 250.95(e)to require all its Tribal members to be served only through its programrather than through a State program.  <T3>Response: </T3>When an Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organization optsto implement a JOBS program, the Tribal allocation of Federal funds, asspecified in andSection; 250.93(a)(1), is based on the number of adult membersof the Tribe who are AFDC recipients residing in the Tribe's designatedservice area. This amount reduces the allotment of the State in which theTribe or organization is located. The JOBS funding formula does not providefor funds to be diverted from the Tribe to the State where Tribal members'living in the designated service area participate in the State JOBS program.Therefore, a State is not required to provide services under JOBS to Tribalmembers living in the designated service area. While a State may serveTribal members who wish to participate in a State program, using the State'sshare of JOBS funds, the Tribe may require that a Tribal member livingin the designated service area participate in the Tribal JOBS program ratherthan the State program.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters supported the waiver of matching fundsrequirements for Tribal governments as a condition of receiving FederalJOBS funds. However, they believe this creates an inequity because fundsprovided to serve Indian JOBS participants will be based on a smaller percapita amount than non-Indian JOBS participants. They asked this inequitybe resolved through enhanced Federal funds for Tribal JOBS programs. Othercommenters stated that the allocation to the Tribe should not be in anyway dependent upon the amount of funds appropriated by a State legislature. <T3>Response: </T3>The funding formula is prescribed by Statute.  EnhancedFederal funding for a Tribal JOBS program would be inconsistent with theStatute. Action by a State  legislature has no effect on the amount offunding for a Tribal JOBS program, since only Federal funds are involved.<T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter proposed that the regulations should requirethat Tribes operating programs in a multi- State environment develop programswhich will ensure that Tribal members living in a given State derive benefitsand services in direct proportion to the funds granted to the Tribe fromthat State's allocation. This would avoid situations where multi-statefunds granted to a Tribe are not spent equitably in various States.  <T3>Response: </T3>The funding formula established by the Statute doesnot require a Tribe or consortium operating a JOBS program in several Statesto target those funds proportionately. A regulatory provision to requireproportionate spending would take flexibility away from a Tribe or consortiumto design the most effective JOBS program for all of its members.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters suggested that andSection; 250.80 and andSection;250.82 with respect to data collection are not necessarily the most appropriatefor Tribal JOBS programs. They suggested that we work with Tribal groupsto design reporting requirements and systems suitable for JOBS which buildupon systems already in place for similar job training and social servicesactivities such as JTPA.  Several of the commenters suggested that we notrequire submission of participant information in electronic form as manyTribal systems are not currently designed to meet such a requirement, andthe limited number of participants would make such electronic submissioninappropriate for most, if not all, Tribal programs.  <T3>Response: </T3>We agree andSection; 250.80 and andSection; 250.82 relatingto data collection are not necessarily appropriate for Tribal JOBS programs.Therefore, we are amending andSection; 250.96 to include waivers of theseprovisions. We expect to issue an Action Transmittal following publicationof these regulations which will address the reporting requirements forTribal grantees.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters recommended that States modify theirdata systems to collect information on Indian recipients by reservation,Tribal affiliation, residence and county, since 127 Tribes and organizationshave applied for direct funding nationwide.  <T3>Response: </T3>We do not anticipate that it will be necessary to requirea State to collect information on Indian recipients by reservation, etc.Under andSection; 250.93, a State has the option to require disclosure ofTribal membership as a condition of eligibility for AFDC. We believe thatTribes and the State IV-A agency should be able to work out data collectionunder a cooperative agreement. We will revisit the issue if this becomesa problem.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Regulations at andSection; 250.12(e) require a State toexchange certain information with an eligible Indian Tribe or Alaska Nativeorganization interested in conducting a separate JOBS program. One commentersuggested that this provision should be revised to make clear States mustcoordinate and exchange information with all Tribes, not just those operatinga program funded by HHS. Therefore, the commenter suggests that we delete``interested in conducting a separate JOBS program under andSection; 250.91.'' <T3>Response: </T3>Sections 250.12(e) and 250.93 require that the  StateIV-A agency and Indian Tribes or Alaska Native organizations exchange informationpertaining to implementation of JOBS. The State is required to assure coordinationof JOBS program services, including child care pursuant to andSection; 255.3(h)of the regulations, with related services provided by other agencies, includingTribal agencies operating programs under Departments other than HHS. Wehave no authority to require a State to coordinate and exchange informationwith all Tribes for purposes other than JOBS. Program Administration, Implementation and Operations (andSection; 250.94of the Final Regulations)  Program Administration  Under the final regulations, the Tribe or organization must designate anadministrative entity, such as the social services agency or the TribalJTPA agency, to be responsible for the administration of the JOBS program. This responsibility for program administration includes all the requirementsunder the Act, unless waived under andSection; 250.96, as well as applicablerequirements under all other related Federal regulations. Such regulationsinclude the general funding provisions under part 92 which are generallyapplicable to Tribal administration of Federal programs (as reflected inandSection; 250.13 and andSection; 250.77 of the regulations) and the jointDepartment of Health and Human Services/Department of Labor regulationsat Part 251 which cover worker's issues such as working conditions anddisplacement.  The responsibility to administer JOBS means that the Tribe or organizationmust maintain overall responsibility for the design and operation of theprogram. However, final regulations at andSection; 250.10 permit Tribes ororganizations to delegate some JOBS functions and activities which involvedecision-making with regard to individual participants to entities otherthan the Tribal agency designated to operate JOBS, e.g. assessment, prioritydeterminations, provision of component services, case management and conciliation.This is permissible so long as there are specific rules and regulationsissued by the Tribal agency governing their implementation. Such entitiesmust not have the authority to review, change, or otherwise substitutetheir judgment for that of the Tribal agency. Certain functions, such asdetermining exemption status, determining whether to sanction a participant,and holding hearings must be performed by the designated Tribal agencyunless a waiver under andSection; 250.96 is granted. However, final regulationsclarify that certain other related functions, such as imposition of sanctions,are retained by the State IV-A agency based on its responsibility to administerthe IV-A program. For instance, if the Tribe or organization determinesthat an individual has failed to meet participation requirements, the StateIV-A agency is responsible for making the necessary AFDC payment changes,after the individual is afforded appropriate due process.  Part 255 requires that the State IV-A agency (which receives matching Federalfunds under title III of the Statute to guarantee child care for JOBS participants)provide necessary child care for Tribal participants either directly orthrough contract with the Tribe or organization. Also, under Part 256 theState IV-A agency is responsible for transitional child care benefits. Because of these interrelated functions, we encourage the State IV-A agencyand Tribal grantees to enter into agreements to develop the referral andoperating procedures necessary for effective program implementation.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter requested that the IV-A agency retain theresponsibility for determining whether Tribal AFDC recipients are subjectto participation in JOBS.  Giving Tribal grantees the responsibility willrequire that Tribal JOBS programs set up and maintain a client trackingmechanism to determine when changes, such as birthdays, change in schoolattendance, birth of a child, etc., occur which would change status. WhileAFDC eligibility systems and procedures are currently set up to performthese functions, they are not set up to give notice to Tribes when suchchanges occur. Another commenter suggested that it will be extremely difficultto verify both IV-A eligibility and JOBS participation when two organizationsadminister the program.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 250.94(a)(3) specifies that the Tribal  agencydesignated to administer JOBS may not delegate or contract out any functionswhich involve agency discretion, except as provided in andSection; 250.10,such as program participation requirements and determining who should participate.Therefore, the Tribal agency must define exemption and participation criteriaand must retain the final responsibility for determining whether, in fact,a Tribal AFDC recipient is subject to participation in the Tribal program.However, this does not preclude the Tribe or organization from arrangingwith the State to maintain a tracking mechanism for identifying statuschanges and to notify either the Tribe or organization or the Tribal AFDCrecipients. We encourage States to alter their computer systems to providesuch support. FFP will be available under title IV-F for that portion ofthe system. States need not, however, verify Tribal JOBS participation. <T3>Comment: </T3>A commenter asked whether a Tribal member who is sanctionedfor failure to participate may appeal the sanction to the State IV-A agency. <T3>Response: </T3>No. It is the Tribal grantee's decision whether or notan individual should be sanctioned. This decision cannot be overturnedby the State. However, the State IV-A agency retains the function of imposingthe sanction and is responsible for making the necessary payment changesafter the individual has been provided due process. The individual canappeal the amount of the reduction to the State IV-A agency.<T3>Comment: </T3>A commenter suggested that we include in the final regulationsa processing time for a State to impose a sanction following notificationfrom the Tribe or organization. The commenter suggested that 45 days wouldbe a reasonable processing time in order to provide time for notifyingthe AFDC recipient of the sanction.   <T3>Response: </T3>The State IV-A agency is responsible for imposing thesanction following notification by the Tribe or organization. We believethat we should not prescribe a specific timeframe for the State to effectthe sanction.  The State should have flexibility to establish a reasonabletime limit.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters proposed that Tribes and Alaska Nativeorganizations be permitted to use existing participant grievance procedures,such as JTPA, rather than be required to establish a separate process.Another commenter asked that we permit simplified procedures suitable tothe size of the Tribe's program to avoid placing excessive administrativeburdens on small Tribes.  <T3>Response: </T3>Tribes or organizations may apply under andSection; 250.96(b)for a waiver of the requirement that the Tribal JOBS agency conduct thehearing, in order to use existing participant grievance procedures. TheTribe or organization must document that it is inappropriate for the TribalJOBS agency to conduct the hearing, given the size of the Tribal JOBS program,and that the alternative procedure to resolve JOBS disputes meets the dueprocess requirements of <T3>Goldberg v. Kelly.  </T3>Implementation  The regulations permit the Tribe or organization to begin its JOBS programbefore the State implements its program. This provision reflects the sovereigntyof the Tribe or organization to operate its program to the full extentallowable under the Act. The requirement at andSection; 255.2(f) for theState IV-A agency to guarantee child care necessary for Tribal members'participation is not effective prior to the State implementation date.However, this section (andSection; 250.94) of the regulations provides optionsto permit a Tribe or organization to conduct its program prior to the State'simplementation. During the period prior to the State's implementation ofthe program, these options permit the Tribe or organization to either guaranteenecessary child care for its participants or to operate its program onan entirely voluntary basis. These provisions are discussed in detail inandSection; 250.95 and accompanying preamble concerning supportive services. Also, to provide sufficient opportunity for the Secretary's review andapproval, the regulations and the initial application guidelines (FSA-AT-89-11and 14) require that the Tribe or organization submit its application withfinal documentation to the Department at least 45 days prior to implementation.Similar to the requirements for the State IV-A agency at andSection; 250.20(b),the regulations provide that the Tribe or organization may not begin itsJOBS program prior to approval by the Secretary.  Prior approval is necessarygiven the complexity of the program, the needed interface which must occurbetween the Tribal applicant and the IV-A agency, and the fact that Tribalprograms represent a whole new direction for welfare work programs.   <T3>Comment: </T3>Two commenters suggested that Tribes should be givengreater flexibility on start dates for Tribal programs. They should beallowed to start their JOBS program on the first day of any month, andshould not be limited to starting their programs on the first day of anyquarter. Furthermore, the commenters stated that there should be flexibilityfor starting a JOBS program later than October 1, 1990 to allow for State/Tribalcoordination, especially if a State does not intend to start the StateJOBS program until October 1, 1990. Also, the commenters proposed thatTribes be given their entire fiscal year allocation regardless of the quarterin which they start and that they be permitted to carry over funds fortwo years such as is permitted with title IV-B programs and Indian Self-determinationAct contracts.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 204 of the Statute specifies that States mustimplement a JOBS program by October 1, 1990. The Statute also providesthat should a State choose to implement JOBS sooner, it must do so on thefirst day of any calendar quarter prior to October 1, 1990. We read theAct, including this section, to apply to Tribal grantees as well. Thereis no basis for a waiver of this section.  Furthermore, since section 204(b)(2)of the Statute requires that funding be proportional to the quarters theprogram is in operation in a given fiscal year, there is no basis for fundingthe JOBS program for the entire year when the program is in operation forless than four quarters.  With regard to the comments on carrying overfunds, see comments and responses under andSection; 250.70.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Two commenters stated that Tribal governments shouldbe able to use a Tribal council resolution of approval for the final JOBSapplication as an indication of community support for the program, consistentwith the requirements for contract applications under the Indian Self-DeterminationAct. The commenters believe, for such small amounts of funds the regulationsat andSection; 250.94(d)(1)(ii), which require Tribes to hold extraordinarycommunity comment procedures, are burdensome.  <T3>Response: </T3>Section 483(a)(2) of the Act specifies that the StateJOBS plan be made available for public review and comment 60 days priorto submission to the Secretary. The regulations only require a 30-day commentperiod for Tribal grantees. We choose not to waive this requirement, becausewe believe that public participation is an important indication of communitysupport. We do not believe that the comment procedures are burdensome inasmuchas the requirement can be satisfied through public announcements.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters contend that the regulations at andSection;andSection;250.94(d)(3), (4), (5) and (6) require extensive consultation with otherentities. They propose that rather than requiring documentation of suchconsultation, the Tribe or organization should be allowed to use a check-offform that indicates that there has been consultation with the appropriateentities. The commenters also suggested that the words ``required to consult''be changed to ``encouraged to consult,'' because consultation may not alwaysbe available given conflicting schedules.  Furthermore, since Tribal andNavajo private industry councils that exist in Arizona are unique intergovernmentalarrangements that do not exist in other States, regulatory language shouldbe changed to permit alternate sources for obtaining required consultation. <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations require extensive consultation in orderto prevent duplication of services and to assure that other program servicesare available to JOBS participants. The regulations do not, however, requirethat the Tribal grantee submit formal documentation of each discussionit has with an organization identified in andSection; 250.94(d) (4), (5),and (6). Section 250.94(d)(6) provides that the Tribal grantee must consultwith private industry councils and Tribal Employment Rights Offices, asappropriate. Therefore, if such councils do not exist, Tribal granteesshould consult with alternate sources.  Operations  This section of the regulations exempts Tribes and organizations from therequirements of andSection; 250.12 in order to specify appropriate coordinationrequirements for Tribal grantees. Under this section, the Tribe or organizationis required to provide its application to the State IV-A agency prior toits submittal to the Department. This is to ensure that necessary interfacewith the State IV-A agency has been established, including the developmentof agreements or methodologies, to assure that Tribal recipients receiveequitable treatment under both the AFDC and JOBS programs. The regulations also indicate the appropriate agencies and programs withwhich the Tribe or organization must coordinate. The coordination requirementsreflect congressional concern that agencies administering JOBS identifyavailable resources from other programs in order to prevent duplicationof services, to assure that the maximum level of services is availableto participants, and to ensure that costs of these other program servicesfor which welfare recipients have been eligible are not shifted to theJOBS program. This latter provision is closely related to the provisionson maintenance of effort, which are described in andSection; 250.98 and preamble.  Furthermore, although Tribal grantees are subject to andSection; 250.44,which covers mandatory components, they are not  subject to andSection; 250.45,which covers optional components.  Instead, andSection; 250.94(e) requiresTribal JOBS programs to include four mandatory components and at leastone optional component. The following program design modification is expectedto more realistically reflect the special circumstances and needs of Tribalgrantees.    Because the four mandatory components cover basic education, trainingand employment activities, many of which should be available to Tribalparticipants through other program resources, we believe that most Tribalprograms should be able to offer all four components. For example, manyliteracy programs should be available to Tribal recipients through theOffice of Indian Education and, thus, would not be funded under JOBS.  The Tribal program need include only one optional component. Of the fouroptions given to States, two components_community work experience program(CWEP) and the work supplementation program_are integrally linked withAFDC recipient grants. Thus, the final regulations require that adequateoperational agreements be worked out between the State IV-A agency andTribal grantee before the Department can approve these components.   A Tribe is permitted to include, as an optional component, a work experienceprogram as approved by the Secretary or alternative education, training,and employment activities as approved by the Secretary. We would approve,for example, an alternative work experience program which generally meetsthe requirements of a CWEP, JTPA, or BIA work experience program. Tribesor organizations are cautioned that in order to receive approval of alternativeeducation, training and employment activities, such approaches must beconsistent with the purpose of the JOBS program to reduce welfare dependencyand must serve only eligible AFDC recipients. Thus, if JOBS is linked withanother program such as JTPA, a Tribal grantee must be able to validatethat JOBS funds were used only to serve Tribal JOBS participants. Thesestipulations are necessary to protect the integrity of the program.  Basedon congressional concern as well as our careful consideration, the regulationsfurther require that JOBS funds not be used for public service employmentor for allowances.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Two commenters proposed that job search activities shouldnot be required for a minimum of 20 hours per week, because such activitiesare not appropriate in a situation where there are few employers and limitedjob openings. Many reservations are located in rural areas where thereare few jobs available.  <T3>Response: </T3>The regulations at andSection; 250.78, which define participation,were never intended to prevent States, or Tribes or organizations, fromrequiring job search for less than 20 hours per week. Furthermore, participationrequirements are waived for Tribes or organizations under andSection; 250.96(a)(13).Therefore, tribes or organizations may,  require that a participant performjob search activities for less than 20 hours per week.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Most of the Tribal organizations that commented objectedto the language at andSection; 250.94(d)(1)(i), which requires the Tribeor organization to submit applications to the State IV-A agency for ``reviewand comment.'' The commenters believed that this creates a negative precedentfor State intervention in Tribal/Federal relations. The commenters proposedthat the words ``review and comment'' be deleted and suggested that thewords be replaced with ``for purposes of exchanging information and achievingappropriate coordination.'' Another commenter objected to the use of theword ``resolved'' in the requirement at andSection; 250.97(b) to submit plansto States and Tribal members for review and comment.   <T3>Response: </T3>We disagree that the use of the words, ``review andcomment'' permits State intervention in Tribal/Federal  relations. Noris it our intent that the review and comment process impinge upon Tribalsovereignty or the government-to-government relationship between Tribesand the Federal government. The regulations at andSection; 250.20(c)(2) alsorequire the State IV-A agency to make the State JOBS plan available tomembers of federally-recognized Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizationsfor review and comment. In both cases, this means that the State or Tribalgrantee must consider the comments offered in the same way it considerscomments from the public. Section 250.97(b) requires that the Tribe ororganization resolve all comments received at the Tribal level in the sameway that andSection; 250.20(c)(2) provides that the State shall resolve allcomments at the State level. This means only that the Tribe or organizationdecides whether or not to change the application as a result of the comments. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that we allow Tribal programsto make incentive payments to JOBS participants as are currently used inconnection with Tribal Work Experience Program (TWEP) participants. Thecommenters were concerned that JOBS participants would be treated inequitablyrelative to TWEP participants.  <T3>Response: </T3>There is no basis in the Statute or legislative historyfor making incentive payments using JOBS funds to AFDC recipients to participatein JOBS. Furthermore, any such payment made by a Tribal organization wouldhave to be counted as income in determining the amount of the AFDC payment,i.e., the amount of the incentive payment would reduce the AFDC paymentaccordingly.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Regulations at andSection; 250.94(d)(6) require a Tribeor organization to ensure that JOBS funds are used to provide trainingonly for the types of jobs that are currently available or are likely tobecome available. Two commenters stated that since there are not alwaysaccurate labor market projections, the lack of such documentation shouldnot be used as an obstacle to approving a JOBS application. They suggestedthat BIA labor force estimates, which do not indicate employment by typeof jobs, be sufficient for planning purposes if no other data are available. <T3>Response: </T3>The objective of the JOBS program is to provide training,education, job placement and employment to end welfare dependency. Therefore,it is important for Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizations to consultwith other organizations to identify and obtain advice on the types ofjobs that are available within a reasonable distance of the reservation.When there are limited employment opportunities available, it is importantthat there be a plan as to how the education and training will make theJOBS participants self-sufficient. The labor force estimates publishedby BIA report the labor force status of Indians living on and adjacentto reservations, e.g., the number of Indians employed, unable to work,etc.  This report does not provide any guidance as to types of jobs currentlyavailable or likely to become available. We will not disapprove an applicationsolely on the basis that accurate projections or relevant statistical dataare not available but will work with the Tribe or organization to assurethat resources are expended consistent with the objectives of the program. <T3>Comment: </T3>Section 250.94(e) states Tribal programs are not subjectto the requirements of andSection; 250.45, but paragraph (e)(2) specifiesthat Tribal programs must include at least one of the optional componentsunless a Tribe can provide justification that such activities are inappropriate.Two of the commenters found this misleading and suggested that it be rewordedto say that Tribes ``are not subject to requirements of andSection; 250.45but that Tribes may participate at their option.''  <T3>Response: </T3>The commenter's interpretation of this point is incorrect.All of the optional components specified in andSection; 250.45 for Statesare also included in andSection; 250.94(e) for Tribes and organizations.However, the former requires that a State JOBS program include at leasttwo of the components which are identified. Section 250.94(e)(2), on theother hand, specifies that Tribal programs are required only to includeone optional component in their JOBS program and lists some alternativesin addition to those identified in andSection; 250.45. Tribes or organizationsmust include one of the optional components or seek a waiver under andSection;250.96 on the basis that such activities are inappropriate.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter proposed that the regulations at andSection;250.94(e)(2)(v)(B) be changed to permit JOBS funds to be used for publicservice employment as defined by the Tribal Government. Two other commenterssuggested that we define ``public service employment.'' Specifically, theywish to know what is the difference between non-allowable public serviceemployment and allowable public sector placements for WSP and CWEP. Theyare concerned that the majority of reservation-based employment is throughTribal and Federal governments.  <T3>Response: </T3>By public service employment we mean a fully subsidizedjob in a public agency. The regulations do not preclude JOBS funds frombeing used to place Tribal members in jobs with Tribal, State, or Federalgovernments. What it does preclude is filling or establishing a job slotand fully reimbursing the employer for the salary paid to the JOBS participant.<T3>Comment: </T3>Section 250.94(e)(3) provides that a Tribe or organizationmay operate WSP or CWEP only if adequate agreements with the State IV-Aagency are implemented. Two commenters suggested that these agreementsshould be worked out using employer OJT contract formats currently usedby Tribal JTPA and other programs. They proposed that the regulations shouldnot require a formal State/Tribal intergovernmental agreement nor shouldan agreement be required as part of the Tribal JOBS application. Anothercommenter, however, suggested that the scope of agreements should be broadened.The agreements should cover any program function that is interrelated betweenthe State's IV-A program and a Tribe's JOBS program, e.g., eligibilitynotifications, dispute resolution and hearings, imposition of sanctions,etc. The commenter suggested we should not prescribe specific terms ofsuch agreements but should permit them to be tailored to the needs of boththe Tribes and local IV-A agency offices.  <T3>Response: </T3>Because the CWEP and WSP programs are integrally linkedwith the AFDC recipient grants, it is mandatory that adequate operationalagreements be worked out between the State IV-A agency and the Tribal grantee.The regulations do not define the format nor do they require that the agreementbe submitted as part of the application.  However, the Tribal grantee must assure that such agreements exist. Wedo not believe, however, that it is necessary to require operational agreementsto cover all phases of State/Tribal interface. It is best left to the Stateand Tribes or organizations to decide when this is necessary. Supportive Services (andSection; 250.95 of the Final Regulations)   Under the final regulations, the Tribal grantee must provide for the work-relatedsupportive services, such as clothing or transportation, necessary to enablean individual to participate in the JOBS program. Tribes or organizationsmust follow the requirements regarding work-related supportive servicesunder Part 255. The Tribal grantee is given flexibility to determine thetypes of supportive services and methods of delivery but must describethese services and methods in its application documentation pursuant toandSection; 250.97(f)(6).   Since the State IV-A agency is required to provide child care under Part255 of the regulations, this section requires that the Tribe or organizationmust ensure, based on a method which is acceptable to the Tribe or organizationand the State, that necessary child care is available when requiring anindividual to participate in its program. Since the State IV-A agency willbe providing child care services and the Tribe or organization will bedesignating who participates, we strongly encourage Tribal grantee to developwith the State IV-A agency appropriate referral mechanisms to ensure thatTribal participants receive necessary child care services. In addition,we encourage the State IV-A agency to contract with Tribal grantees forproviding child care services for Tribal participants.  The regulations at andSection; 255.2(f) are designed to ensure that the Stateprovides sufficient funds to meet the child care needs of Tribal participantsand that the State uses comparable and appropriate methods of providingchild care for Tribal participants as it uses for non-Tribal participantsin the State. The Tribe or organization may guarantee child care for itsparticipants through other program sources.   If the Tribe or organization begins its JOBS program before the State IV-Aagency, the Tribal grantee can operate an entirely voluntary program. However,after the State implements its JOBS program, the Tribe or organizationmay no longer operate an entirely voluntary program. This provision isconsistent with congressional concern, as reflected by the participationand exemption requirements in andSection; 250.30, that individuals who arereasonably able to participate in the program, and for whom guaranteedchild care is available, should be required to participate.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Two commenters suggested that we should encourage theState IV-A agency to work with all Indian job training programs, includingthose operated by Indian community-based organizations in off-reservationsareas under Title IV of JTPA, to insure that child care services are availableto AFDC recipients in all such training programs.  <T3>Response: </T3>Title IV-A funds are available to provide child carefor JOBS participants and for other AFDC recipients in approved educationand training. We encourage all State IV-A agencies to work with all Indianjob training programs to insure that child care services guaranteed underPart 255 are available. This, of course, would include child care for aJOBS participant who is assigned to an existing Tribal job training program. <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters suggested that the Secretary should exercisewaiver authority and allocate Federal child care funds directly to thoseTribes that opt to implement Tribally-operated child care services. Onecommenter believed that this would provide greater flexibility for Tribeswhile reducing administrative costs for both States and Tribes. Anothercommenter suggested that States should receive FFP for services such aschild care and other required functions without a State matching requirementfor the portion of Federal funds expended in services to  Tribes and organizationsoperating JOBS. The commenter believes that this would be consistent withthe intent of the Act which provides for a JOBS program and support servicesfor Indian Tribes and organizations without requirement of matching share. <T3>Response: </T3>While the Secretary has authority to waive requirementsof section 402(a)(19) and title IV-F of the Act for Tribal programs, FFPfor JOBS participants is not covered in these sections of the Act. Thereis no waiver authority under title IV-A to allocate Federal child carefunds directly to Tribal grantees or to dispense with State matching requirementsfor the portion of Federal funds expended for Tribal services.   <T3>Comment: </T3>It appeared from the comments that some Tribal organizationswere not clear as to responsibility for child support enforcement in relationto andSection; 250.40(b).   <T3>Response: </T3>The requirement at andSection; 250.40(b) has no effecton responsibility for enforcing child support orders.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter stated that the definitions of ``makinggood progress'' and ``making satisfactory progress'' in both educationaland training components refer only to standards approved by State or localagencies. The commenter proposed that the definition should be expandedto substitute approval by Tribal or Alaska Native organizations.  <T3>Response: </T3>We have revised the definition at andSection; 250.1 toreflect this comment.Waiver Authority (andSection; 250.96 of the Final Regulations)  This section indicates that certain requirements of the Act and of theregulations do not apply to Tribal grantees, as they are unique to Stateprograms. These include provisions relating to State agency administration,the State's JOBS funding allotment and State matching requirements. Thus,these have been determined to be inappropriate for Tribal JOBS programsby the Secretary pursuant to his authority under the Act.  A Tribe or organization may also request waivers for any other requirementsof section 402(a)(19) or Part F of the Act not specifically mentioned butmust provide proper justification. The Secretary will consider the appropriatenessof such waivers on a case-by-case basis.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that we add andSection; 250.34and Parts 255 and 256 to the list of waivers which the Secretary considersinappropriate for Tribal JOBS programs.  <T3>Response: </T3>Parts 255 (Supportive Services) and 256 (TransitionalChild Care) are not functions subject to waiver authority. Tribes and organizationsdo not need waiver authority as these provisions are State, and not Tribal,requirements. While many of the provisions of andSection; 250.34 are alsoState and not Tribal requirements, it would be inappropriate to waive aTribe's or organization's responsibility for determining that an individualfailed to meet participation requirements. Application Requirements and Documentation (andSection; 250.97 of the FinalRegulations)  The Tribal application requirements generally follow State JOBS plan requirements,which are discussed in detail in andSection;andSection; 250.20 and 250.21 andrelated preamble.  Under the Act, Tribes and organizations had to apply to the Departmentby April 13, 1989, in order to conduct a JOBS program. Since we were stilldeveloping JOBS policies at the time we released guidelines for Tribalapplications, we advised Tribal groups in the application notice (FSA-AT-89-11)that their April 13 submissions would probably need to be supplemented.On April 27, 1989 we provided additional guidance (FSA-AT-89-14) specifyingdocumentation needed to supplement Tribal applications if the Tribes ororganizations intended to implement a JOBS program prior to issuance ofthese final regulations.  We believe that the application documentation specified in this sectionis necessary in order to provide the Secretary with a sufficient levelof information upon which to base approval. We determined that this  documentationwas needed, based on our review of all the requirements reflected in theAct and those required for State JOBS programs. Because of the complexityof the JOBS program requirements and the degree of program flexibilitywe would like to provide Tribal grantees under our waiver authority, wedo not think these application requirements impose an undue administrativeburden upon Tribal grantees.  The application must serve as the Department'sprimary vehicle for assessing whether a Tribal grantee is meeting the requirementsof the Act and regulations.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters considered the application and documentationrequirements specified at andSection; 250.97 administratively burdensomefor the amount of funds available. They suggested that we allow Tribesto submit a simple application and allow cross-references to establishedadministrative and program procedures and manuals without requiring thesematerials as attachments to their applications.  <T3>Response: </T3>We do not believe that the application and documentationrequirements specified at andSection; 250.97 are unduly burdensome. As wehave indicated above, the application is the Department's vehicle for measuringwhether a Tribal grantee is meeting the requirements of the Act and regulations.We do not need extensive documentation of existing administrative and programprocedures. In most cases, cross references would probably satisfy therequirements. However, most of the documentation we require relates toadministrative and program procedures which must be established in orderto meet the requirements of JOBS.  <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters suggested that, if a Tribal JOBS applicationis disapproved, there be a process, including technical assistance, inplace to assist the Tribes in addressing and correcting the deficienciesin its application. They stated further that initial disapproval shouldnot forever disqualify a Tribe from operating a JOBS program even afterOctober 1, 1990.  <T3>Response: </T3>We currently provide technical assistance to Tribalgrantees and plan to continue to provide such assistance as necessary.The Statute provides that a Tribe or Alaska Native organization had toapply by April 13, 1989 to conduct a JOBS programs and that a JOBS programmay not be implemented later than October 1, 1990. We believe there issufficient lead time for all Tribal grantees to develop and receive approvalfor an application to implement JOBS by that time. Therefore, Tribes ororganizations that did not apply by April 13 or have not implemented aJOBS program by October 1, 1990 are ineligible to operate a JOBS program.Maintenance of Effort for Indian Tribes and Alaska Native Organizations(andSection; 250.98 of the Final Regulations)  Tribal grantees are not subject to the requirements in andSection; 250.72.Section 250.98 sets out maintenance of effort provisions that are moreappropriate for Tribal entities.  The requirements on maintenance of effortreflect congressional concern that JOBS funding not be used to supplantexisting funding for programs which have been available for welfare recipients. This means that JOBS funds should be used only to provide educational,training and employment activities for Tribal participants which are inaddition to those which would otherwise be available. For example, wherea high school education has been available to Tribal members, JOBS fundsmust not be used to pay for this activity. Thus, the Tribal grantee maynot contract for services which are otherwise available on a non-reimbursablebasis pursuant to the regulations at andSection; 250.13.  <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter proposed that when the AFDC-UP programprovision becomes effective, the Bureau of Indian Affairs should continueto provide general assistance under the maintenance of effort provisionsof law. <T3>Response: </T3>This Department has no authority to require BIA to continueto provide general assistance to recipients who become eligible for AFDC.<ITAG tagnum="41">PART 255_CHILD CARE AND OTHER WORK-RELATED SUPPORTIVE SERVICES DURINGPARTICIPATION IN EMPLOYMENT, EDUCATION, AND TRAINING  </ITAG>Purpose (andSection; 255.0 of the Final Regulations)   The purpose of these regulations is to implement section 301 of the FamilySupport Act of 1988. State Plan Requirements (andSection; 255.1 of the Final Regulations)   Title III of the Statute adds section 402(g) to title IV-A of the Act.Thus, child care is not part of the title IV-A plan which is covered insection 402(a) of the Act.  Neither is it included in the State JOBS planunder title IV-F, which is covered in section 482(a) of the Act. In fact,section 402(g) does not address whether a plan is needed regarding theprovision of supportive services.  However, services provided under sections301 and 302 of the Statute must be covered by a separate plan submittedin accordance with these regulations. Further, the State Supportive Servicesplan covering services under section 301 of the Statute must be submittedat the same time as the JOBS plan to ensure appropriate public and Federalreview. The approval process will follow that for the State JOBS plan whichis specified in andSection; 250.20.   The State Supportive Services plan must contain information about childcare services, work-related supportive services, and work-related expensesnecessary for an individual to participate in JOBS or in another approvededucation, training, or employment activity, including a description ofthose services. We also are requiring that the State IV-A agency includea cross-reference to its State Supportive Services plan in its State JOBSplan to show the coordination between the two plans. The specific StateSupportive Services plan requirements are contained at andSection; 255.1.In States where Tribal entities are directly funded to operate a JOBS program,the State Supportive Services plan must include specific information onthe State's provision of child care services for JOBS participants servedby those Tribal entities.   Requiring a Separate Plan  <T3>Comment:</T3> We received general support for our regulations on thissection. However, a few commenters suggested that we not require a separateSupportive Services plan, but require one plan which incorporated boththe JOBS and Supportive Services provisions.   <T3>Response:</T3> We do not believe such an approach would be consistentwith the statutory language at section 482(a)(1)(A) of the Act which requiresthat States establish a JOBS program under a plan which meets all the requirementsof part F and section 402(a)(19), but does not mention 402(g). In a relatedmatter, in paragraph (B) of section 482(a)(1), the Act establishes requirementsfor ``a State plan for establishing and operating'' the JOBS program. Nowheredoes it provide for the inclusion of the supportive services provisionsin this plan. Furthermore, while there is considerable overlap betweenthe two plans, there are two important differences. First, except for thebenefits provided in Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, and the VirginIslands under part 255, the child care benefits described under the SupportiveService plan are funded under a different source than JOBS. Secondly, eligibilityfor services under the Supportive Services plan extends substantially beyondJOBS participants. Thus, there are also programmatic reasons for requiringtwo plans.   At the same time, however, we agree with the comments about the close interrelationshipsbetween the two programs and the need for an integrated approach for dealingwith them. On that basis, we require that the Supportive Services plancovering applicant and recipient services be transmitted together withthe JOBS plan. Furthermore, in developing State plan preprints, we intendto develop one preprint package which would incorporate both the JOBS andSupportive Services plans. We will try to design the preprints so as tofacilitate the integration of the two programs and to minimize the burdenon the States associated with completing two plans.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One State objected to the requirement for a SupportiveServices plan, given the absence of specific statutory authority.   <T3>Response:</T3> Although the title III provisions of the Statute donot explicitly mention a State plan for Supportive Services, there areat least three specific bases for requiring such a plan. First, we believethat a Supportive Services plan is a necessary adjunct to the JOBS plan,as we cannot properly assess the acceptability of a JOBS plan without informationon the nature and scope of supportive services to be provided. Secondly,supportive services are matchable under section 403 of the Act which providesthat payments are made to the States under approved plans.  Finally, section1102 of the Act requires that the Secretary establish rules ``necessaryto the efficient administration of the functions'' with which the Secretaryis charged under the Act. We do not believe the Secretary could fulfillthe statutory obligations under this section unless a State plan whichspecified how the State would meet the requirements of sections 301 and302 of the Statute is required.  Plan Content  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter felt that our plan requirements were extensiveand would require a lot of coordination.   <T3>Response:</T3> In drafting the plan requirements, we tried to limitthe number of requirements so that they would not be too burdensome. Atthe same time, there was a certain minimal amount of information neededto determine whether statutory requirements were being met and to monitorthe appropriateness of expenditures on supportive services.   To the extent that our requirements in this section or elsewhere entailsubstantial coordination with JOBS activities, the child care communityand providers of related educational and supportive services, we believethey are justified, since a successful JOBS program depends on the successfulprovision of supportive services and the development of a coordinated,effective strategy for their delivery.   <T3>Comment:</T3> We received two comments suggesting that additional itemsbe required in the plan_including a description of how transportation needswould be met (e.g., through advance payments or reimbursement) and morematerial related to the meeting of child care standards, coordination andparental access.   <T3>Response:</T3> A few of these suggested changes that would provideinformation helpful in determining how program requirements are being metand in achieving greater compatibility with the JOBS plan. At the sametime, because we are concerned about placing unnecessary administrativeburdens on the State, we did not want to add too many requirements.   Under this framework, we have revised andSection; 255.1 to add the followingrequirements: 1) the State must assure, in arranging care, that it takesthe individual needs of the child into account; 2) the State must specifythe methods it will use for providing transportation and other supportiveservices; 3) the State must describe criteria and procedures it will usefor approving education, training and employment activities for which necessarychild care and supportive services will be authorized for individuals wholive in non-JOBS areas of the State; 4) the State must describe the natureof its efforts to coordinate child care and supportive services with groupsspecified at andSection; 255.3(h); 5) the State must describe its proceduresfor ensuring that center-based care will be subject to State and localrequirements designed to ensure basic health and safety, including firesafety, protections (or a plan for developing such procedures, if noneexist); and 6) the State must specify its policy on transitional supportiveservices. The fourth requirement replaces an assurance requirement whichwas found at andSection; 255.1(e)(2) of the NPRM.  Although we added a requirement for a description of State procedures onbasic health and safety protections for center-based care, we did not alterthe specific requirements for State assurances that all child care meetapplicable State or local laws or that parents have access because thoseitems affect eligibility for Federal matching funds. Therefore, we willbe able to monitor State compliance as part of our review of State expenditures. Furthermore, in andSection; 255.5, we have clarified that States will berequired to report information, upon the request of the Secretary, on theapplicable standards of State and local law, on health and safety requirementsfor center-based care, and on the development of guidelines for familyday care.  As we indicate in the section of the preamble discussing andSection; 255.4,we also added provisions for State specification of a statewide limit andlocal market rates for children with handicaps or special needs for care.We also moved the assurance requirement (regarding hours of child care)previously found at andSection; 255.1(l) to andSection; 255.1(e), where theother assurance provisions are located.  <T3>Comment:</T3> We received comments that it was inappropriate for theState plan to include a description of the priorities to be applied indetermining when needed care will be guaranteed (as required at andSection;255.1(d)). It was considered by some to be particularly inappropriate totalk about priorities for those entitled to transitional child care benefits. <T3>Response:</T3> We agree that the language at andSection; 255.1(d) ofthe proposed regulations confused the nature of the child care guaranteefor JOBS participants and transitional cases, and we, therefore, have deletedit. (Additional discussion about the nature of the child care guaranteeis contained in the response to the next comment and in subsequent sectionsof the preamble.)   <T3>Comment:</T3> Commenters also objected to the proposed regulatory languageat andSection; 255.1(j) where we required the State plan to describe ``howthe State will assure that sufficient child care will be available to meetthe participation standards in 250.74.'' Many felt this language underminedthe child care guarantee. At the same time, some States felt they shouldnot be required to assure that sufficient child care be available to enablethem to meet required participation levels. They argued that States werenot absolutely required to meet the participation standards, but only asa condition of receiving JOBS funds at a higher matching rate.  <T3>Response:</T3> We recognize the problems with our proposed languageand have deleted the provision that was at andSection; 255.1(j) of the NPRM.In writing the NPRM, we wanted to make sure that States understood ourexpectation, and the expectation of Congress as well, that the number ofindividuals participating in education, work and training programs shouldincrease under the JOBS program. For this to happen, child care and othersupportive services necessary for JOBS participation would have to be provided. However, we acknowledge that participation concerns are more appropriatelyaddressed within the context of the JOBS program.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter did not want us to require States to specifymonetary limits for expenditures on different types of supportive services.  <T3>Response:</T3> We believe such limits are important to include to ensureequitable treatment across the State and to ensure the proper and efficientadministration of the program.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to revise the references to Stateand local standards in andSection; 255.1 to recognize Tribal standards, whereapplicable.  Response: We made this revision and corresponding revisionsto andSection;andSection; 255.4(c)(2) and 255.5(a), which also refer to Stateand local standards.  Plan Schedule  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter objected to our requirements that the SupportiveServices plan, especially the part dealing with transitional child care,be subject to the biennial update schedule.   <T3>Response:</T3> We require the Supportive Services plan to be submittedon the same schedule as the JOBS plan because the services provided underthe two plans are so inextricably linked. To the extent a State is notchanging its plan, the biennial update should not entail a major workload.At the same time, it provides a regular opportunity for the State to reviewits policies, assess the availability of child care services, ensure thatcare continues to meet applicable standards of State and local law, andupdate items like local market rates which need regular modifications. Also, we did not separate the plan for transitional child care servicessince those services are subject to many of the same provisions as thecare provided under part 255. Again, where changes are not indicated, thebiennial update should not be overly burdensome.   In the interest of clarity, we did add a reference in andSection; 255.1 ofthe regulations to the schedule requirements at andSection; 250.20.  Eligibility (andSection; 255.2 of the Final Regulations)   Section 402(g) of the Act provides that the State IV-A agency must guaranteechild care to the extent that the State determines necessary for an individualin a family with a dependent child to: (1) accept or maintain employment,or (2) participate in an education or training activity if the agency approvesthe activity and periodically determines that the individual is satisfactorilyparticipating in the activity. (Such education and training is not limitedto activities funded under JOBS.) Where child care is necessary, but notavailable, a State IV-A agency cannot require an individual to participatein an activity or to accept or maintain employment unless it guaranteeschild care.   Child Care Guarantee  The Statute requires the State to guarantee child care for: participantsin a JOBS activity; individuals in other approved education or trainingactivities; and employed individuals. We, therefore, believe that the Stateis obligated to guarantee care even if it has not required an individualto participate or accept employment. This is a change from the approachtaken in the proposed regulations, particularly with respect to the treatmentof volunteers, and will be discussed further in the comment section.  The State IV-A agency must guarantee needed care to recipients who areworking at the time the State implements JOBS as well as to recipientswho begin working at a later date. It must also guarantee care to an individualwho finds employment through JOBS or on her own if the care is necessaryfor her to accept or retain employment. However, the State does have flexibilityin determining how child care needs will be met. For example, the Statemay select the disregard as the method for providing care for employedindividuals.   In areas where child care of the appropriate type cannot be located byJOBS participants, the State must be prepared to assist these individualsin locating care.  Such assistance may take the form of referral to existingchild care resource and referral services, or direct assistance based uponinformation gathered through the State agency's own consultation, coordination,and research efforts. In addition, the State may provide assistance toother AFDC applicants and recipients in locating such care.  However, theState is not required to provide child care directly or to otherwise createchild care services. Where child care cannot be located, an individualcannot be required to participate, or to accept or retain employment. For approved JOBS activities and employment, the State is obligated toguarantee care even if it has not required an individual to participateor accept employment.  However, just as State resources and budgetary constraintsmay indirectly affect the provision of child care for those assigned toactivities under JOBS (whether exempt or non-exempt), those in self-initiatedactivities may also be indirectly affected by State budgetary constraintssince the State has broad discretion in deciding whether to approve suchactivities. This discretion is discussed further in response to the commentsthat follow.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Although some commenters supported our linkage of thechild care guarantee to the availability of resources, JOBS participationrates, State appropriation ceilings, the availability of other services,and agency requirements, many did not. They felt the language underminedthe guarantee for working recipients and for volunteers participating inJOBS. Commenters also suggested that the language seemed to contravenethe requirement in the JOBS program that volunteers from target groupsreceive priority for JOBS services.  <T3>Response:</T3> Based on these comments and further review of the statutorylanguage, we reconsidered our position and decided to make changes to boththe regulations and the preamble. We have deleted any reference to a State'sdetermining who would be provided child care based on the availabilityof resources and the requirement to describe how sufficient child carewould be made available to meet the participation rates described in andSection;250.74. A more detailed discussion of the child care guarantee is containedin the preamble and response to comments.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One State wanted us to clarify that States were not obligatedto provide services to those in self-initiated activities. Another askedus to clarify that States would not be required to provide child care servicesin non-JOBS areas.  <T3>Response:</T3> The Statute allows a State to treat self-initiated educationor training which meets the requirements at section 402(a)(19)(F) of theAct as JOBS participation and to provide associated supportive services,including child care, if the State approves the activity. The State hasfurther discretion to decide the criteria under which other education ortraining would be approved under JOBS, and discretion whether to approveeducation or training for child care and supportive services in non-JOBSareas of the State. However, we do wish to clarify that, at State option,child care and supportive services are allowable for those in educationand training in non-JOBS areas as long as the State IV-A agency has approvedthe activity, and the individual is making satisfactory progress.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters wanted us to clarify that provision ofchild care and supportive services for clients in non-JOBS training isa State option and is not required before implementation of the JOBS program. <T3>Response:</T3> The provisions authorizing child care and other supportiveservices for those engaged in any kind of education or training activitydo not become effective for a State until its JOBS program under titleIV-F is implemented. At that point, the State has broad discretion in thecriteria used for determining whether education or training would be approved.  Informal Care  Consistent with our philosophy on parental choice (discussed later), wewant to ensure that Federal and State policies support parental preference.In many cases, informal care provided by trusted friends or family membersis the parent's preferred source of care. Therefore, we want to make clearthat care provided in this manner is acceptable and must be included asone of the types of care to which families have access.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters expressed concern that informal careprovided by relatives or family friends with no obligation to provide carewas too tentative and unreliable. They felt it was counterproductive torely on such services, especially when care would be needed on a regularbasis over an extended period of time. (In fact, one commenter wanted theregulations to state the advantages of formal care.) Others were concernedthat we were expecting care to be provided for free by persons with nolegal responsibility for a child, that we were not giving adequate considerationto the needs of the child and that we were undermining parental choiceby allowing States to limit families to informal, at-home care.   <T3>Response:</T3> The section on informal care in the preamble of theNPRM caused much confusion. We have re-written the preamble to clarifythe principal reason for our original language_to validate informal careas one of the types of care to which families should have access. We werenot attempting to limit families to informal, at-home care but merely toensure that families have the choice of such care. The one exception tothis provision is the situation where there is another adult in the homewho is responsible for the care of the child (as discussed below).   <T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters wanted us to require that a State agencyaccept the caretaker's assessment that no one at home was capable of providingnecessary child care. In a related comment, it was suggested that individualsbe allowed to determine if informal care was acceptable.  <T3>Response:</T3> We expect the State IV-A agency and the caretaker towork closely together to determine when child care is necessary. However,the ultimate decision about whether care is necessary rests with the individualexcept for a few limited situations. The State may determine child careis unnecessary in situations where: (1) the hours of employment or participationfall within the child's school hours; (2) there are individuals in theassistance unit whose needs are met on the basis of their responsibilityfor caring for the child (e.g., a parent, caretaker or essential person);or (3) there is another legally responsible adult in the home (e.g., anineligible parent or a legal guardian). Exceptions to the latter two situationswould be allowed, on a case-by-case basis, if the family provided informationto the State agency indicating that the ``responsible'' individual couldnot provide appropriate care. Examples of reasons for exceptions wouldinclude cases where the other parent was bedridden or the child was atrisk because of suspected abuse.   Under all other circumstances, (including the use of older siblings, aunts,or grandparents in the home), the individual may choose informal care asher preferred choice of care but may not be required to do so.  By Statute, responsibility for determining the necessity of supportiveservices resides with the State  IV-A agency. This position is incorporatedin andSection; 255.2(c).  Eligible Children  In the final regulations at andSection; 255.2(a), we have limited the guaranteeof child care to those families with dependent children under 13, and thosechildren who are either physically or mentally incapable of caring forthemselves or subject to court supervision, when such care is necessary.Limiting child care to these situations is a reasonable policy, consistentwith the limits enacted for the Dependent Child Care Tax Credit by section703(a) of the Family Support Act, and, which will apply to taxable yearsbeginning after December 31, 1988. These limits reflect widely-held views(reflected in a variety of laws and legislative proposals) on appropriategovernmental participation in expenditures for child care services.   <T3>Comment:</T3> A substantial number of commenters opposed our limitationof the child care guarantee in this manner.  They pointed out that manyStates and other programs had higher age limits or no age limits at all.At least one commenter felt the age standard should be replaced by the``need for supervision.'' A number wanted States to have general discretionin setting an age limit. Some were more supportive of the age 13 as a generalrule for coverage, but wanted greater State discretion to cover childrenover the age of 12. Many were particularly concerned about covering olderchildren who needed special supervision, either because of individual circumstancesor because they lived in neighborhoods which had drug, crime, or relatedproblems.   <T3>Response:</T3> We have determined that it is appropriate to retainthe limit on child care guaranteed under title IV-A to children under 13and to retain the exceptions for children over 13 who are mentally or physicallyunable to care for themselves. However, we have added an additional exceptionwhich would cover care for children aged 13 and over who are subject tocourt supervision. We decided to add the additional exception because werecognized that such children had an officially established need for specialsupervision. We did not feel that an exception was justified for all thoseover 13 needing supervision. Such an exception would be too broad and toodifficult to define; in some States, it would act to obviate the age 13limit.  <T3>Comment:</T3> We also received a few comments on our proposal to requirethe State IV-A agency to guarantee care for children who would be requiredto be in the assistance unit if it were not for the receipt of SSI undertitle XVI or foster care payments under title IV-E. Commenters wanted thisguarantee to be broadened to cover other children in the household whowere not on AFDC (such as undocumented alien children) and incapacitatedolder individuals.   <T3>Response:</T3> We decided not to expand the guarantee of child careto these categories of individuals or to otherwise cover the costs of theircare. The statutory language covering the guarantee refers to families``with a dependent child requiring such care'' and therefore suggests nobroader eligibility than we proposed. We included children who would beAFDC recipients except for their receipt of IV-E foster care or SSI sincesuch children are considered dependent children for other purposes of law;however, they are excluded under the Act from the assistance unit becauseof the receipt of needs-based, Federally-supported benefits.  We recognize the apparent inconsistency between the statutory languagecovering the guarantee and the ``good cause'' language at section 402(a)(19)(G)(iv)(II)of the Act which provides that individuals would have good cause for notparticipating or accepting employment if child care or day care for anyincapacitated individual living in the same home as the dependent childis necessary, but is not available and not provided. However, it is possibleto rationally and fully satisfy both statutory provisions.  The revisedlanguage following subparagraph (D) of section  403(a)(3) of the Act, whichlimits Federal matching for child care expenditures to those made pursuantto section 402(g), also identifies the class of individuals for whom IV-Aexpenditures may be made. These are those identified in the guarantee andinclude only dependent children. It is, therefore, narrower than the classof individuals whose need for care may affect JOBS participation or employment. With the narrower guarantee language, the State must devote IV-A fundsto AFDC dependent children; where broader care needs are identified, theState would have to exempt the individual from participation or pursuealternative sources of care. For example, necessary day care for incapacitatedadults may be provided as a JOBS supportive service.   <T3>Comment:</T3> A few commenters questioned the appropriateness of ourreference to the verification requirements at andSection; 250.30(b)(3) indetermining whether a child aged 13 or over was physically or mentallyincapable of caring for himself. They suggested other medical evidence,eligibility for handicapped or special education programs, and worker determinationsas alternatives.  <T3>Response:</T3> We understand why the reference to andSection; 250.30(b)(3)raised some question since entry into the labor force is not relevant.The point we wanted to make is that the determination of the handicappingcondition had to be made by a physician, or a licensed or certified psychologist. It is the condition, notwithstanding the child's age, that creates a needfor extended care and supervision. We have made changes in andSection;andSection;255.2(a) and 256.2(a) to reflect this position. We decided not to extendthe determination further because we felt the determination should be specificto this purpose and should be made by someone professionally qualifiedto make it.   Child Care for Tribal Programs  The State IV-A agency must provide child care to AFDC applicants and recipientswho are served by a Tribal JOBS program. Such services shall be availableto the same extent that they are available to eligible participants inthe State's JOBS program. The State IV-A agency must provide an equitablelevel of services for Tribal members, and they must provide the same rangeof methods or arrangements, unless certain methods would not be feasiblebecause of the nature of child care services available in Tribal serviceareas.   Other Supportive Services  The Act requires that the State IV-A agency pay for or reimburse the costsof transportation and other work-related expenses, including work-relatedsupportive  services, if the State IV-A agency determines they are necessaryfor an individual to participate in JOBS. For individuals in JOBS componentssuch as education and training, these expenses include both ongoing andone-time special expenses. In addition, we concluded that such servicesmay include one-time, special work-related expenses which would enableindividuals to accept or maintain employment. These are discussed in moredetail under ``Work-Related Expenses.'' On-going expenses related to employmentare already covered by the work expense disregard (which was raised to$90 effective October 1, 1989); therefore, no provision for such expenseshas been made under section 301 of the Statute or these regulations.  The State IV-A agency must define work-related supportive services andwork-related expenses in its Supportive Services plan. It must also describemethods of providing other supportive services, specify monetary limitsfor each type, and indicate the basis for determining the need for thetype of service.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to be more explicit about theState's duty to provide transportation.  <T3>Response:</T3> The regulations already specify that the State agencymust pay for or reimburse transportation and other work-related supportiveservices for individuals in approved activities. We do not see the needto elaborate further.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to require that transportationsupport systems be funded through existing coordinated systems.  <T3>Response:</T3> Under this program, we will be funding the transportationneeds of individuals. We will not be funding transportation systems. Nevertheless,in the interest of improved coordination, we have amended the regulationsat andSection;andSection;  250.12 and 255.3(h) to clarify that the State IV-Aagency is expected to coordinate with other agencies providing relatedsupportive services.  Furthermore, we expect State policies on reimbursementto take into account existing transportation systems.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters were concerned about an apparent inconsistencywith the preamble language on the requirement to provide other supportiveservices to participants and the regulatory language at andSection; 255.2(c)which limited the requirement to services ``necessary to enable an individualto participate as required * * *.''   <T3>Response:</T3> Volunteers in approved activities have the same rightsto services as mandatory participants. Therefore, we deleted the phrase``as required'' from andSection; 255.2(c).   <T3>Comment:</T3> In general, commenters agreed with the flexibility providedStates under the proposed regulations to define supportive services andwork-related expenses.  However, two commenters suggested that the finalregulations specify the types of supportive services (other than transportationand child care) that could be provided.  Specific suggestions includedmedical expenses which were not covered under the Medicaid program, counseling,and substance abuse remediation.   <T3>Response:</T3> We did not list the types of services which were allowableunder this section. We were concerned that we could not foresee all appropriatetypes of services that States would want to consider, and we did not wantto preclude items at this point. In our discussion about one-time work-relatedexpenses, we gave some examples of items that could be included. Statescould also include services for at-risk youth (as discussed in the preambleto the employability plan at andSection; 250.41), counseling, medical anddental services, stand-alone courses in parenting or life skills training,day care for incapacitated adults, and substance abuse remediation. Tobe covered as JOBS expenditures, such services must be specified in anapproved Supportive Services plan, necessary for the individual to participatein, or prepare for, a work, education or training activity, and not otherwiseavailable on a non-reimbursable basis.   We also require that a State indicate in its Supportive Services plan thebasis for determining need for covered supportive services. Here, the Statewould include additional factors or procedures employed by the State todetermine the necessity of services. For example, a State might specifythat it would authorize car repairs on a one-time basis only when publictransportation was not available, or it might specify that it would authorizeday care for incapacitated adults only upon written medical verificationof such a need.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to require an assessment of transportationneeds.  <T3>Response:</T3> The regulations at andSection; 250.41(a)(1)(i) alreadyrequires that an initial JOBS assessment include ``the individual's educational,child care, and other supportive services needs.'' Further, since JOBSparticipants are the only individuals for whom transportation must be provided(with the State having the option to approve necessary transportation andservices for individuals in non-JOBS areas of the State), it did not seemnecessary to regulate further in this area.  Work-related Expenses  Although the Act requires that child care be guaranteed so that an individualmay accept or maintain employment, it is silent on whether the State IV-Aagency can pay for work-related expenses in order for the same individualto accept or maintain a job.   We have concluded that payment of such expenses is consistent with theintent of the JOBS program to help individuals obtain employment and avoidlong-term welfare dependency. Therefore, such expenses are matchable asa JOBS expenditures for a JOBS participant who finds employment (whetheras part of that participation or on her own), as well as for any individualwho finds employment (including, at State option, an individual in non-JOBSareas).   In addition, the State IV-A agency may make one-time payments for reasonablework-related expenses to an applicant or recipient so that she can acceptor maintain employment, if the State IV-A agency so provides in its SupportiveServices plan. Such expenses might include a uniform, a set of tools, apair of eyeglasses (if not available elsewhere), or the fee for a driver'slicense.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted to know if States could define work-relatedexpenses.   <T3>Response:</T3> Consistent with our policy to provide State flexibility,we are not defining what items could be covered by a State as one-timework-related expenses.  However, at andSection; 255.1(h), we do require theState to include a definition in its Supportive Services plan.   <T3>Comment:</T3> The same commenter asked how supportive services, includingone-time work-related expenses, would be covered in non-JOBS areas, i.e.,would they be matchable as IV-A expenses.   <T3>Response:</T3> As discussed earlier, the Statute makes specific provisionfor supportive services expenditures to be made from JOBS funds in supportof self-initiated education or training. Through amendments to section403(a)(3) of the Act, it precludes child care, transportation, and work-relatedexpenses as title IV-A administrative costs. For the reasons given laterin the discussion of Special Needs, we believe such expenses are matchableonly through JOBS funding. We allow the State to set up procedures underwhich IV-A staff could authorize such expenditures in non-JOBS areas. Wehave revised the regulations at andSection; 255.2(c) (2) to recognize thisoption (and related State plan requirements at andSection; 255.1(d)).   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter objected to the NPRM preamble languagewhich restricted one-time work-related expenses related to the acceptanceor maintenance of employment to participants in activities like job searchand work supplementation, but did not provide them for participants inother components like training who might also locate employment and facesuch expenses.  <T3>Response:</T3> We agree that the restriction was not appropriate, andwe have deleted the referenced preamble language. The regulatory languageat andSection; 255.2(g) would accommodate such expenses related to acceptanceor maintenance of employment from any component.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters expressed concern that our NPRM wouldnot accommodate work-related expenses necessary for participation in componentactivities, but only those related to employment.  <T3>Response:</T3> It was never our intention to preclude matching forwork-related expenses for participants in a JOBS component. We were onlytrying to establish that in addition to these on-going work-related expenses,the State could also receive matching for one-time expenses (such as uniforms,tools, or fees for a driver's license) related to the acceptance or maintenanceof employment.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter felt we should remove the one-time restrictionfor employment-related expenses since they could recur or new expensescould develop while an individual was working.   <T3>Response:</T3> We left the one-time restriction in the regulations.The Act provides a work-expense disregard for meeting on-going expenses(the amount of that disregard increased to $90 effective October 1, 1989),and we do not want to authorize duplicate payments or subvert the statutorylimit of the disregard. We intend that the one-time restriction not bea lifetime restriction, but be a restriction per job. For example, if aState gave an individual funds for a car repair to get to one job, shecould at some later date get funds for a uniform needed at a subsequentjob.  Approval of Supportive Services  Child care, transportation, and other supportive services necessary foran individual to participate in JOBS, and, at State option, other approvededucation or training in non-JOBS areas, are eligible for FFP. In orderto approve such services, the State IV-A agency must determine that theactivity is consistent with an appropriate employment goal, that the individualis making satisfactory progress, and the activity otherwise meets the State'sapproval criteria. In JOBS areas, these determinations would be made throughthe JOBS program.   If a State elects to approve education or training activities for childcare and supportive services in non-JOBS areas, its approval criteria shouldbe consistent with those used in JOBS areas. The criteria can follow thestandards for approval of self-initiated activities under andSection; 250.48(a)or encompass broader approval criteria used for approving JOBS educationand training activities. We have amended the regulations at andSection; 255.1to require that the State Supportive Services plan specify the State'scriteria for approving education or training for child care and supportiveservices in non-JOBS areas.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Many commenters were concerned about the provisions inthe proposed regulations which would require that an employability planbe developed for those in outside education and training, that participantsin these activities would be considered to be JOBS participants, and thatsupportive services other than child care would be approved through theJOBS program. They were concerned about their ability to authorize servicesin areas not covered by JOBS (both before the October, 1992, deadline forstatewideness and after), the administrative burden associated with settingup additional JOBS offices and doing full JOBS orientations, assessments,and employability plans.   <T3>Response:</T3> In response to these concerns, we have revised the finalregulations to allow the State IV-A agency to approve education or trainingfor child care and supportive services in non-JOBS areas of the State outsideof the JOBS program procedures. The State agency retains the  responsibilityfor determining the appropriateness of an individual's employment goals,but it does not have to provide for a full JOBS orientation, assessment,or employability plan. Approval of education or training for child careand supportive services can be done by IV-A staff in a non-JOBS area. However, in areas of the State with a JOBS program, individuals who areengaged in any self-initiated activity as provided in andSection; 250.48are JOBS participants, and approval must be done by JOBS staff in accordancewith JOBS procedures.   Verification of Participation in Education or Training Activities  The agency must periodically (based on the ability of the program to report)determine that a recipient is making satisfactory progress, as definedat andSection; 250.1. Child care services (or other supportive services)provided to individuals who are not attending could be considered paymentsfor ineligible individuals and might be subject to disallowances, evenif the State were monitoring progress on a regular basis.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters objected to the proposed disallowanceif a participant is not making satisfactory progress. They objected topreamble language which indicated that States which followed a standardreviewing progress on a 3-month basis could be subject to disallowances.They raised questions about whether this policy would apply equally: 1)to JOBS participants and individuals approved for child care and supportiveservices in non-JOBS areas; and 2) in cases where an individual was notattending and where an individual was not making progress. One commentersuggested that disallowances should not be taken when payments were correctlypaid based on the circumstances at the time of payment.  <T3>Response:</T3> The Statute provides that individuals in any  educationand training activities must be satisfactorily participating in order tobe eligible for child care services. Consistent with the proper and efficientadministration of Parts A and F, we are extending this requirement to othersupportive services, and we are interpreting this requirement to mean makingsatisfactory progress as defined in andSection; 250.1. If individuals arenot making progress in activities, the value of their participation isquestionable, and continued support should be re-evaluated. We expect aState to incorporate this concept into the criteria it uses for approvingactivities under JOBS and for approving education or training in non-JOBSareas.  As we indicated earlier, in discussing the definition of ``making satisfactoryprogress'' at andSection; 250.1, we  allow adjustments to institutional standardsof progress to reflect the special needs of AFDC recipients, probationaryperiods, and consideration of mitigating circumstances in satisfactoryprogress determinations.  In response to the comments, we removed our reference to a three-monthmonitoring standard from both the regulations and preamble. However, wedo expect regular monitoring, based on the program's ability to reportprogress. We recognize that the State may have difficulty determining,on a three-month or shorter schedule, whether satisfactory progress isbeing made because education and training institutions may not make determinationsthat frequently. As long as an individual is attending the activity, wewould not anticipate taking disallowances for expenditures made to covera period when the State could not know an individual's progress. Duringsuch a period, the State can presume an individual is making satisfactoryprogress, as long as the individual is attending the activity and availablereports for prior periods are not negative (or there are sufficient mitigatingcircumstances for lack of attendance or unsatisfactory progress). We doexpect the State to monitor attendance on a regular basis (with the individualor institution), and we indicated that we may take disallowances for childcare or supportive services expenditures which cover periods of non- attendance. This policy is related to the provision requiring that the Supportive Servicesplan include an assurance that child care claimed for reimbursement bereasonably related to the hours of participation or employment. In bothsituations, we want to ensure that expenditures are necessary for and directlyrelated to participation or employment.  Services During Gaps in Participation  The State IV-A agency may provide child care and other necessary supportiveservices for up to two weeks for families in which an individual is waitingto enter approved education or training activities or to begin a component.In addition, the State may provide services for up to one month, on anexception basis, when child care arrangements would otherwise be disruptedand participation in a JOBS activity or employment is scheduled to beginduring that period. This provision is included to ensure that child careservices (or other service arrangements) are not lost and continuity ofcare is provided so that an individual can continue the employability process. <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters disagreed with the provision in theNPRM which only allowed for up to one two-week period of services duringgaps in participation.  Commenters asked for greater flexibility to coverthe provision of services during gaps in JOBS participation or immediatelyfollowing a loss in employment. Suggested alternatives included: (1) fullState discretion; (2) at least one month or 30 days; (3) retain two weeksbut allow for exceptions in cases where child care would otherwise be lost,the child would have to be moved, a placement was imminent, school breaks,or when no more than 30 additional days of care would be required; and(4) various combinations thereof. Some suggested that States be allowedto provide transitional benefits beyond the Federal standards under anapproved State plan.   <T3>Response:</T3> We have revised the final regulations at andSection; 255.2(d)to allow services for up to one month, on an exception basis. This approachprovides additional State flexibility while protecting against expenditureswhich do not further the purposes of the JOBS program. It allows the Stateto address situations where the goals of participation, employment, andcontinuity of care would be positively served by extension of servicesbeyond a two-week period. The State IV-A agency must describe its policieson interim services in its Supportive Services plan, as required underandSection; 255.1(g).   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter asked about the ability to pay transportationcosts after termination of AFDC eligibility.  <T3>Response:</T3> We would allow such costs as JOBS expenditures consistentwith the policy specified at andSection; 250.73.   Services for Applicants  We were faced with the question of whether Congress intended that childcare be available to recipients of AFDC only, or to applicants as well.In considering this issue, we concluded that child care should be available,as it was under prior law, when the agency requires an applicant to participatein job search. Temporary child care should also be available for otheractivities necessary to prepare an individual for participation in theprogram, such as orientation. States had told us that the lack of suchchild care during orientation results in a very high absenteeism rate. However, we did not consider it to be proper use of resources to provideservices to applicants who were not likely to be determined eligible. AState IV-A agency could provide services to certain individuals (e.g.,those in job search or needing services to accept employment) whose eligibilityhas not been determined, as long as it has no reason to believe that theindividual would not likely qualify for benefits. In addition, we did notbelieve it to be proper or efficient use of resources to provide childcare or other supportive services to applicants in education or trainingactivities, until their eligibility was determined.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Some commenters objected to the distinction we made inthe proposed regulations between the eligibility of volunteers for services,compared to those required to participate. Under the proposed regulations,we provided for supportive services for those required to participate injob search, but not for those participating on a voluntary basis.   <T3>Response:</T3> As discussed previously, we decided that the distinctionwas inappropriate; it is not based on statutory language, and it acts tocontravene the JOBS targeting provisions. Therefore, we have revised theregulatory language at andSection; 255.2(e) to eliminate references to participationrequirements. We also clarified that services are available to applicantsboth for job search and for other approved activities to prepare them forJOBS participation.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Another commenter wanted us to clarify that, like applicants,recipients were entitled to child care and other services necessary toparticipate in activities which prepare them for JOBS.   <T3>Response:</T3> In response to this comment, in our amendments to andSection;255.2(e), we also clarified that recipients participating in approved pre-componentactivities are entitled to such services.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted it clarified that applicants whowere unlikely to qualify for AFDC eligibility should not be required toparticipate.   <T3>Response:</T3> When we stated that we did not consider it proper toprovide services to individuals who appeared unlikely to qualify for AFDC,we meant to cover not just supportive services, but JOBS services as well,including job search, assessment, employability planning, and case management.For example, if a State agency has information (perhaps not yet verified)that a family applying for AFDC has excess resources or that deprivationdoes not exist, it should not refer that family for IV-A or IV-F serviceson either a mandatory or voluntary basis. Payments made for services providedto a family referred under such circumstances would be subject to disallowance. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter had questions about the States' responsibilityfor documenting the allowability of applicant services.  <T3>Response:</T3> Applicant services generally would be subject to thesame documentation requirements as recipient services.  A unique aspectof applicant services is that questions about allowability could ariseif there were evidence that services were provided after the State agencyhad information indicating that the individual was unlikely to qualifyfor AFDC. In the absence of such information, we would presume that applicantservices were allowable.  Methods of Providing Child Care and Other Supportive Services (andSection;255.3 of the Final Regulations)  The Act provided a number of methods to guarantee child care, includingmeasures not specifically listed but methods identified and deemed appropriateby the State.  Based on that language, the State IV-A agency may: (1) Provide the care itself;  (2) Arrange care through public or private providers by use of contractsor vouchers;  (3) Provide cash or vouchers in advance to the caretaker relative so thatthe child care costs may be pre-paid;  (4) Reimburse the caretaker relative for child care expenses incurred; (5) Arrange with other agencies and community volunteer groups for non-reimbursedcare;  (6) Use the earned income disregard; or  (7) Adopt such other measures as the State IV-A agency deems appropriate.  The State IV-A agency must describe which of these methods it will usein its Supportive Services plan.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to allow a State to use a combinationof methods of providing care for a single family.   <T3>Response:</T3> This is allowable. In fact a State could use a combinationof methods for providing care to an individual child. For example, a Statecould reimburse a caretaker for in-home care before a child went to schooland provide a voucher for the child's after-school care at a center.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter thought we should require States to makechild care payments up front.  <T3>Response:</T3> The Statute specifically allows for reimbursement ofexpenses; thus, a State clearly has the authority to make child care paymentsafter costs have been incurred.  Direct Provision of Child Care   Historically, State IV-A agencies have not provided child care directlyexcept in a few instances. However, we can foresee a situation in whicha State IV-A agency might provide child care services within the agency,for example, while a parent is in a JOBS orientation session. Where careis provided directly, Federal matching is subject to the same limits oncosts as would be applied for outside child care; the State IV-A agencycannot charge its direct and overhead costs for providing care withoutregard to the limits established pursuant to andSection; 255.4(a).   Vouchers   Vouchers have become a very popular method of providing care as they maygive parents great freedom of choice. Many States are using voucher systems,also referred to as purchase-of-care mechanisms, for child care delivery.If a State IV-A agency wishes to institute such a system, the Departmentcan provide referrals to agencies with expertise in establishing one.  Voluntary Providers   In planning to meet the child care demands related to the Statute, theremay be an opportunity for communities to mobilize volunteer resources toexpand existing programs.  For example, there is a growing need for beforeand after school care for school-age children. Volunteers under the supervisionof professional caregivers could be a tremendous addition to the staffnecessary for such programs. Many communities are also recruiting retiredcitizens to help fill personnel shortages in day care centers by creatingstaff positions for aides which can be filled by volunteers.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Although we received general support for the flexibilityin methods we provided, one commenter wanted us to eliminate care by volunteers,or any non-reimbursed care, as an option.  <T3>Response:</T3> We disagree. To eliminate these options would undulyrestrict parental choice on care. In particular, we disagree with the assumptionthat all care provided on this basis is inferior, and we will not preemptparental decisions based on this assumption.  Direct Payments to the Caretaker Relative   The State IV-A agency may pay the caretaker relative directly either byproviding payment in advance or by reimbursing the caretaker relative whohas already paid for the care. In these situations, the family member cannotreceive the earned income disregard for child care specified at andSection;233.20(a)(11)(i), and the determination of eligibility and payment amountmust be determined without considering child care costs or payments.  Income Disregards   The State IV-A agency may use the existing child care disregards as providedat andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i). Although the child care disregard is notspecifically listed among the methods in the Act, Congress demonstratedits intent that the disregard continue when it raised the amount of thechild care disregard in title IV of the Statute effective October 1, 1989. Inclusion of the disregard as a method for guaranteeing child care underthis Part does not mean that the provisions of this Part supersede existingprovisions regarding the child care disregard. Thus, the disregard remainslimited by the amount specified in section 402(a)(8)(A)(iii) of the Act,it remains available for expenditures on children aged 13 and over, andit is not limited by the local market rate.   The State IV-A agency may make supplemental payments for child care coststhat exceed the disregard amounts but are within the limits establishedunder this Part. Under andSection; 255.3(f), in cases subject to retrospectivebudgeting, the State IV-A agency may modify their budgeting proceduresto provide for child care costs in the first one or two months of employment.This option is discussed in more detail later.  <T3>Comment:</T3> In general, commenters liked the flexibility we provided.However, one commenter objected to the use of the disregard as a method_apparentlybecause they considered the disregard levels to be too low.   <T3>Response:</T3> We do not believe this objection merits a change. First,the Statute specifically allows a State to set the limit of child careexpenses at the level of the disregards, and it would be inappropriatefor us to try to undermine that flexibility here. Since States are giventhe option to use the disregard levels for payment of child care services,regardless of the method used, eliminating the disregard as a method doesnot in any way assure that higher child care payments will be available.Secondly, we allow States to supplement the disregard. Thus, inclusionof the disregard as a method of providing child care services does notnecessarily result in lower child care payments for those receiving benefitsunder this Part.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter supported our position stated in the preambleto the NPRM that these new child care provisions do not supersede the existingprovisions in the Social Security Act for the disregard of actual childcare costs. At the same time, other commenters questioned whether our regulationsat andSection; 233.20 needed revisions to reflect the options available underthe Family Support Act for payment of child care costs, or to cross-referencethe Supportive Services plan.   <T3>Response:</T3> We did not feel it was appropriate to amend andSection;233.20 to incorporate other methods of providing child care since thissection deals specifically with the disregard of income under AFDC, andother methods would not involve a disregard. Further, we intend to includea reference to the disregard regulation in the Supportive Services plan.We do not believe that the disregard regulation would also need to cross-referencethe Supportive Services plan.   Because the disregard regulations provide for a disregard only of actualcosts, it should clearly be understood that the State would not disregardchild care costs which were otherwise being met under Part 255. Child carecosts being paid by the agency are not ``expenditures for care'' by thefamily and therefore are not eligible to be disregarded.  However, even where the State is paying for child care under Part 255,a family could be incurring its own child care expenses if the State paymentlevel is less than the total cost of care. Where the cost of the care exceedsthe local market rate, but is within the disregard limits at section 402(a)(8)(iii),the family could receive a disregard for the share of costs it incurs itself.For example, suppose child care costs under Part 255 were limited by thelocal market rate to $150 in a particular case, and the family needingchild care would otherwise be eligible for the child care disregard of$175. The family may choose to continue its child care arrangement costing$175, and the State may choose whatever method it wants to pay the $150for care allowed under Part 255. The family would then incur child careexpenses of $25, which could be disregarded. (Alternatively, at State option,the full $175 amount could be met through the disregard.)  The disregard and other methods of paying for care under Part 255 may notbe combined in order to duplicate assistance under the two provisions.The amount available in combination may not exceed the higher of the appropriatedisregard limit at section 402(a)(8)(A)(iii) of the Act or the applicablelimit under Part 255. For example, in the above case, a family could notsecure child care costing $325 with the expectation of getting $150 inassistance under Part 255 and an additional $175 to be covered by the disregardamount. This would constitute duplication of benefits and would violatethe intent of the statutory limits for both the disregard and the Part255 provisions.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters suggested that States should be requiredto continue the disregard as a method of paying for child care expenses.  <T3>Response:</T3> We agree that the child care disregard authorized undersection 402(a)(8) of the Act must remain available to eligible applicantsand recipients when appropriate. However, we decided not to require Statesto include it as a method of guaranteeing care under these new provisions.We believe the statutory language requires State flexibility in this areabecause the Statute does not directly mention the disregard as a methodby which States would guarantee care.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Another commenter wanted us to eliminate the inconsistencybetween the scope of the two sets of provisions; in particular, the newprovisions cover only child care, while the disregard provisions coverdependent care.   <T3>Response:</T3> We recognize the inconsistency but have not made a changesince the difference is due to differences in statutory language. The newprovisions specifically refer to a guarantee of ``child care,'' and (asdiscussed elsewhere) to families with a dependent child ``requiring suchcare,'' while the disregard provisions in section 402(a)(8) of the Actspecifically cover expenditures for a ``dependent child, or an incapacitatedindividual living in the same home as the dependent child.'' Thus, thescope of the disregard language is broader. (In earned income cases, familieswith expenditures on care for individuals in the home who are not dependentchildren could have those costs covered through the disregard even thoughthe guarantee under section 402(g) of the Act does not extend to such individuals.However, these costs could not be supplemented if care is more than thedisregard amount because there was no statutory change made to the disregardprovisions to allow such supplementation.)   Supplementing the Disregard  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter felt that States should be required toissue a supplement when the disregard amount was less than the amount whichwould be available if a direct payment were made. A second commenter inquiredwhether the States would be obligated to make supplemental payments inthese cases. He felt that perhaps the State should not be required to makea supplemental payment if there were adequate care available and the Statecould arrange care within the disregard limits.   <T3>Response:</T3> We proposed these supplements as an option for States,rather than a requirement, because the child care provisions under titleIII of the Statute did not supersede the existing child care disregards.In fact, in title IV of the Act, Congress specifically amended the statutorylimit on the disregard amount, without any reference to the other childcare provisions. We believe that requiring supplementation of the disregardwould subvert congressional intent by essentially invalidating the newdisregard limits otherwise provided in the Family Support Act. Therefore,we have not amended our policy.   Disadvantaging the Family by a Change in Method  The Statute prohibits a State IV-A agency from disadvantaging any familyreceiving AFDC on October 13, 1988, through a change in its method of reimbursingthe cost of child care. The only method for reimbursing child care costsfor recipients with earnings on that date was the earned income disregard;for participants in education or training programs, special needs was anavailable method. Families receiving benefits under either method couldbe disadvantaged if the State changed to a method of direct payment. AtandSection; 255.3(e), we require that, for recipients who received AFDC paymentson October 13, 1988, determined by using the child care disregard at andSection;233.20(a)(11)(i) or special needs payments, the State IV-A agency mustdetermine current AFDC eligibility and payments based on the continuedapplication of the disregard or special needs payments in order to findout if the family would be disadvantaged. If the family would be disadvantaged,we require the State to determine the family's AFDC eligibility and benefit(including child care needs) as if the method applicable on October 13,1988, were still in effect.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters pointed out that families whose childcare was provided as a special need as of October 13, 1988 could also bedisadvantaged if a different method was used which provided or paid forchild care directly.   <T3>Response:</T3> We have revised the preamble and regulations at andSection;255.3(e)(2) to recognize this additional group. We also revised the regulationsand preamble language to indicate that the State must determine the family'sAFDC eligibility and benefit (including child care needs) as if the October13, 1988, method were being used; however, we do not directly require thatthe same method be used since, in the case of special needs, the methodis no longer available.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters questioned the requirement for the disregardto be applied as of October 13, 1988.   <T3>Response:</T3> We retained the requirement because we believe thatfamilies who were not eligible for child care benefits at the earlier timecannot be disadvantaged by a change in method.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Another commenter asked that we expand upon how Stateswould determine if a family was disadvantaged.  <T3>Response:</T3> When a family needs child care benefits for employmentor for participation, the State would determine if the family receivedchild care benefits in the form of a disregard or as special needs in October1988. If not, the State need not worry about disadvantaging the familyunder this provision. However, if the family received the disregard orspecial needs in October 1988 and is now eligible for child care, but theState is considering another method of providing care, the State must checkto determine that the family is not worse off as a result of applying thenew method. If the family received the disregard in October 1988, the Statemust calculate eligibility and benefits as if the disregard were its method,to determine if the family would otherwise be disadvantaged. If the family'schild care was provided as a special need, then the State must determinethe family's AFDC eligibility and benefit as if special needs were itsmethod of providing child care, to determine if the family would be otherwisedisadvantaged.   In determining if the family would be disadvantaged, the State should lookfor two types of circumstances. The first is where the provision of directservices would make the family ineligible (for example, under the ``185percent gross-income test''), but the family would retain eligibility ifthe costs of care would be covered through a disregard or special needs.These methods would allow the family to retain AFDC eligibility with ahigher income level. The second circumstance is where the amount availableto cover costs under the method applied in October 1988 would be higherthan under the method now under consideration. This could happen if thedisregard level and actual costs for care are both higher than the localmarket rate. Since the disregard and special needs were not limited tothe local market rate, the family would receive more money under the priormethod. Under either of these circumstances, the family would be disadvantagedby a change in the State's method of providing care. Therefore, the Statewould be required to determine the family's AFDC eligibility and paymentas if the October 1988 method (and the payment amount under that method)were in effect.   Meeting Child Care Costs Under Retrospective Budgeting   Recipients who need child care before beginning employment often lack sufficientfunds to pay for such care before receiving their paychecks. If a StateIV-A agency uses a two-month retrospective budgeting cycle and meets childcare needs through the disregard at andSection; 233.20(a)(11), for the firstfour months of employment, a family only receives recognition of childcare costs for two of those four months. For example, under current rules,if a recipient becomes employed in January and has child care costs inJanuary, February, March and April, the child care disregard will not offsetincome in determining the amount of the payment until March and April.If a State IV-A agency decides to provide child care for the first andsecond month of employment, as a start-up cost, the State IV-A agency couldnot use the disregard to offset income used to determine March and April'spayment because the recipient did not actually meet the cost of child carein January and/or February.   We will allow the State IV-A agency to provide start-up costs for childcare for the initial one or two months of employment and to apply the disregardfor the third and fourth months as if such costs had been paid by the recipient.However, in order to prevent duplication of benefits, if a State IV-A agencyelects to do this, it may not apply the disregard to income used to determinethe payment for the month(s) following the month in which child care ceases.The State IV-A agency may meet the start-up costs by making direct paymentsto the provider or by reimbursing the recipient. Any reimbursement forchild care would not be counted as income or resources for any month.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Commenters generally supported our policy to allow adjustmentsto retrospective budgeting (and for our disregard of supportive servicespayments). However, one commenter felt that States should be required tomodify the retrospective budgeting process.   <T3>Response:</T3> We have not changed our proposal in response to thiscomment. We believe such a requirement would unduly limit State flexibilityand could result in a very significant new administrative burden on Stateagencies that currently provide child care benefits largely through thedisregard. Furthermore, the child care provisions of the Statute do notsupersede the related provisions for disregard of child care expenses atsection 402(a)(8) of the Act. Under the existing provisions, retrospectivebudgeting procedures remain in effect. Therefore, we do not believe Statescould be required to modify their retrospective budgeting procedures.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters objected to our requirement that Statesthat modified the retrospective budgeting process had to discontinue applicationof the disregard after the recipient ceased receiving child care. Theythought it was unfair to reduce AFDC benefits at the same time that individualswho lost their jobs were losing income.   <T3>Response:</T3> We do not believe a change in policy is indicated. Weproposed this policy in order to prevent duplication of benefits. As written,the recipient would receive child care payments for the same period oftime as they were incurring child care costs. Thus, those receiving paymentsthrough this method would be treated comparably to those who received childcare benefits or vouchers directly. If we took the commenters' suggestion,these individuals would receive an extra one or two months of child carebenefits. This kind of differential treatment would not be justified. Further,such a policy would seem to be inconsistent with the statutory languagethat recipients be paid no more than actual child care costs.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter requested that we clarify the regulationsat andSection; 255.3(f) concerning the State's option to modify the retrospectivebudgeting process.   <T3>Response:</T3> We have revised the regulations to clarify that theState may directly pay for child care costs incurred during the initialone or two months but subsequently apply the child care disregard in determiningpayments for the corresponding payment months.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter asked about the obligation of the Stateagency, in cases subject to the normal retrospective budgeting procedures,to cover full child care costs by paying for costs after the individualgoes off the AFDC rolls. They also asked for clarification of the effectivedate of transitional coverage in this situation.   <T3>Response:</T3> We do not believe the State should be required to payfor child care expenditures after AFDC recipients who received the childcare disregard leave the rolls. As stated elsewhere, we took the positionthat the existing disregard provisions under law were not superseded bythe Family Support Act. Consistent with this position and our policy toprovide State flexibility in determining appropriate methods of providingcare, we have decided not to require the State to pay individuals who receivedthe child care disregard any additional child care benefits under Part255 after they are no longer eligible for AFDC.  This policy does not affect the length of time a family would be eligiblefor transitional benefits under Part 256, which cover child care expensesfrom the first month after a family becomes ineligible through the twelfthmonth after a family loses eligibility. Child care benefits under Part255 cover the period before a family loses eligibility; payments for thatperiod, even if made after the family is off the AFDC rolls, do not affecteligibility under Part 256.  Parental Choice   The regulations at andSection;andSection;  255.3(c) and 255.3(d) reflect ourdesire to allow the caretaker relative to choose the type of child care(center, group family day care, family day care or in-home care), if morethan one type is available. This is consistent with section 482 of theAct which requires the State IV-A agency to provide information to individualsabout child care, including what assistance is available to help the participantselect appropriate child care services.   The regulations at andSection; 255.3(d) also provide that an individual whois required to participate under Part 250 may not refuse appropriate careunless she can arrange other care or demonstrate that such refusal willnot prevent or interfere with participation. Thus, an individual's choiceis not constrained by the methods or types of care which the State IV-Aagency has elected to provide under its Supportive Services plan. The StateIV-A agency is required to pay for the child care services arranged bythe individual, even if that would require that it set up an alternativemechanism for payment of such services. Such payment would still be subjectto the limits established by this Part.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to require that States allowa reasonable time for individuals to arrange care by themselves.   <T3>Response:</T3> We did not see the need to regulate in this area. Webelieve that individuals would have the ability on an ongoing basis todevelop alternative child care arrangements. Further, in cases where thehours of participation would be minimal and the care arrangements temporary,such as for an orientation or assessment, we believe the State agency shouldhave the ability to make temporary arrangements which would provide careneeded during one-time or intermittent appointments for discussions withcaretakers about JOBS participation.   <T3>Comment:</T3> States generally supported our conclusion that unlicensedcare was permissible. However, several commenters objected to any requirementsthat States facilitate the use of unlicensed care and asked for broaderState discretion on paying for unlicensed or unregulated care. Among theirconcerns were conflicts with existing State laws about the ability to makepayments to unlicensed providers, cost and other complications relatedto minimum wage requirements for unrelated in-home providers, and interferencewith State efforts to upgrade child care quality.   <T3>Response:</T3> We understand these concerns, but consistent with theposition of President Bush, we believe that parents should be able to makeinformed choices about who provides care for their children. In order toassist parents in making these decisions, the State agency is free to provideinformation on the advantages of different types of child care, and identifylicensed providers who are conveniently located for participants and whootherwise meet their needs.   Informal care may be more problematic in some States when the State agencymakes direct payments to providers.  For years, States have been payingfor informal care through the disregard, and the State might minimize itsproblems if it continues to use the disregard or otherwise make advancepayments to participants who would be responsible for making the paymentsto providers. As a point of clarification, when we stated in the preamblethat the State agency had to pay for this kind of care, we did not meanthat the State agency must make direct payments to the providers of suchcare.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters wanted us to clarify that self-arrangedcare had to meet applicable standards of State and local law. In relatedcomments, one commenter asked about the obligation of a State to pay forself-arranged care out of State funds: 1) if the care were substandardand therefore did not qualify for Federal matching; or 2) where a licensewas required, but never applied for or denied. The same commenter askedfor clarification of the meaning of ``applicable standards'' for out-of-homecare when there were no such standards.   <T3>Response:</T3> Payments for self-arranged care are subject to the requirementsestablished under this Part. Thus, to qualify for Federal matching, anyself-arranged child care has to meet applicable standards of State andlocal law.  States are not required to pay for self-arranged care thatdoes not meet the requirements for Federal matching at andSection; 255.4(c).However, depending on the situation, unlicensed care could meet these requirements.For example, a church-affiliated child care center, a family day care providercaring for only one or two children, or an in-home provider could be exemptfrom State licensing requirements; in such cases licensing requirementswould not apply, and by default, the care would meet the ``applicable standards''of State law. On the other hand, if a child care center was subject toState licensing requirements, but had not applied, or was not qualified,care provided at that center would not be eligible for Federal matching,and the State would not have to pay for such care.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter felt that, in offering a choice among availabletypes of providers, States should be required to include licensed or regulatedcare.  <T3>Response:</T3> We do not feel the need to further regulate in thisarea. At andSection; 255.3(c), we already require the State to offer a choice``if more than one type of care is available, e.g., center, group family,family day care, or in-home care.'' These choices would normally includelicensed or regulated care. In some cases, licensed or regulated care mightnot be available; we cannot require the State to offer choices which arenot available.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter raised questions about care provided atreligious institutions or at centers affiliated with religious institutions.It cited constitutional issues which could arise under purchase-of-servicecontracts or voucher programs concerning the separation of church and State_basedupon religious effects of the care, hiring, and funding practices of thecenters and other factors. It also raised concerns about recipients beingrequired to choose care at centers with religious affiliations.  <T3>Response:</T3> A State may not require any individual to accept careat a center which has a religious affiliation.  However, for those individualschoosing a center with religious affiliation, the State must develop paymentmechanisms which can accommodate such a choice. Consistent with constitutionalrequirements, a State must ensure that its programs do not create an excessiveentanglement between the government and religious institutions.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter said we should require States to provideindividuals a full choice of payment methods and inform them that directpayments were available. Another suggested that those using self-arrangedcare be afforded the full range of methods of payment.  <T3>Response:</T3> We believe the Statute gives States discretion in decidingwhich child care methods to use. Individuals are not necessarily entitledto direct payments or any other method of provision. Therefore, we havenot incorporated such a requirement.  Needs of the Child  The Act and the regulations at andSection; 255.3(b) require that the StateIV-A agency must take into account the needs of the child if it arrangesthe care. This means that care must be available during the hours needed,including before or after school (or both) as well as care for the entireday. The care must be reasonably accessible so that neither the child northe caregiver must travel distances beyond what is normally acceptablein the community.   Special attention should be given to children with special needs. Thereare a variety of programs funded at the Federal and the State level forchildren with special needs. Often, there is little or no coordinationbetween these programs and other dependent care. We encourage the StateIV-A agency to make a concerted effort to identify programs such as HeadStart that might benefit JOBS participants and their children and to coordinatewith these programs.   There are many materials already developed by the Department, the States,and the private sector that contain information on the types of care andselection of appropriate care. The State IV-A agency may find it cost effectiveto use local child care resource and referral (CCRandamp;R) agencies to providethis information. Child care resource and referral agencies exist throughoutthe country as a public/private venture to serve the community. They keepdata on available resources (including openings and providers), often listingnot only name, address, and cost of care, but information on curriculumand special programs.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter requested that we include the languageabout reasonable accessibility based upon normally acceptable communitystandards in the regulations.   <T3>Response:</T3> We revised the regulations at andSection; 255.3(b) inresponse to this comment. However, we also allow the State to establisha uniform standard which would apply across the State. To require all Statesto establish standards based on individual community patterns raised seriousconcerns about intra-state equity and the potential administrative burdenon States that hundreds of such determinations would entail.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters asked us to clarify the regulationsat andSection; 255.3(b) where we indicate that ``[i]n arranging for childcare, the State agency must take into account the needs of the child, including* * * the appropriateness of the care to the age and special needs of thechild.'' The specific concern was the implication that the State agencywas solely responsible for the determination of appropriateness. The commentersfelt that the caretakers should be able to determine whether child carewas appropriate.   <T3>Response:</T3> The State agency is not solely responsible for determinationsof appropriateness of child care. When the State agency arranges for childcare, then the agency must take into account the needs of the child (asrequired by statutory language at section 402(g)(1)(B)) and make an initialdetermination of the appropriateness of care. If a child care recipientis concerned about the appropriateness of care arranged by the State, shehas several alternatives, including requesting assistance from the Statein identifying alternative care, arranging alternative care, or requestinga hearing, pursuant to andSection; 255.2(h).  Methods of Providing Other Supportive Services   Under andSection; 255.3(g), the State IV-A agency may provide transportationor other supportive services either directly or through payment or reimbursement.This policy is consistent with current Federal policy and State practicesunder existing work program options. The Supportive Services plan mustspecify the methods by which supportive services would be provided; thisrequirement is incorporated in andSection; 255.1(c).   Coordination  Under the Act and final regulations at andSection; 255.3(h), the State IV-Aagency must coordinate its child care activities with existing early childhoodeducation programs in the State, including Head Start and preschool programsfunded under Chapter 1 of the Education Consolidation and Improvement Act.The State IV-A agency should build upon existing resources to expand therange of services available to JOBS participants.   We recognize that helping a mother set up a stable child care plan, especiallyif it involves more than one provider, can be difficult. However, we alsoknow how important a well-developed plan is; poorly thought-out arrangementsbreak down, causing disruption to training and employment. We believe thatthe provision of services for a brief interim period may prevent the disruptionof such carefully planned arrangements and allow continuity of care.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter thought we should be more explicit regardingthe form in which we expected States to coordinate and the results whichwe expected.   <T3>Response:</T3> Although we believe very strongly in the importanceof coordination, we do not believe it would be fruitful for us to regulatein this area. Successful coordination depends upon items such as open,informed communication; the identification of mutual interests; and reductionsin institutional and territorial barriers.  These areas are difficult toregulate. We could lay out specific coordination activities which we wouldlike the State to undertake, such as requirements to share its SupportiveServices plan, to participate on boards, and to attend meetings, but thosewould not ensure successful coordination. Also, we do not want a Stateagency which has made valiant attempts to coordinate to be at risk whenoutside parties thwart its coordination efforts.   However, our regulations do touch upon our expectations of the resultsof coordination where we require the State Supportive Services plan toinclude an assessment of the availability of child care services providedon a non-reimbursable basis by other Federal, State, and local services.Further, as discussed under andSection; 255.1, we have amended the Stateplan requirements to include a description of the nature of coordinationwith appropriate public and private agencies.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters thought we should require coordinationwith existing child care resource and referral agencies.  <T3>Response:</T3> We agree that such coordination would be beneficial.It would help the State agency identify potential resources and minimizeduplication of efforts.  Therefore, we have added resource and referralagencies to the list for State IV-A agency coordination.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that State agencies should berequired to consult with Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizationsabout the child care methods that would be available. A couple of othercommenters wanted States and Tribes to have the flexibility to work outmutually acceptable methods of providing care, which could include intergovernmentalagreements for Tribes to provide services or systems for Tribal issuanceof child care payments to JOBS participants. Another commenter thoughtthat we should require States to develop their payment methods in consultationwith the Tribes.  <T3>Response:</T3> The JOBS regulations at andSection; 250.12(e)(2) alreadyrequire coordination between the State agency and Tribal grantees aboutthe services provided under Part 255. As part of this required coordination,we would expect the State and Indian Tribes or Alaska Native organizationsto discuss such issues as methods of providing child care, criteria andprocedures for approving and paying for care, and Tribal child care standards.However, we did not believe that it would be appropriate to issue specificregulatory requirements on the scope of consultation because we expectso much variation among the States with respect to State/Tribal child careissues.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that State agencies be requiredto coordinate with JTPA agencies to ensure that there will not be duplicationof supportive services.  <T3>Response:</T3> We have revised the regulations at andSection;andSection; 250.12 and 255.3(h) to provide that the State IV-A agency must coordinatewith agencies providing related supportive services. The NPRM only mentionedcoordination with respect to child care, but not other supportive services. Allowable Costs and Matching Rates  (andSection; 255.4 of the Final Regulations)  Statewide Limit  Section 402(g)(1)(C) of the Act and andSection; 255.4(a) of the regulationsprovide that FFP is available for payments for the actual cost of childcare up to the statewide limit chosen by the State IV-A agency. The statewidelimit may be the disregard level at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i), or somehigher figure. In no case is FFP available for payments which exceed theapplicable local market rate.   An example may help to explain this provision.  Suppose a State IV-A agencysets a statewide limit ($250), which is higher than the child care disregard,for the purpose of calculating the amount of child care costs that it willpay for or reimburse. In City A, the applicable local market rate is also$250. Thus the State IV-A agency can pay for the actual cost up to $250.In City B, the applicable local market rate is $225. Thus even if the carecost $250 in City B, FFP would only be available for $225. In City C, theapplicable local market rate is $275.  FFP would be available for only$250 (the statewide limit) or, if less than $250, the actual cost of care.  <T3>Comment:</T3> We received several comments opposing the requirementthat States set a statewide limit for Federal matching of child care costs.Some commented that such a limit would not reflect local needs.   <T3>Response:</T3> We interpret the statutory language, which specifiesthat payments be limited by the disregard level or ``an amount establishedby the State,'' to mean that if the State chooses to pay an amount higherthan the disregard, it must establish a statewide limit. This amount isdistinct in the Statute from local market rates.  Further, we do not believethat setting a statewide limit precludes a State from reflecting localneeds in its payment levels. For example, the State could set its statewidelimit at the highest local market rate in the State. Payments would thenbe based on the actual cost of care up to the local market rate and thestatewide amount would not be a limiting factor.   The statewide limit may be different for children under two and childrenaged two and over, consistent with the amendment to the child care disregardprovision under the Statute effective October 1, 1989.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter opposed allowing the AFDC disregard amountto be used as the statewide limit.   <T3>Response:</T3> The option for a State to use the disregard amount asits limit is specifically included in the Statute.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested allowing the State to use thestatewide limit as the rate for a locality where the local market rateis very close to it.  <T3>Response:</T3> The Statute limits costs to the local market rate, andwe cannot allow States to substitute a higher limit.   Local Market Rates   Each State IV-A agency must establish local market rates, and the StateSupportive Services plan must explain the methodology used to establishthem. We do not propose to impose any statistical formula to be used uniformly. However, in andSection; 255.4(a)(2), we set a few requirements which theState IV-A agency must follow in establishing those rates. Furthermore,we intend to issue an Action Transmittal within six months which wouldspecify criteria to be used in evaluating State sampling methodologies.  First, the State IV-A agency must base the rates on a representative sampleof providers, obtained in a survey by the State IV-A agency or under anoutside survey.  Secondly, local market rates must be set at the 75th percentile.This level was selected because it represents a reasonable balance betweenconcerns about fiscal accountability and accessibility to services. Finally,local market rates must be determined by type of care such as center care,group family day care, family day care, and in-home care. Rates shouldbe differentiated by care for infants, toddlers, preschool and school childrenand whether there are different rates for full-time and part-time care.Where appropriate, rates should reflect reductions in the cost of carefor additional children from the same family.   State IV-A agencies have had some experience in determining local marketrates when preparing State budgets and calculating the allowable titleXX rate for child care.  Also, studies are available to a State IV-A agencyif help is needed in establishing local market rates. Many States relyon information provided by the local child care resource and referral agenciessuch as the studies done in 1987 and 1988 by the California Child CareResource and Referral Network that gave costs of care, licensed capacity,enrollment, open slots, wait lists, hours of care, transportation, andtypes of regulated providers.    Collecting data on unregulated caregivers providing care in the home ofthe child may be more difficult and demand a different approach. We areaware of this difficulty, and we would allow a State to develop a procedurefor determining the appropriate adjustment to apply to the rates for regulatedcare which it determined using the prescribed methodology.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Numerous commenters objected to an additional guidelinewe included in the NPRM which required that local market rates be determinedfor areas no greater than political subdivisions. Their concern was basedin large part on the administrative difficulty of determining hundredsof rates and on the inconsistency of these requirements with other Statesystems. Most commenters supported greater flexibility in this area, buta few offered specific options such as the use of regional data; sub-Statedata grouped by similar geographic, economic or demographic conditions;or rural versus urban groupings.  <T3>Response:</T3> We have changed our regulations to delete the requirementthat local market rates be determined for all political subdivisions. Instead,we allow the State to determine these rates for broader geographical regionsin the State or for groups of small areas which reflect similar geographic,economic, or demographic conditions.  This approach represents the bestbalance of our interests in minimizing the administrative burden on Statesand ensuring that rates reflect actual expected costs.  <T3>Comment:</T3> A number of commenters had general objections to thebasic approach we used. They felt our approach was too complex and administrativelyburdensome. They also wanted greater flexibility so that other methodsin the State could be adopted.  <T3>Response:</T3> Our decision to eliminate the requirement to producelocal market rates for all political subdivisions addresses this concernand greatly reduces the administrative burden on the State.   <T3>Comment:</T3> We received one comment suggesting that establishinglocal market rates be made optional.  <T3>Response:</T3> The law states that ``[t]he State agency may not reimbursethe cost of child care provided with respect to a family in an amount thatis greater than the applicable local market rate (as determined by theState in accordance with regulations issued by the Secretary).'' Therefore,the State must establish a local market rate. However, we did make somechanges to the proposed guidelines for establishing the local market rateas discussed.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Numerous commenters opposed our basing the local marketrate on the 75th percentile cost of such types of care in the local areas.Most commenters were concerned that this methodology might limit them frompurchasing appropriate care in an area or care which provided special developmentalprograms, transportation, or medical services especially needed by childrenof AFDC recipients. Others felt that this would severely restrict accessin rural areas. Some suggested that the computation of market rate cutoffsor percentiles should be based on the number of slots of care rather thanthe number of providers; if larger providers are more expensive, the 75thpercentile would cover less than 75 percent of the slots.  <T3>Response:</T3> It is not our intention to restrict a State's abilityto purchase appropriate quality child care in an area or care which hasdevelopmental programs or special services. However, we must have somemethod for controlling Federal financial participation in the cost of carewhich is exceptionally high for the State or locality.  Therefore, we havedecided to leave the 75th percentile requirement in the regulations. However,we will allow it to be based on child care slots instead of providers;this could increase the amount of child care available within the establishedcost limits. Further, by allowing the State broader discretion in defininglocal market areas, we believe we have alleviated some of the concernsof rural areas that our approach would arbitrarily exclude certain providers.  It was clear from the comments that there was considerable misunderstandingabout what the term the 75th percentile means. Therefore, we decided itwould be helpful to explain how the 75th percentile is derived.  Percentiles are derived from ranked data and separate the lowest valuesfrom the highest values, based on a percentage point cutoff. A common useof percentiles is in standardized educational tests, where a percentilescore is typically given to indicate what percent of the nation's studentsare below the score reported. In the case of child care rates, a percentilescore would identify the percentage of child care providers (or slots)in the sample whose rates were lower. Contrary to what some commentersthought, it does not indicate the percent of an average (or the highest)market rate. Thus, the 75th percentile does not mean that we would allowStates to pay only 75 percent of the local market rate.   To determine the 75th percentile for a sample of a particular type of childcare, it is first necessary to rank all of the sample child care ratesfrom lowest to highest. Once this is done, you would go three-quartersof the way up the list. The number separating the 75 percent of providers(or slots) with the lowest rates from the 25 percent who are most expensiveis the 75th percentile.  Following is an example. In a local market area,a State develops a representative sample of child care rates for center-basedcare as follows: $120, $100, $110, $125, $95, $150, $120, and $135 (perweek). Ranked from lowest to highest the rates are: $95, $100, $110, $120,$120, $125, $135, and $150. Here, $125 is the sixth value in a list ofeight rates, and it represents the 75th percentile.  Therefore, the localmarket rate would be established at $125.   One additional step must be taken if the size of the sample is not a multipleof four because, in those cases, a State may not be able to precisely determinethe 75th percentile. Modifying the earlier example, suppose rates of $130and $140 were also included in the sample. Here, the ranked rates wouldbe as follows: $95, $100, $110, $120, $120, $125, $130, $135, $140 and$150. In this case, $130 represents the 70th percentile (i.e., 70 percentof the rates are at or below $130), and $135 represents the 80th percentile.Thus, any rate of $130 or less is clearly within the 75th percentile, andany rate of $135 or more is clearly above the 75th percentile. The Statehas discretion as to how to treat rates between $130 and $135; an obviousoption would be to consider $132.50 to be the 75th percentile because itis halfway between the 70th and 80th percentile figures.   In addition, in response to concerns that the 75th percentile excludescare, especially in rural areas, where there are only one or two providersof a particular type of care in a local market area, we would allow theState to set the local market rate at the 100th percentile (to includethe one or two providers).  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that States should be free touse the market rates for regulated care as the limit for informal care. <T3>Response:</T3> It would not be appropriate to apply the rate for center-based,or regulated care, to other types of care which are likely to cost differentamounts. However, we do recognize that it might be difficult to draw anadequate representative sample of providers for unregulated forms of care.Therefore, in such cases, we would allow the State to develop a procedurefor determining the appropriate adjustment to apply to the rates for regulatedcare which it determines using the prescribed methodology. For example,it could use other surveys or other State programs to determine the appropriatedifferentials among rates for center-based, group family, family day, andin-home care and apply those differentials to the center-based rate thatit determined under our standard guidelines. A State which plans to usethis type of estimating procedure must describe its approach as part ofits methodology description required in the Supportive Services plan atandSection; 255.1(i).  <T3>Comment:</T3> A few commenters objected to the types of child carefor which we required distinct market rates. A couple identified additionalcategories which might be appropriate, including night care or hourly carewhere care requirements exceeded the standard time available in a dailyfee. Other commenters felt there were too many types specified. One specificobjection was the reduction in cost associated with care provided to multiplemembers from one family.  <T3>Response:</T3> We identified these categories based on discussionswith experts on child care services, indicating that the market for childcare services typically was differentiated in this manner. At the sametime, for certain types of differentiations, we used the terms ``whereapplicable'' and ``if applicable'' because we recognized the possibilitythat there could be local markets where such distinctions did not exist.In these cases, the State would have the flexibility not to develop separaterates.  However, now that we allow the State to develop consolidated marketareas which include a substantial number of political subdivisions, thisis less likely to happen. We also recognize that it is not a universalpractice among child care providers to make adjustments in fees when morethan one family member uses a facility; therefore, our regulations onlyrequire States to ``consider'' this factor. Where such reductions are notstandard, we do not expect States to make adjustments.  The types of differentiation specified in the regulations represent a minimumset of categories for which local market rates would be developed. Wherethe market for child care in an area, or State, is differentiated in additionalways, the State is free to develop more categories of local market rates.However, in response to concerns about the administrative burden of determiningthese rates, with the exception of creating a category for special needs,we did not want to add more Federal requirements in this area.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter questioned the phrase ``if applicable''in andSection; 255.4(a)(3)(ii).  <T3>Response:</T3> We included this phrase to accommodate local marketsfor child care which were less differentiated.  However, unless a Statecomputes rates for all political subdivisions, we expect these categoriesto be generally applicable.   <T3>Comment:</T3> A few commenters expressed the desire to keep the specialneed option as a way of meeting the higher costs for care of handicappedchildren or children with other special needs, because that was not addressedin the instruction on local market rate and statewide limit.   <T3>Response:</T3> We recognize the need for making higher child care paymentsfor certain children who are handicapped or who have other special needs.Therefore, we have added this as a category for determining local marketrates. A State may also set a separate statewide limit for child care forchildren with special needs for such care.  However, separate local marketrates or statewide limits would not be allowed to cover special educationalor other services not directly related to child care. For example, theState could not set special rates to cover costs of protective servicesor educational enrichment programs.  However, this does not preclude aState from funding a Head Start grantee, for example, for costs (withinthe established limits) for child care provided during hours before orafter the Head Start program.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters suggested that States update theirlocal market rates periodically (i.e., every one or two years). Anothercommenter suggested that local market rates be increased, subject to cost-of-livingchanges for the services sector.  <T3>Response:</T3> Our regulations at andSection; 255.1(i) already includeda requirement for periodic updates, at least biennially. We decided tokeep this requirement. A biennial requirement would be consistent withthe plan submittal schedule and keep the rates reasonably up-to-date. Atthe same time, it would not force a State to spend a disproportionate shareof its resources on this aspect of program administration, and it shouldallow sufficient flexibility to allow coordination of updates with otherState programs. Our regulations allow more frequent updates by States whereappropriate.  Also, we did not feel that it would be appropriate to require States toupdate based on outside cost-of-living indices. The system we establishedfor determining local market rates should produce more accurate informationon changes to child care costs at the local level than outside cost-of-livingindices.  Applicable Standards For Child Care   The Statute requires that FFP be available for child care only if it meetsapplicable standards of State and local law and requires that parents beallowed access to the child care services. The requirement for parentalaccess would cover custodial parents and non-custodial parents consistentwith court orders governing such matters.   The State IV-A agency must also establish procedures to ensure that center-basedcare will be subject to State and local requirements designed to ensurebasic health and safety, including fire safety, protections. (Commentswe received on this point are discussed at andSection; 255.5.)  The State must also endeavor to develop guidelines for family day careif it does not already have them. We do not believe, however, that Congressintended to limit child care only to care that is specifically regulatedby current State or local law. Other care, even if it is unregulated atthe State or local level, is reimbursable under the Act.  For example,some States exempt from their standards any center care that is under theauspices of a religious organization. Some States do not have licensingor registration standards for family day care. Other States do not requirelicensing or registration for family day care until they serve more thana specified number of children.   It should be noted that there are few laws covering in-home care, i.e.,care of a child in that child's own home. Appropriate individuals may bepaid as in-home caregivers. FFP is available for child care provided inthe child's home by a relative who is not part of the assistance unit,such as a grandparent, aunt, or older sibling. FFP also is available forcare by a relative outside of the home if care by that relative meets anyapplicable standards.   <T3>Comment:</T3> A few commenters wanted it clarified that relatives whowere not part of the filing unit, or older siblings who were part of thefiling unit, could be paid for child care services.   <T3>Response:</T3> FFP is available for child care provided by relativeswho are not part of the assistance unit.  However, as noted in the preambleof the proposed regulations, we preclude payment to any members of theassistance unit for providing child care services. Child care paymentsare made to offset direct financial costs to the assistance unit for childcare services. When child care is provided by a member of the assistanceunit, for example, an older sibling watching a younger child, there isno direct cost to that unit for child care. Even if the parent choosesto pay the older sibling, there is only an exchange of funds within theunit, not a direct financial cost to the assistance unit.   We have amended the regulation at andSection; 255.4(f) to include the prohibitionagainst FFP for payments made for care provided by parents or legal guardians,or by members of the assistance unit (including essential persons).  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to clarify what would be requiredof States regarding the requirement that they endeavor to develop guidelinesfor family day care.   <T3>Response:</T3> We decided not to regulate specific requirements inthis area. First, the vast majority of States have guidelines or strongerrequirements already, and therefore regulating in this area would havelimited effect.  Secondly, the statutory provisions requiring that Statesreport on such guidelines means that we will have much better informationin the future on which to base any requirements (or otherwise judge Stateefforts). Finally, the availability of grant funds for fiscal years 1990and 1991 to improve States' licensing and registration requirements meansthat changes in State guidelines or standards are expected, and regulatoryrequirements could easily become obsolete.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted the regulations at andSection; 255.5to incorporate the requirement for parental access.   <T3>Response:</T3> The regulations at andSection;andSection;  255.1(e)(3) and255.4(c)(1) already incorporate this requirement.  Consistent with theStatute, we provide that FFP is available only if the entity providingcare allows parental access. We also require the State to assure in theSupportive Services plan that entities providing care will allow parentalaccess. We believe that these two provisions adequately address the statutoryrequirements on parental access.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to clarify that parental accessmeant access to all parts of a child care facility utilized by childrenat all times without prior notice.  <T3>Response:</T3> We decided not to regulate in this area. As we indicateelsewhere, the legislative history clearly establishes congressional intentnot to create new Federal requirements for child care standards. Becauseparental access is such a closely related issue, we believe a consistentapproach should be used. Although the commenter's definition looks reasonable,we would defer to States to define what parental access means.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to require States to establishstandards on several specified items for all types of care (including exemptcare); guidelines were not considered sufficient. Another wanted us toestablish Federal requirements for informal care to ensure quality andsafety.   <T3>Response:</T3> The conference report, (H. Rep. 100-998, 100th Cong.,2nd Sess. (at page 163)), specifically says: ``The conference agreementdoes not give the Secretary the authority to establish Federal day carestandards. It is not the intent of Congress to stipulate specific day carestandards.'' On this basis, we have not created Federal requirements forchild care standards, and this position received support from a numberof commenters. In the case of family day care, the specific statutory requirementis that the State ``endeavor to develop guidelines for family day care.''Consistent with the principle of not creating Federal requirements, weare neither requiring standards in place of guidelines nor the developmentof guidelines in place of steps to endeavor to develop guidelines.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters wanted us to regulate all centers. <T3>Response:</T3> Because Congress did not intend for us to regulate Federalchild care standards, we have not created specific requirements. However,as discussed later, we have amended andSection; 255.5 to require States toestablish procedures to ensure that center-based care is subject to requirementsdesigned to ensure basic health and safety, including fire safety, protections.  Applicable Tribal Standards  FFP is available for child care on Indian reservations if that care meetsapplicable State or Tribal standards.  When both State and Tribal standardsexist, the Tribal standards are the applicable standard. As required underthe regulatory provision at andSection; 255.5(a), State procedures to ensurethat center-based care is subject to applicable health and safety requirementsmust cover center-based care provided on Indian reservations.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter was concerned that two different childcare standards would apply to a single household if there were an individualin the household subject to the State JOBS program and one subject to aTribal program.   <T3>Response:</T3> There could be two different standards, but the existenceof that situation would depend upon the location of appropriate child careservices, not the nature of the participant's JOBS program. Either participant,working with the State, could seek child care on or off the reservation,depending upon her needs and the needs of her child.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter asked whether State standards apply ifthere are no Tribal standards. Another commenter expressed concern aboutthe State IV-A agency's being responsible for requiring that State licensingstandards be met on Tribal lands.  <T3>Response:</T3> In the absence of Tribal standards, State standardswould apply unless Tribal areas were excepted under State law. If Statelaws are applicable, those laws must be met in order for child care ona reservation to qualify for Federal matching.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One State asked about the ability of a State to pay forunlicensed providers through Indian Tribes.   <T3>Response:</T3> Depending on State and Tribal law, child care providedon a reservation may or may not be subject to State licensing requirements.It could also be subject to Tribal requirements. Whatever the situation,care on a reservation must meet any ``applicable'' standards to be eligiblefor payment under this Part, and we have revised the regulations at andSection;255.4(c)(2) to reference applicable Tribal law.   Matchable Administrative Costs  Many State and local agencies have indicated concern that adequate childcare resources will not be available.  However, the conference report doesnot support an interpretation that Congress intended to provide funds foractivities such as resource development, recruitment and training underthis program. Therefore, the regulations at andSection; 255.4(f) specifythat administrative costs for such activities as recruitment and trainingof providers, licensing, or resource development would not be consideredallowable IV-A costs.  Under the Statute, Congress authorized a separate appropriation of $13,000,000for fiscal years 1990 and 1991 for the Secretary to make grants to theStates to improve licensing and registration requirements and procedures,and to monitor child care provided to children who receive aid under theState IV-A plan. State grants would reflect the State's proportion of thenumber of children in the State receiving aid under the State IV-A plancompared to the national total. The State would have to provide matchingfunds for these funds for an amount that is not less than 10 percent ofthe amount of the grant.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Although two commenters supported this position in part,many commenters wanted us to provide Federal matching for resource developmentand a broad range of other administrative activities. The suggested inclusionswere numerous_matching of services, services information systems, counseling,staff development and training, coordination with other child care systems,joint resource and referral activities, establishing market rates, developmentand implementation of sliding fee scales, establishing payment or reimbursementsystems, provider recruitment, provider training on State and local law,enforcement of child care standards and monitoring, development of after-schoolprograms, provision of provider liability insurance, arranging purchase-of-servicecontracts (including development of requests for proposals and providerselection), creation or expansion of resource and referral systems, upgradingof providers/bringing unlicensed providers into the regulated system/providingtechnical assistance to providers who wish to be licensed, constructionof child care facilities, advertising and recruiting providers to acceptAFDC children, and ensuring that providers comply with State and locallaw. Commenters argued that Federal matching was necessary for these activitiesso that States could: (1) fulfill their responsibilities in guaranteeingcare, counseling individuals and assisting them to locate care; and (2)assure child care expenditures would meet the conditions necessary to beeligible for Federal matching.   <T3>Response:</T3> Some of the items mentioned by commenters clearly fallwithin the definition of allowable administrative costs and would be matchablesince they are necessary for the proper and efficient administration ofthe program. These include: matching of recipients to available child careservices, services information systems, counseling about child care services,State IV-A agency staff development and training, coordinating with otherchild care delivery systems, establishing local market rates, developingand implementing sliding fee scales, establishing payment or reimbursementsystems (as well as systems to collect fees, determine payment accuracy,recoup overpayments, and conduct hearings), and arranging purchase-of-servicecontracts (if this is a method the State has elected for providing care).  When we indicated that funds would not be available for resource development,we were not talking about the costs of matching recipient needs to availableservices or the costs of other coordination or consultation activitiesnecessary for agencies to properly assist recipients in locating services.We were talking about resource development in the broader sense_those activitiesdesigned to increase or to upgrade the overall capacity of the child caredelivery system. As one commenter pointed out, the conferees dropped aHouse provision that would have provided open-ended Federal matching fundsfor the development of new child care resources in the State. We must thereforeconclude that Congress did not intend to provide such funding. On thatbasis we shall not allow Federal matching for general State expenditureson: provider recruitment, provider training (including training on Stateand local law), State programs to provide liability insurance, upgradingof providers (e.g., to bring unlicensed providers into the regulated system),or providing technical assistance to providers who wish to be licensed.We recognize that, in the process of developing information on providersor working out payment agreements, the State agency may provide incidentaltechnical assistance to providers in some of these areas. This is acceptable,but IV-A funds may not be expended upon general resource development activitieswhich serve to benefit a much broader community than this program. Stateagency expenditures on coordinating with other programs to develop after-schoolprograms which would serve AFDC recipients would be matchable, as wouldthe costs of after-school care. However, IV-A funds could not be used foractivities such as the recruitment or training of staff for after-schoolprograms or for modification of existing facilities or programs. Constructioncosts are not matchable under a Comptroller General opinion which prohibitsFederal funding of construction costs under programs unless specific statutoryauthority exists.   Federal matching would be available for the development of a resource andreferral system for the IV-A program or for an appropriate share of thecosts incurred in setting up or maintaining a resource and referral systemwhich jointly benefits the IV-A program and other users.  Where a resourceand referral system already exists, Federal matching could cover the costsof expansion or modification necessary to serve the needs of the IV-A program.Federal matching could also cover fees for obtaining information from existingsystems. However, Federal matching would not be available for expenditureson child care resource and referral services if they were otherwise availableon a non-reimbursable basis. Likewise in the area of monitoring and enforcementof State and local standards for child care, we would match activitieswhich are directly connected with IV-A program requirements. Specifically,we will provide Federal matching funds for the development of proceduresto ensure that center-based care will be subject to applicable health andsafety protections, including fire safety. However, we will not pay forimplementation of such procedures or their ongoing application. Enforcementof State and local laws is a State and local responsibility, and we donot expect to provide Federal funds for State and local government expendituresin meeting their general responsibilities.  Since proper administration of the program includes activities necessaryfor ensuring that expenditures are proper, Federal matching funds willbe available for State agency activities necessary to ensure that childcare meets applicable standards of State and local law and that parentshave access to child care providers. However, State agency activities inthis area should build upon existing monitoring systems. We do not expect,and will not pay for, activities which: (1) duplicate monitoring activitiesof other State and local agencies which have general responsibilities inthis area; or (2) are general in nature and not directly connected withthe provision of services under Parts 255 or 256.  Matching Rates  The costs of providing transportation, work-related expenses, and otherwork-related supportive services are matched at 50 percent and are underthe JOBS cap.  FFP is available for child care benefits at the Federal medical assistancepercentage and is not subject to the funding cap for JOBS for any StateIV-A agency other than Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam and AmericanSamoa. For these jurisdictions, treatment of child care costs incurredis described at andSection; 250.71(c).  Although the Statute does not directly address child care administrativecosts, such costs are matchable at the administrative matching rate forAFDC as expenditures necessary for the proper and efficient administrationof the program. As discussed in the previous section on ``Matchable AdministrativeCosts,'' matchable administrative expenditures would include costs suchas staff, supplies and overhead associated with the determination of eligibilityfor benefits, computation and issuance of benefit payments, review of paymentaccuracy, hearings, program referrals, program planning and management,and data collection and reporting.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to authorize the payment of one-timeapplication or service fees to child care providers as administrative expenditures. <T3>Response:</T3> We will allow these costs as IV-A administrative costs.We do not anticipate that these fees will be extremely costly since theyare intended only to cover the one-time cost of processing the individual'sapplication for child care. When a State agency arranges care at a facilitywhich imposes these fees, the State would be required to pay for them.Where an individual arranges her own care or initiates an application withoutprior approval by the State, the State would have discretion whether topay for the costs of any application or processing fees.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One State was concerned that expenses on rate-settingactivities prior to JOBS implementation would not be matchable.  <T3>Response:</T3> We would match them as necessary and proper for theadministration of the IV-A plan.  <T3>Comment:</T3> A few commenters felt that certain expenditures otherthan payments for child care services_such as  expenditures related toconnecting individuals with child care services, counseling, informationsystems, coordination, and resource and referral_should be matched as program,rather than administrative, expenditures.  <T3>Response:</T3> Title III of the Statute provides matching at the FMAPrate only for ``amounts expended for child care.''  It does not provideit for information and referral activities. In fact, it does not directlyaddress costs for any activities related to the administration of the childcare assistance provisions. (Child care information and referral activitiesunder JOBS are discussed in section 482(c)(3) of the Act.) However, wedecided that such expenditures could be matched as necessary for the properand efficient administration of the child care benefits.  On that basis,they qualify as IV-A administrative costs and are matchable at the 50 percentrate.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to clarify that child care servicesprovided by full-time JOBS staff and staff providing services such as determiningeligibility, computing and issuing benefits, and making referrals wouldbe matched under JOBS at the higher rates.   <T3>Response:</T3> When child care information and referral services areprovided for JOBS participants and child care is approved through the JOBSprogram, costs associated with providing those services may be chargedto the JOBS program. Such costs would be subject to JOBS matching regulations,as provided at andSection; 250.73. Thus, the costs of staff who work full-timeproviding JOBS-related child care information or services (or full-timeon these activities and other JOBS functions), are eligible for the higherJOBS match rate. In addition, when the assessment of child care needs andreferral to appropriate services are provided as part of a JOBS assessment,development of an employability plan, or case management, those costs canbe matched at the higher rate. If child care services are not matchableat the higher rate, then the State can charge the portion of time spentproviding JOBS-related child care to JOBS at the 50 percent rate. Costsof providing these services are also allowable as IV-A administrative costs. If IV-A staff provide child care for employed individuals and former recipients(eligible for transitional child care), and for JOBS participants, thenonly the costs of providing services for JOBS participants are matchableas   IV-F costs, subject to the rules described above. The costs of providingchild care services to individuals other than JOBS participants are matchedas IV-A administrative costs.  Regardless of how costs associated with JOBS-related child care are charged,costs associated with providing transitional child care benefits must becharged as IV-A administrative costs. Further, expenditures on transitionalchild care benefits are chargeable only to IV-A (and not IV-F). As discussedelsewhere, costs associated with administering supportive services otherthan child care are generally matchable only under IV-F; however, whereIV-A staff in non-JOBS areas are authorized to approve education or trainingfor child care and supportive services, staff costs may be charged to titleIV-A as administrative costs.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Another commenter wanted us to clarify that IV-A administrativematch was available for administration of the child care provisions.  <T3>Response:</T3> As discussed above, IV-A administrative match is availablefor such administrative costs.   Fraud And Abuse  Although the Statute does not explicitly extend safeguarding against fraudand abuse to the supportive services authorized under the Statute, we believethat it is in the best interest of the Federal government and the StateIV-A agency to require the State IV-A agency to do so. We have incorporatedsuch a requirement at andSection; 255.4(h).  The State IV-A agency may useany method it deems reasonable to insure that charges are properly claimedand paid, and that they cover services actually received.  Financial reviewsto identify costs not eligible for FFP will be an important part of Federaloversight.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter indicated that we should clarify what wemeant by the requirement at andSection; 255.4(h) that States take reasonableprecautions against fraud and abuse or require that State child care programsbe subject to the provisions of andSection; 235.110.   <T3>Response:</T3> We believe that, consistent with the requirements atandSection; 235.110, States should have methods available for identifyingpotentially fraudulent child care payments (to beneficiaries or child careproviders), procedures for appropriate law enforcement referrals consistentwith due process requirements, and designation of responsible officials.Therefore, we have amended the regulations at andSection; 255.4(h) to makean appropriate reference to the requirements at andSection; 235.110.   <T3>Comment:</T3> We also received a question about whether States wouldbe required to recoup fraudulent child care payments for those receivingbenefits under both Parts 255 and 256.   <T3>Response:</T3> Yes, for the child care benefits program, we are establishingrecoupment rules similar to those in effect for the AFDC program. Our recoupmentpolicies are discussed in more detail in ``The Nature of Child Care Payments,''section which follows.   Special Needs   In the past, many supportive services, especially for persons participatingin employment and training programs, have been allowed as special needs.With the enactment of JOBS and the new child care provisions, Congressestablished specific programs for funding for such services and eliminatedthe need to treat such costs as special needs. Furthermore, for educationand training activities and supportive services other than child care,it established an overall cap on the amount of Federal funds for thesepurposes. Therefore, the State IV-A agency may not pay for child care orfor other supportive services that may be provided under JOBS, as specialneeds.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter raised the issue of whether States whocurrently have a special need item covering training-related needs couldeliminate such an item from their standard (as required by our NPRM) andstill comply with the requirement of the Medicare Catastrophic CoverageAct of 1988, Pub. L. 100-360, which prohibits lowering their AFDC paymentlevels below the levels in effect on May 1, 1988.   <T3>Response:</T3> Yes, they could. Based on the legislative history ofthe Medicare legislation, we have concluded that Congress intended to includeonly basic needs and not special needs in this maintenance of effort provision.  <T3>Comment:</T3> A number of commenters objected to the elimination ofthe option of providing payment for child care and supportive services(including fees and books for education) through special needs. Some commenterswanted the special need option at andSection; 233.20(a)(2)(v) left unchanged,thus allowing the payment method throughout the State.  Others wanted thespecial need option left for areas of the State that do not have a JOBSprogram so that self-initiated training and employment could be supported. Still others wanted the special needs left for non-JOBS participants inboth areas of the State (JOBS and non-JOBS).  <T3>Response:</T3> For the reasons already stated, we have decided notto restore the special need item for child care and other supportive servicesfor employment and training related to JOBS. However, in response to theconcerns which were raised about the feasibility of approving all servicesthrough the JOBS program, we have decided to allow alternative approvalprocedures. For non-JOBS areas of the State, education or training activitiesmay be approved for child care and supportive services by IV-A staff. TheIV-A staff may also authorize one-time work-related expenses to acceptor maintain employment if provided for in the State Supportive Servicesplan. Child care services would be covered by the payment of child careunder title IV-A.  Other supportive services and one-time work-relatedexpenses would be charged to the JOBS program. We maintain, as stated inthe preamble to the NPRM, that congressional intent was to fund these supportiveservices under the JOBS cap. Child care and supportive services neededfor employment, education or training in non-JOBS areas of the State mustmeet State and Federal approval criteria (e.g., consistency with an appropriateemployment goal and satisfactory progress). However, a streamlined approvalprocess, which could be done by an AFDC eligibility worker as an adjunctto the normal IV-A eligibility functions, would be acceptable.  Nature Of Child Care Payments   Section 402(g)(3)(A) of the Act provides that child care payments are fundedunder section 403(a) of the Act.  However, they are not IV-A assistancepayments as such.  Thus, (1) they are covered under a Supportive Servicesplan, rather than the State IV-A plan; (2) their receipt does not providecategorical Medicaid eligibility; (3) there is no entitlement to directpayment of benefits; (4) they are not subject to disallowance under theAFDC quality control system; and (5) they are not treated as assistancepayments for the purposes of child support enforcement. At the same time,however, these child care benefits are funded on the same basis as AFDC,as an open-ended entitlement program, and they are administered by thesame agency. Thus, for ease of administration, we are providing at andSection;255.4(i) that they be subject to many of the same administrative and financialrules as AFDC. For example, child care payments are subject to similarfinancial reporting requirements, similar procedures apply with respectto issues like the appeal of disallowances and the treatment of cancelledand uncashed checks, and grants to States are subject to the same basicadministrative rules.   As indicated earlier, child care expenditures are not subject to disallowanceunder the AFDC Quality Control (QC) system. It appears that the QC systemwould not be an effective or proper vehicle for this purpose. However,consistent with the efficient administration of the program, we may usethe existing QC process as a means of sampling cases to gather informationon the correctness of child care payments. Using sample cases from theQC system, we would take disallowances following the procedures currentlyused for AFDC administrative costs.   <T3>Comment:</T3> A few commenters expressed concerns about the referencesto the QC system and wanted clarification of our plans.  <T3>Response:</T3> As we indicated in the NPRM preamble, child care paymentsunder Parts 255 and 256 are not considered assistance payments for thepurposes of Quality Control (e.g., for the purpose of andSection;andSection;205.40 or 205.44). However, as a point of clarification, child care expenseswhich are covered through the disregard will continue to be included underthe QC system because they are part of the assistance payment. Since thechild care disregard is subject to QC review, we would take no separatedisallowances on those cases. Separate reviews would be limited to paymentof child care costs through other methods_such as direct reimbursement,vouchers, etc.  We may use the QC system to draw samples of cases with child care paymentsfor review. However, we recognize that any sample drawn through the QCsystem may need to be supplemented to include cases receiving transitionalbenefits and perhaps additional cases receiving benefits under Part 255if we are to comprehensively review a State's child care payments.   We would expect financial reviews to cover such areas as the accuracy ofpayment levels. We would look at whether payment levels were within thelimits established by law (no more than actual costs, the statewide limit,or local market rates). To the extent that payments did not meet Federalrequirements, they would be subject to potential disallowances. We willissue an Action Transmittal within ninety days establishing the recordkeepingrequirements that States will need to follow in order to qualify for Federalmatching.   Similar disallowance procedures would be applied to improper claims forexpenditures on supportive services made under title IV-F. However, thesereviews would focus more heavily on consistency of expenditures with theapproved State plan, since Federal rules in this area are minimal.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to clarify whether QC reviewerswould be used to review child care payments.  <T3>Response:</T3> We have not yet determined the circumstances under whichQC reviewers would be used to review child care payments and to make recommendationsabout whether disallowance are appropriate.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to clarify that disallowancesfor payments under Part 256 would also be excluded from the AFDC QualityControl system.  <T3>Response:</T3> This is the case. The regulations at andSection; 256.4(b)indicate that the provisions at andSection; 255.4 on disallowances also applyto Part 256.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to clarify the circumstancesunder which we would take disallowances for child care administration. <T3>Response:</T3> Claims of administrative expenditures would be disallowedif the expenditures were not used for the purposes of this program or wereotherwise unallowable under this program. For example, we could not paycosts associated with providing child care to Food Stamp-only or GeneralAssistance recipients, for the construction of child care facilities, orfor activities excluded under andSection; 255.4(f).   <T3>Comment:</T3> A few commenters asked that we clarify child care overpaymentand recoupment policies. As stated earlier, one commenter asked specificallyabout the requirement to recover fraudulent payments.   <T3>Response:</T3> We believe it would be appropriate for States to employpolicies on overpayment and recoupment which are similar to those usedunder the AFDC program. We expect State agencies to promptly take any actionsnecessary to correct underpayment and overpayment. Payments made to adjustfor underpayment would be disregarded in determining eligibility for AFDC,like other child care payments.  For those who received prior overpayments but are no longer receiving childcare payments, recovery would normally be made by appropriate action underState law against the income or resources of the individual or family.For those who received prior overpayments and are still receiving childcare payments, recovery would normally be made either through repaymentby the recipient or by reducing future child care payments.  Overpayment recovery must be attempted in all cases involving current recipientsof child care benefits, in all cases of fraud, and in all cases where theoverpayment amount would equal or exceed the costs of recovery.  Overpayment recovery should usually be attempted from the recipient ofthe child care payment regardless of whether the recipient of the childcare payment is a provider of child care services or a recipient of childcare benefits. However, based on the nature of the agreement between theState agency and providers, there may be cases where the State is obligatedto pay an amount to the provider in excess of the amount which would beeligible for FFP. In these cases, the State agency need not attempt overpaymentrecovery, but it cannot receive Federal matching funds for such an overpayment.Examples of such situations include cases where the State purchases a numberof child care slots, but does not fully utilize them, and cases where theState agrees to pay more than the allowable local market rate. In othercases where an individual receives child care services, which may havebeen approved by the State, but were not eligible for Federal matching(e.g., they did not meet applicable standards of State and local law; thechild was not eligible under andSection;andSection; 255.2(a) or 256.2(a); orthe family was not eligible at the time under andSection; 256.2(b)), it mayalso not be possible to collect the overpayment from the provider.  Dependingupon the individual case circumstances, it might be appropriate for theState to attempt recovery of these latter types of overpayments from theindividual or family receiving child care benefits (e.g., where a familykept a child in child care after participation ceased or where they wereno longer employed).   In andSection; 255.4(j), we are incorporating these principles and relatedaspects of the AFDC recoupment process, derived from andSection; 233.20(a)(13)where appropriate.   We decided not to impose the 90 percent rule (which applies to AFDC overpayments)for the recoupment of child care overpayments because it is not a statutoryrequirement for this program and it seemed inappropriate to impose sucha rule when recoupment could be coming from provider payments rather thatrecipient benefits. However, when recovering an overpayment from an individualstill receiving child care benefits, the recovery shall result in the familyretaining, for any month, from the combined aid, financial assistance,income and liquid resources of the family, a reasonable amount of funds,consistent with preventing the unnecessary disruption of existing childcare services and with the continued requirement to guarantee child care. Any child care overpayments may be recovered from other IV-A child carepayments. Recovery of child care overpayments may not be made from AFDCgrants, except on a voluntary basis.  Recovery of overpayments of supportive services paid under IV-F would followsimilar standards. Such recoveries could only be made from subsequent IV-Fsupportive services payments, not from AFDC or IV-A child care payments. Due Process  Due process requirements (using the JOBS or IV-A hearing process, as appropriate)would apply to child care services. However, except in situations wherea change in the method of payment affects AFDC benefit levels, requirementsfor timely notice would not apply to disputes about the method of payment.Under this Part, the State IV-A agency has discretion about the methodof payment to be used; unlike the AFDC program, recipients are not necessarilyentitled to assistance in any particular form.   If disputes arise about the provision of child care benefits under thispart or the State IV-A agency proposes to deny, discontinue, terminateor reduce child care benefits, the individual is entitled to a hearing,but is not entitled to a continuation of child care benefits in the sameamount or form pending that hearing. Consistent with the requirements ofandSection; 205.10, however, the individual's AFDC payment may not be reducedbecause of sanctions under andSection; 250.34 or because of changes in themethod of guaranteeing an individual's child care benefits while a hearingis pending. For example, in cases where a recipient's participation ina JOBS activity or in education or training ceased in non-JOBS areas (e.g.,due to illness or termination due to unsatisfactory progress), the StateIV-A agency would cease providing child care benefits. The individual couldappeal that State IV-A agency decision, but child care benefits would notbe provided during conciliation or while a hearing was pending. In themeantime, the recipient might be prevented from continuing (or resuming)participation because of the termination of child care benefits. She couldnot have her AFDC benefits reduced for non-participation while a hearingwas pending, and the termination of child care benefits would be consideredin determining whether she had good cause for non-participation duringthat period.   <T3>Comment:</T3> A number of commenters felt the proposed regulationsviolated due process requirements and the requirements of the Family SupportAct regarding the applicability of <T3>Goldberg</T3> v. <T3>Kelly</T3>. They objected to our position that recipients of childcare under Part 255 would not be eligible for continuation of benefitspending a hearing. Other concerns included the consistency in treatmentbetween the two classes of child care beneficiaries (those on AFDC receivingbenefits and those receiving transitional child care) and the potentialfor unnecessary losses of child care arrangements.  <T3>Response:</T3> To help ensure that due process requirements are met,we have changed the proposed regulations at andSection; 255.2(g) to add requirementsthat the State IV-A agency inform families about their rights and responsibilitiesand respond to requests for assistance within a reasonable period of time.However, we decided not to change our position on hearings and aid paidpending. First, the Family Support Act provision on <T3>Goldberg </T3>v. <T3>Kelly </T3>applies only to disputes related to JOBS participation;it does not apply to general disputes on child care. Secondly, the standardsunder the <T3>Goldberg </T3>v. <T3>Kelly </T3>decision would not require aid paid pending a hearing underthese circumstances. In this decision, the Court recognized a distinctionbetween welfare assistance, which provides ``the means to obtain essentialfood, clothing, housing, and medical care,'' and other kinds of assistancewhich do not provide ``the very means by which to live.'' ``The extentto which procedural due process must be afforded the recipient is influencedby the extent to which he may be `condemned to suffer grievous loss.' ''Thus, under <T3>Goldberg </T3>v. <T3>Kelly,</T3> the loss of child care benefits should not be held to thesame due process requirements as the loss of financial assistance becauseit does not touch ``the means by which to live'' in the same manner. Byrequiring continuation of financial assistance, unless declined, pendinga hearing, our regulations meet due process requirements.  As stated earlier, we saw a distinction between child care benefits providedto a recipient and the transitional benefits provided to a former recipient(where we do require aid paid pending). In short, in the case of an AFDCrecipient, we know that her basic needs are being met through AFDC untila hearing is held; further, a JOBS participant would not be subject toparticipation requirements if necessary care was not being guaranteed;and, for an employed recipient, the disregard would be available to preventthe loss of a job or income until a hearing is held. Since a recipientof transitional care typically has earned income as her basic means ofsupport, we reasoned that the loss of that care could result in the lossof her basic means of support and, therefore, we believe that requiringaid be paid pending a hearing in such cases is reasonable. <T3>Comment:</T3> Several States wanted to know if Federal matching isavailable for child care benefits paid pending a hearing.  <T3>Response:</T3> In the case of transitional benefits, where aid mustbe paid pending a hearing, Federal matching would be available for suchassistance. Nevertheless, if the hearing decision is adverse to the recipient,such aid must be recovered. For child care benefits under Part 255, wewould not provide Federal matching for aid paid pending a hearing.  <T3>Comment:</T3> A couple of commenters objected to the language at andSection;255.2(h), that changes in the manner of payment were not subject to timelynotice requirements. Some expressed concerns about the continuity of care;one suggested that timely (ten-day) notices should be required when a changein method would affect the family's contribution.  A couple of commenters wanted us to distinguish between changes in themanner of child care payment and changes in the type of care. They thoughtour language implied that timely notice requirements would apply to changesin the type of child care arrangements and wanted us to clarify that position.  <T3>Response:</T3> We do not believe that timely notices should alwaysbe required when the manner of payment is changed.  The Statute clearlygives the State the authority to select the methods of providing care;individuals are not entitled to receive care under any particular method.The authority for the State to change the manner of payment would be asimple extension of the authority of the State to select a method of providingcare.   However, we do recognize that changes in the method of provision of carecould disrupt child care arrangements or otherwise negatively affect theindividual's child care benefits. In such cases, timely notice should beprovided, and we have revised the regulations at andSection;andSection;  255.2(h)and 256.4(d) accordingly. Specifically, if a change in the method of providingchild care (i.e., a change in the manner of payment) would involve a discontinuation,suspension, reduction, or termination of benefits, or force a change inchild care arrangements, the State must provide timely notice. Timely noticerequirements would not apply if the change in method of providing childcare did not have one of these effects.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One State had questions about how States would take intoaccount changes in the statewide payment levels, market rates, and standards,particularly as they would affect vendors.  <T3>Response:</T3> If a change is made to the statewide payment levels,market rates, or applicable standards of State and local law, child carebeing provided at the time of the change is subject to the change. Thereis no statutory authority for States to phase-in such a change by grandfatheringexisting child care arrangements. States should be aware of this requirementwhen entering into arrangements or contracts with child care providers.A State might choose to include provisions for modification or cancellationin order to avoid questions about the availability of Federal matching. Child Care Standards (andSection; 255.5 of the Final Regulations) The language of the Act reflects Congress' intent to ensure the healthand well-being of the children for whom child care is provided. Child caremust meet current applicable standards of State and local law; however,States are not required to develop new standards. Consistent with congressionalintent, we are not creating Federal requirements in this area. At andSection;255.1(e), we require that the State Supportive Services plan include anassurance that the State will meet the appropriate standards of State andlocal law (and/or Tribal law, where applicable). The State must make thestandards available to the Family Support Administration, upon request,for the purposes of program reviews, payment reviews and audits.   The regulations incorporate the requirements in the Statute that the Stateprovide the Secretary, upon request, with a description of State and localrequirements for center-based care designed to ensure basic health andsafety, including fire safety, protections and endeavor to develop guidelinesfor family day care. The Secretary shall report to the Congress on thenature and content of State and local standards for health and safety byOctober 1, 1992. We will be sending an Action Transmittal to the StateIV-A agencies at a future date requesting the information necessary tomeet these requirements. For the purpose of the one-time report to Congress,it would be helpful if the State IV-A agency describes the procedures thatboth have been and will be established. The State also must endeavor todevelop guidelines for family day care if such guidelines do not alreadyexist.   We have revised the regulations at andSection; 255.5 to provide that theState will have to make available, upon request of the Secretary, informationon the applicable standards of State and local law, as well as on its basichealth and safety requirements for center-based care. This change reflectsour changes to the requirements on States regarding center-based care,discussed in response to the following comment, and it makes the regulationsconsistent with the language in the NPRM. The revised regulations alsoindicate that the Secretary may require information on the developmentof guidelines for family day care. The guidelines information is not addressedin the Supportive Services plan, but is subject to reporting under theStatute.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters objected to the language at andSection;255.2(a), where we said that States had to have procedures to ensure thatcenter-based child care would be subject to ``applicable'' standards ofState and local law including those designed to ensure basic health andsafety protection, and fire safety. Some commenters felt this languagewas inconsistent with our preamble language and the statutory language.Some wanted the regulatory language revised to correspond to the preamblelanguage, which more directly reflected the Statute.   <T3>Response:</T3> We have revised the regulations at andSection; 255.5(a)to require that the State establish procedures to ensure that center-basedchild care will be subject to State and local requirements designed toensure basic health and safety, including fire safety, protections. Thislanguage more closely follows the Statute. Uniform Reporting Requirements for Child Care (andSection; 255.6 of the FinalRegulations) Consistent with the requirements of section 606 of the Statute, the State   IV-A agency is required to report information on child care to ensurethat the provisions of the Statute are effectively implemented. These requirementsare addressed in andSection; 255.6 of the regulations.  We also have includeda requirement that the State IV-A agency report the number of childrenfor whom care is provided, by type of care, under both Parts 255 and 256. As in any other fiscal expenditure, adequate information must be in thecase record documenting these expenditures.   We have addressed specific comments on uniform reporting requirements forchild care under the general section on uniform reporting.  <ITAG tagnum="41">PART 256_TRANSITIONAL CHILD CARE  </ITAG>Purpose (andSection; 256.0 of the Final Regulations)   The purpose of this part is to implement section 302 of the Family SupportAct of 1988. State Plan Requirements (andSection; 256.1 of the Final Regulations)   The State Supportive Services plan must include the methods available toprovide extended child care. We suggest that the State IV-A agency usethe same methods, except for the income disregard, that it has in placefor providing child care to AFDC recipients during employment, educationand training activities, including activities under JOBS.   The State Supportive Services plan must also contain the sliding fee scaleunder which the family will contribute to the cost of the child care.  As in the case of the initial JOBS plan, we expect the State IV-A agencyto submit a Supportive Services plan for transitional child care 45 daysbefore the April 1, 1990 effective date. If a State IV-A agency has notpreviously submitted a Supportive Services plan because it has not implementedits JOBS program, the Supportive Services plan for transitional child caremust contain both the provisions discussed here and any provisions describedat andSection; 255.1 that apply to transitional care. For example, the transitionalplan must include necessary assurances on procedures and information onlocal market rates.  As discussed in the preamble to andSection; 256.2, we have added a requirementthat the State include in its Supportive Services plan a description ofits application requirements for transitional benefits.    Eligibility (andSection; 256.2 of the Final Regulations)   Basic EligibilityRequirements  Effective April 1, 1990, certain AFDC recipients will, upon loss of eligibilityfor AFDC because of employment, become eligible for 12 consecutive monthsof child care.  To be eligible for this benefit, the former recipient musthave received AFDC (or been considered a recipient under andSection; 233.20(a)(3)(viii)(D))for 3 of the prior 6 months. We define the first month of the period ofeligibility as the month the individual becomes ineligible for AFDC becauseof one of the following three events:  (1) any increase in earned income;  (2) the loss of the $30+\1/3\ or the $30 disregard because of the expirationof the time limits on their use; or  (3) for AFDC-UP cases only, an increase in the number of hours worked bythe principal earner to 100 hours or more per month.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that we clarify that eligibilitybased on an increase in the hours of work would result only from an increasein hours by the principal wage earner.  <T3>Response:</T3> Although a clarification may not be necessary, sincehours of employment do not directly affect AFDC eligibility except in thecase of the principal earner, we revised the preceding preamble languageon eligibility to clarify that only an increase in the hours worked bythe principal earner would cause eligibility.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter was concerned about the eligibility requirementsfor transitional benefits not being parallel to existing programs usingtitle XX.  <T3>Response:</T3> We realize these eligibility requirements may differfrom requirements in other programs, but the  requirements are statutory,and we cannot revise them.  There may be greater opportunity for achievingconsistency by modifying requirements in other programs. In particular,eligibility requirements for title XX child care benefits are not set byFederal law, but are determined by the individual States.   <T3>Comment:</T3> A few commenters objected to the requirement of receivingAFDC in 3 of the preceding 6 months. They felt that it penalized new recipientswho receive AFDC for periods of less than 3 months, as well as those Statesthat are able to quickly assist AFDC recipients in finding employment.Furthermore, they raised concern over a possible incentive to AFDC recipientsto remain on AFDC for at least 3 months before securing employment so thatthey could be eligible for transitional child care benefits.  <T3>Response:</T3> The requirement that former recipients received AFDCfor 3 out of preceding 6 months was set in the Statute. It is consistentwith prior transitional benefit provisions.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter requested that recipient declaration beallowed in determining whether the family received AFDC benefits during3 of the preceding 6 months in cases where families received AFDC in anotherState.  <T3>Response:</T3> In cases where the State does not have direct accessto data on prior AFDC receipt, recipient declaration would be allowed,but States are expected to develop and follow appropriate verificationprocedures.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to clarify that non-JOBS participantsare eligible for transitional child care benefits.  <T3>Response:</T3> The regulations at andSection; 256.2(b), which specifiesthe basic conditions under which families are eligible for transitionalchild care, includes no reference to JOBS.  Therefore, all AFDC recipientsare eligible for benefits, provided they meet all eligibility requirementsdiscussed above.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to revise our regulations becausethey did not cover child care related to acceptance of a job under theguarantee.  <T3>Response:</T3> We have revised andSection; 256.2 so that the guaranteecovers care needed to accept and retain employment.  Application for Benefits  We will allow the State to establish its own requirements for determiningeligibility for transitional child care benefits. These requirements mustbe included in the Supportive Services plan. The requirements could varydepending on the need of the State for eligibility and payment information.For example, a State that has current information about recipients mightapprove transitional child care and establish fees through a recertificationprocess. In other cases, where the State does not have current information(e.g., where the individual's arrangements with a relative for unpaid careare discontinued and she begins needing child care benefits 6 months aftershe leaves AFDC), the same State might require a full application.  <T3>Comment:</T3> While two commenters supported the written applicationrequirement contained in the NPRM as an administrative necessity, manycommenters opposed it. Most were opposed to it because of the burden thatit would place on agencies and clients, and because of the gap in childcare that could result. A few commenters also noted that this sort of applicationis not required for extended Medicaid benefits and, therefore, should notbe required for transitional child care benefits either.  A few commenters suggested that there be no requirement at all; some wantedautomatic eligibility_at least for those who cooperated in establishingtheir eligibility before they become ineligible for AFDC or for those whowere already receiving child care benefits under JOBS. Other suggestionsincluded: (1) requiring that an application be filed: (a) based on theneed to know; (b) if at least one month had elapsed since termination fromAFDC; (c) only in situations where there has been a break in the periodof State-supplemented day care and the break was at the household's request;and (2) giving States the option to require applications: (a) under anycircumstance; (b) when at least one month had elapsed since leaving AFDC;or (c) if the client had a break in eligibility. In place of a writtenapplication, a few commenters suggested these alternatives: (1) recertificationwith minimum data asked and prompt approval; (2) recertification exceptin cases where factors have already been documented in the case file andthere is no expectation of change; and (3) oral applications or other applicationmethods, short of a formal, written application.  <T3>Response:</T3> We have changed the regulations and will no longer requirea written application. The revised language at andSection; 256.2(b) indicatesthat the family must request transitional child care benefits and meetappropriate application requirements established by the State. These requirementscould vary depending on the need of the State for eligibility and paymentinformation.  In light of the flexibility we provided in this area, we felt it was importantto know the nature of the requirements established by the State. Therefore,we amended andSection; 256.1 to add an additional item to the SupportiveServices plan which would describe State application requirements.   <T3>Comment:</T3> We received similar objections to our policy denyingretroactive benefits.   <T3>Response:</T3> We have decided to change our policy and require theprovision of retroactive benefits. Therefore, we have deleted the languagewhich was at andSection; 256.2(b)(3) of the NPRM indicating that there wasno eligibility for benefits prior to the month of application. We havealso deleted preamble language saying that individuals should be clearlyinformed about the loss of transitional child care benefits for any monthprior to the month of application if they fail to apply.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to include a reasonable timeperiod for taking action on applications in the regulations. The commentersuggested that we set a 15-day time limit for acting on an applicationthat is submitted just before the family becomes ineligible for AFDC anda 45-day limit when there has been a gap of one month or longer in AFDCeligibility.  <T3>Response:</T3> Since we deleted the mandatory application requirement,we expect State requirements, and the circumstances under which applicationis made, to vary considerably. Therefore, we do not feel that we shouldprescribe such standards. Nevertheless, we expect States to act upon requestsfor child care benefits_under this Part and Part 255_within a reasonabletime period. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted clarification on the criteria thatshould be used in reviewing applications for approval or rejection.  <T3>Response:</T3> We do not want to regulate unnecessarily in this area,because we anticipate substantial variation in application requirementsamong and within States.  Obviously, approval of benefits should be basedon sound, documented and complete information. There should also be a specificrequest for benefits. Applications should be disapproved when informationindicates ineligibility or when information is insufficient to determineeligibility or fees. If an application is disapproved, the State shouldsend a notice which includes the reason for the disapproval. The Statealso must inform an applicant of the opportunity to have a hearing if shewants to appeal a disapproval of benefits.   The regulations at andSection; 256.2(b)(3) have been revised to indicatethat families must request transitional benefits, must provide the informationnecessary for the State to determine their eligibility and fees, and meetappropriate application requirements of the State.   Notifications  The State has the responsibility of informing the recipient that the transitionalchild care benefits are available. Such notification should take placeat the time the State provides the program information required at andSection;250.40 and be repeated at the time of termination of the individual's AFDCbenefits. Section 256.4(c) requires that recipients be notified of theirpotential eligibility for transitional child care when they become ineligiblefor AFDC and that they be informed of the steps they need to take to ensurethat they request and receive all benefits for which they would be eligible.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to require States to developprocedures for clients to access child care after they find employment. <T3>Response:</T3> We decided not to create regulatory requirements inthis area. First, they would unduly interfere with the State's flexibilityto establish the methods by which individuals would receive benefits underthis part.  Secondly, they would violate our general principle not to regulateprocedural matters unnecessarily. Further, the statutory language doesnot support such requirements. In the context of the JOBS program, theStatute establishes certain expectations about State agency assistancein helping individuals access child care; it does not establish similarexpectations for State agency assistance to individuals seeking transitionalbenefits. Thus, we concluded that no requirements were intended here. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that the notification shouldcover penalties for quitting a job or failing to cooperate with the childsupport enforcement program.  <T3>Response:</T3> We agree that it is important that recipients are awareof these responsibilities and penalties.  However, they should be informedof all their rights and responsibilities under the program. We thereforeadded a requirement in andSection;andSection;  255.2(g)(1) and 256.4(c) tospecify this State responsibility.  <T3>Comment:</T3> A couple of commenters felt the transitional notice shouldbe separate from the notice of AFDC termination and recommended that noticesbe made by personal contact.  <T3>Response:</T3> We did not feel changes here were necessary.  Underthe proposed regulations, we already required that the notification begiven ``in writing, and orally as appropriate.'' We also required thatindividuals first receive information about these benefits under the JOBSorientation. To impose further notice requirements would seem unnecessarilyonerous on States and would be contrary to our general philosophy not tounnecessarily regulate State notification procedures. Furthermore, we didnot feel that a separate notice was necessarily preferable from the recipient'spoint of view. A well-designed single notice_or single mailing_could bemore effective than separate notices.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter thought that notices should cover the methodsof providing transitional versus recipient care.   <T3>Response:</T3> Such information might be covered under the JOBS orientationor under the new rights and responsibilities requirement that we addedin response to another comment.  We do not believe a specific requirementis indicated. As we discussed elsewhere, under the JOBS program, thereare detailed informational requirements regarding the provision of childcare services. The Statute does not create similar informational requirementsfor transitional care, and it makes no provision for the administrationof those benefits. Therefore, we do not believe extensive requirementsin this area were intended.   Effective Date  We considered when the first month of ineligibility must occur to qualifya former recipient for this benefit. We decided that the first month ofineligibility for AFDC_and the concomitant first month of eligibility fortransitional child care_must be April, 1990, or later, because April 1,1990, is the effective date for the transitional child care provisions.Therefore, to receive transitional child care for April, 1990, the lastmonth of AFDC benefits must have been in March, 1990, and March would beone of the three months with receipt of AFDC benefits required during thesix-month period following September which are necessary for eligibility.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted clarification on which month isthe first month of eligibility_the effective month of AFDC discontinuanceor the month when AFDC should have been discontinued if an error is made. <T3>Response:</T3> Eligibility for transitional child care benefits beginswhen AFDC should have been discontinued; that is when the family becomesineligible for AFDC. The statutory language refers to the period when afamily ``ceases to receive aid to families with dependent children.'' Wedo not consider payments made in error to be such aid.  Rather, we consideronly aid paid while the family is eligible to be ``aid to families withdependent children.''  Thus, the fact that a State continues to make AFDCpayments erroneously does not affect the eligibility period for transitionalchild care.  <T3>Comment:</T3> A few commenters wanted us to interpret the April 1,1990, effective date differently so that more individuals would be eligible.Some suggested that we extend the benefit to those already receiving sucha benefit under a State program, provided that all other eligibility requirementswere met at the time they became ineligible for AFDC and during the periodbefore April 1, 1990. Another commenter wanted participants in States thathad JOBS in place before April 1, 1990, who became employed and subsequentlyineligible for AFDC prior to April 1, 1990, to be eligible for benefitsfor the remainder of their 12-month transition.  <T3>Response:</T3> We do not believe a change in policy is indicated. Webelieve the policy in the proposed regulations represents the best interpretationof the April 1, 1990, effective date for this provision. It is consistentwith the interpretation used in implementing prior transitional benefitprovisions under the Social Security Act.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that the final regulations includethe provision that the first month of AFDC ineligibility be on or afterApril 1, 1990, in order for the family to be eligible for this benefit. <T3>Response:</T3> We have added this provision to the final regulationsat andSection; 256.2(b)(4).   Period of Eligibility  Based on the intent that families have help with their child care needsfor 12 months after losing their AFDC benefits, the regulations providethat families who do not need child care immediately after such loss ofAFDC may begin to receive child care in any month during the 12-month eligibilityperiod for the remaining balance of the 12-month period. For example, afamily that does not need child care until five months after going offAFDC would qualify for that month and the remaining six months of the 12-montheligibility period.   States must keep case records open for 12 months after the individual,who loses AFDC eligibility, becomes eligible for the transitional childcare.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter opposed the 12-month limit on benefits. <T3>Response:</T3> The 12-month eligibility period was set by Congressin the Statute.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted everyone to receive 12 months ofbenefits regardless of when employment was found or the reason they losteligibility for AFDC.  <T3>Response:</T3> The eligibility for and timing of the transitional childcare benefits is set by the Act. The 12-month eligibility period beginswhen the family loses AFDC eligibility because of increased hours of orcountable income from employment, not when a member of the family findsemployment. For example, an AFDC recipient could be employed, but stillbe eligible for AFDC. If a few months later she gets a raise and becomesineligible for AFDC because her income is now too high, she is eligiblefor 12 months of transitional child care from that point. If, however,a family loses AFDC eligibility for a reason other than the employment-relatedones specified in the Act, it cannot receive transitional child care benefits,even if a member finds a job during the 12-month period after the familyloses AFDC eligibility.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted to know whether those in the AFDC-UPprogram were eligible for the full 12 months of benefit if the State currentlylimits receipt of AFDC benefits to 6 months and they find a job after this6-month benefit ends.  <T3>Response:</T3> In this situation, the family became ineligible forAFDC because of the time-limitation on UP benefits.  The family is ineligiblefor transitional child care benefits because it does not meet the statutoryeligibility requirement that the family become ineligible for AFDC becauseof employment.   Good Cause  The Act provides that a family is ineligible for transitional child careif the caretaker relative, who is a member of the AFDC family, terminatesemployment without good cause or fails to cooperate in establishing paternityand enforcing child support. Cooperation in establishing paternity andenforcing child support is discussed at andSection; 232.12.  If the caretaker relative loses a job (with good cause as defined at andSection;250.35), and then (prior to re-establishing eligibility for AFDC) findsanother, the family would qualify for the remaining portion of the 12-montheligibility period. Also, if the caretaker relative loses a job and thefamily goes back on AFDC, that family could again become eligible for afull 12 months of transitional child care as long as it meets the eligibilityrequirements discussed above.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter opposed penalties for terminating employmentwithout good cause.  <T3>Response:</T3> The Statute provides that a family is ineligible forbenefits if a caretaker relative who is a member of the family terminatesemployment without good cause.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted us to clarify the regulations aboutprovision of a new, full 12-month period of eligibility when the participantloses or quits her job with good cause, goes back on AFDC, and then findsanother job.  <T3>Response:</T3> We have done so at andSection; 256.2(e) in the final regulations. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter questioned whether our reference to andSection;250.35 was appropriate. The particular concern was that andSection; 250.35did not necessarily cover the loss of a job which was beyond the recipient'scontrol.  <T3>Response:</T3> Loss of eligibility only occurs when an individual terminatesher employment. Thus, ineligibility would only occur when the individualtakes an action which precipitates the loss of the job. Furthermore, theregulations at andSection; 250.35 have been amended to include situationsbeyond the individual's control. We therefore believe the reference toandSection; 250.35 is appropriate and adequate.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that we require appropriate notificationof the potential sanctions for non-cooperation.  <T3>Response:</T3> As discussed elsewhere, we believe that the State shouldprovide recipients this information, and we have made appropriate changesto the regulations.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter asked that we make the references in theregulations to ``member'' and ``caretaker relative'' in andSection;andSection;256.2(a), 256.2(d), and 256.2(e) consistent.   <T3>Response:</T3> We have not made these changes in the body of the finalregulations because there are statutory differences between the two terms.Furthermore, if we change each of the named references to ``member,'' webroaden the base for penalty. That is, a family could become ineligiblefor benefits based on the actions of any family member instead of the actionsof a caretaker relative alone. Conversely, if we change each of the referencesto ``caretaker relative'', we limit the scope of the guarantee availableto the family. The family could only receive transitional child care ifit was necessary to keep a caretaker relative employed. Child care neededfor the employment of family members other than the caretaker would beexcluded. Fee Requirement (andSection; 256.3 of the Final Regulations)   Section 402(g)(3)(A)(vii) of the Act requires the State IV-A agency toestablish a sliding fee scale for the purpose of calculating a family'scontribution for transitional child care.   The final regulations provide States flexibility in determining the formulafor calculating these fees. The only regulatory requirement is that allrecipients of benefits under this Part must make some contribution.  <T3>Comment:</T3> In the NPRM, we asked for suggestions for Federal ruleson imposing specific limits on the fee scales determined by States. Mostof the comments we received suggested that we give States flexibility andallow them to use existing formulas developed for other child care programsin the State. The following are some of the specific suggestions: (1) allowStates to use their own formulas, which would be included in the SupportiveServices plan; (2) require payment by the family of 100 percent of thecost of care if family income exceeds 185 percent of the poverty level;(3) do not require a payment of any amount from families below the povertylevel; and (4) make the sliding fee scale optional.   <T3>Response:</T3> The Statute explicitly requires that the State establishsliding fee scales, and we cannot make it optional. However, in responseto the strong support for State flexibility in this area, in the absenceof similar requirements across States, and in the interest of reducingadministrative hurdles to program coordination, we have decided to allowState flexibility in determining the formula for calculating fees. Theonly requirement we decided to impose at this time is a requirement thatall recipients of benefits under this Part make some contribution, howeverminimal. We believe such a requirement would not create serious compatibilityproblems and we consider it essential to establish the transitional natureof these benefits and develop recipient responsibility for self-support.We are not setting Federal requirements on the significance of that contribution,and we recognize that the contribution expected from those with the lowestincome levels might be no more than a token amount (and contributions mightbe subject to a different payment schedule).   Although we have decided not to regulate substantially in this area, weare still concerned that States establish scales which require meaningfulcontributions from families able to pay. We will monitor the State practicesin this area over the coming few years and will reconsider our regulatoryapproach if it appears Congressional intent is not being met in this area. <T3>Comment:</T3> Other commenters wanted clarification about how to determinefamily income; one commenter suggested counting all income normally countedplus income of dependent children. Commenters also asked whether they couldadd in other factors (e.g., expense of care) besides ability to pay inestablishing their fee structures.  <T3>Response:</T3> The State may determine income using AFDC rules forcounting and verifying income (at andSection;andSection;  233.20 and 233.36),or it may use income rules established by other State child care programs.Also, it may consider factors besides income in setting fees as long asthose factors directly affect the family's ability to pay. For example,the State could consider the number of children requiring child care services.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted the States to have flexibility inthe method of payment and the setting of their fees. The commenter suggestedthat States have the option to develop a sliding scale which establishesthe State's obligation for payment rather than setting recipient fees.One consequence of the proposed approach would be that recipients incurthe full costs of more expensive care.  <T3>Response:</T3> Although we provide States flexibility in establishingpayment methods, fee amounts, and fee collection procedures, we do notthink this commenter's approach is consistent with congressional intent.It would not have the same effect on the recipient as a traditional slidingfee scale system, and recipient fees would not fully reflect the recipient'sability to pay. We are particularly concerned that this approach couldwork to discriminate against recipients based on their geographic locationor the needs of the child, and that it would unduly restrict parental choice. Collection of Fees  States may set different periods of payment collection for differing levelsof payment. For example, it may not be cost-effective to collect and recordvery low fees every month. Data will be required in the case record concerningthe fee schedule and the collection of the fee.   Under the regulations at andSection; 256.3(e), the State IV-A agency musttake appropriate action if a family does not pay its fee. If a family doesnot cooperate in paying its fee, it would become ineligible for continuedtransitional benefits, and it would remain ineligible for so long as backfees were owed, unless satisfactory arrangements have been made to makefull payment. However, transitional child care benefits would not be discontinuedwithout due process, and benefits would be continued pending a hearing,if requested. Unless the fee requirements are taken seriously by Statesand recipients of benefits, the program will not be effective in providinga transition towards self-sufficiency.   Under the regulations at andSection; 256.1(e) the State plan must specifythe methods and procedures the State IV-A agency shall use to ensure thatfees are collected.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters on this section wanted the fee tobe paid to the provider directly. Some suggested that payment to the providerbe made a requirement, but a few suggested allowing a State the option.One commenter requested flexibility for the States to develop their ownfee collection system.  <T3>Response:</T3> In order to ensure some State flexibility and ease administration,we have decided not to require State agencies to collect fees directly.States have at least three options: (1) require the fee to be paid to theState; (2) require the fee to be paid directly to the provider and havethe State pay the provider for the difference; or (3) pay the recipientthe State's contribution and require her to pay the provider in full. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted to know if the fee is used to offsetthe expense of child care.  <T3>Response:</T3> The fees collected should be used to offset the expenseof child care (like AFDC overpayment collections are treated). They areconsidered program income which should be handled like a ``deduction,''as described in andSection; 74.42(c).   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that we allow States flexibilityto develop arrangements with providers to cover costs of uncollected fees. <T3>Response:</T3> Some flexibility is allowable, as long as the Statedoes not abdicate its responsibility to see that fees are collected. Recipientsshould be responsible for contributing to the cost of their child care,and any arrangements between the State agency and providers should be consistentwith this goal.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters did not want the State to be obligatedto monitor or enforce payments to providers.  <T3>Response:</T3> As long as the State is paying for part of the childcare, we believe the State is obligated to make sure the provider is gettingpaid. Unless fees are paid, States may end up incurring higher child carecosts or losing potential child care slots because of disgruntled, unpaidproviders. This situation increases the potential for a lapse in care ora lack of child care slots. Therefore, the State must monitor and enforcepayments to providers.  <T3>Comment:</T3> A couple of commenters were opposed to the denial ofbenefits to non-paying families.  <T3>Response:</T3> The Statute requires that families ``shall contribute''to the cost of child care benefits based on their ability to pay. We decidedto make such contributions a condition of eligibility in order to givethe requirement meaning. Otherwise, those who failed to meet their feeobligations would be better off than those who were fulfilling their responsibilities.Furthermore, the provision creates some consistency between how cooperationin paying fees is treated and how other forms of cooperation (e.g., inmeeting child support requirements) are met. This consistency will makethe provision easier to administer and more understandable to recipientsand agency staff.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter had a question about whether a family isrequired to pay what it owes in full before benefits are restored.  <T3>Response:</T3> A family need not pay in full before benefits can berestored. However, arrangements must be made to ensure that it will meetits obligation. These arrangements could take the form of an agreementupon a payment plan or some plan for recoupment.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted a definition of ``satisfactory arrangements.''  <T3>Response:</T3> We decided not to include a definition in our regulationsbecause we wanted to provide States with sufficient flexibility to handleindividual family situations.  <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter had a question about the effect the failureto pay the transitional child care fee has on the family's AFDC grant. <T3>Response:</T3> If the family loses its job and goes back on AFDC whileowing back child care payments, such payments could be recouped from futurechild care payments or may be paid back directly by the family, but theState could not recoup child care payments from the AFDC grant.  Other Provisions (andSection; 256.4 of the Final Regulations)   In part because the transitional child care provisions of the Statute havedistinct beginning and ending dates separate from the other child careprovisions of the Statute, we have included them as a separate part inthese regulations. However, most of the provisions in Part 255 apply tothis part. For example, the provisions of andSection; 255.3(a) regardingthe methods of providing child care generally apply to transitional childcare although the income disregard is not an option in these cases. Theother provisions in Part 255 that pertain to allowable costs, matchingrates, standards, disallowance procedures, and uniform reporting also apply.  One minor exception to this general rule relates to the funding of PuertoRico, Guam, the Virgin Islands and American Samoa. The exception reflectsthe fact that child care costs under Part 255 for these jurisdictions arecovered under the JOBS funding cap, while their transitional child carecosts fall under the section 1108 limits.   Another exception is that transitional child care benefits cannot be suspended,reduced, discontinued or terminated until a decision is rendered aftera hearing requested within a timely notice period. We make this distinctionbecause recipients of transitional child care benefits under this partdo not have the same protection of the ``means by which to live'' (in termsof continuation of AFDC benefits and the option to cease participation)as is available to individuals receiving child care under part 255.   <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter asked that we make the regulatory citesin andSection; 256.4(a) correspond to the text that follows.  <T3>Response:</T3> At andSection; 256.4(a) in the NPRM, we state that theState IV-A agency providing transitional child care must meet the followingrequirements:<ITAG tagnum="15">andSection; 255.3(a): which addresses the use of methods for  guaranteeingcare (paragraphs 1-7) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection; 255.3(b): which requires taking into account individualneeds of the child </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection; 255.3(c): which governs parental choice </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection; 255.3(f): which covers cases that are subject to retrospectivebudgeting </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection; 255.5: which covers child care standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">andSection; 255.6: which covers uniform reporting requirements</ITAG>We go on to suggest those cites correspond to the following subjects:<ITAG tagnum="15">Methods of providing child care </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Child care standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Disallowances </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Coordination </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Services to Indians and Alaska Natives </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Uniform reporting requirements</ITAG>Unfortunately, the two lists do not correspond. We therefore have revisedandSection; 256.4 to indicate that the following provisions of part 255 alsoapply to part 256:<ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.3(a), paragraphs 1-5 and 7_regarding available methods</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.3(b) regarding consideration of the individual needsof the child </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.3(c)-(d) regarding parental choice </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.3(h) regarding coordination </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.4(a) regarding FFP limits </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.4(b)(1) regarding matching rates </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.4(c) regarding requirements for FFP </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.4(f) regarding no matching for resource development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.4(g) regarding matching for administrative costs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.4(h) regarding fraud </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.4(i) regarding disallowances and fiscal requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.4(j) regarding recovery of overpayments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.5 regarding standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">andSection; 255.6 regarding uniform reporting  </ITAG>Technical and Conforming Amendments (andSection;andSection;  205.50, 224.0,233.20, 233.90, 233.100, 234.60, 238.01, 239.01 and 240.01 of the FinalRegulations)  Section 202 of the Family Support Act, Public Law  100-485, contains thetechnical and conforming amendments to title IV-A of the Social SecurityAct which are required by the enactment of the Statute.  Until October l, 1990, we cannot remove existing Federal regulations whichhave been amended by the Statute because the existing regulations willcontinue to govern State IV-A agencies until they have approved JOBS plans. Therefore, in amending the Federal regulations, we have either incorporatedJOBS provisions in the existing regulations (for example, andSection; 205.50on safeguarding of information) or added a provision specific to Stateswith JOBS programs (for example, treatment of earned income at andSection;233.20(a)(11)(v)).  Sections 202 and 204 of the Statute repeal the following statutory provisionsof title IV of the Act as of October l, l990: Part C (WIN); Section 409of Part A (community work experience program (CWEP)); Section 402(a)(35)of Part A (employment search); and Section 414 of Part A (work supplementation).For States which implement JOBS prior to October l, l990, the Federal regulationsgoverning WIN (Part 224), CWEP (Part 238), work supplementation (Part 239),and employment search (Part 240) will no longer apply. Therefore, we haveadded a provision to each of these existing regulations clarifying thatthe current regulations do not apply to States with approved JOBS plansand will be repealed for all States as of October l, l990. The final regulationswhich distinguish the applicability of the current regulations are foundat  andSection;andSection; 224.0(c) (WIN), 238.01(b) (CWEP), 239.01(b) (worksupplementation), and 240.01(b) (employment search).  Safeguarding of Information  Section 202 of the Statute amends section 402(a)(9)(A) of the Act to includeprograms under Part F for which the State IV-A agency must also providesafeguards which restrict the use or disclosure of information concerningapplicants or recipients. In accordance with these amendments, we haveamended andSection; 205.50(a)(1)(i)(A) to cover programs under Part F underour safeguarding regulations.  Treatment of Earned Income  Section 202 of the Statute also amends section 402(a)(8)(A)(iv) of theAct regarding the treatment of earned income to remove special treatmentafforded earned income from public service employment and incentive paymentsfor institutional training under the Work Incentive program. In lieu ofamending andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(iv) which governs treatment of earnedincome under WIN, we have added a new provision at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(v)that governs the treatment of earned income and expenses in States withapproved JOBS plans. For regular employment or OJT, the disregards in andSection;andSection;233.20 (a)(11)(i) and (a)(11)(ii)(B) apply.  For earned income from a jobunder work supplementation, the same disregards apply unless a State IV-Aagency has elected to provide differently in its State JOBS plan in accordancewith andSection; 250.62 (j) and (k). Section 233.20(a)(11)(v)(C) providesthat any advance payment or reimbursement to the JOBS participant for childcare, transportation, work-related expenses, or work-related supportiveservices is to be disregarded. Section 233.20(a)(11)(v)(D) provides thatpayment for or reimbursement of child care pursuant to part 255 for employedindividuals who are not JOBS participants is disregarded.  Changes to Section 407  <T3>Definition of ``quarter of work''.</T3> In the NPRM, we proposed torevise the definition of ''quarter of work'' based on section 202(b)(10)of the Statute, which amended section 407(d)(1) of the Act. Upon additionalexamination, we have determined that a technical amendment in the Technicaland Miscellaneous Revenue Act of 1988 (P.L. 100-647) repealed section 202(b)(10)of the Statute. Therefore, we have deleted this proposed change from thefinal regulations. The definition of ``quarter of work'' is not changedby title II of the Family Support Act.  It is changed by title IV of theFamily Support Act and is not effective until October 1, 1990.  Participation Requirements for Unemployed Parents  Under current law, a principal earner in an AFDC-Unemployed Parent casemust be registered with WIN or, if exempt because of remoteness, with apublic employment office as a condition of eligibility for aid. In addition,there is a requirement that the principal earner be certified to participatein WIN within 30 days after receipt of AFDC. Certification means that thenecessary support services are available so that recipients can participatein training or employment. Additionally, Federal financial participationis not available if, after the 30 days, the State IV-A agency has not takenaction to certify the principal earner to WIN.  The Statute amends the current law to provide that aid will be denied ifthe parent, unless exempt under the new section 402(a)(l9)(C)(vii), isnot currently participating or available for participation in a JOBS program,or, if exempt due to remoteness, is not registered with the State publicemployment office. We have amended andSection; 233.100(a)(5)(i) to add thisprovision for States with approved JOBS plans.  The Statute further amends section 407(c) of the Act to provide that within30 days after receiving aid, the parent must participate or apply for participationin the JOBS program, unless the program is not available in the area wherethe parent is living. We have amended andSection; 233.100(a)(6) to add thisprovision for States with approved JOBS plans.  The Statute also amends section 407(c) of the Act to provide that FFP willnot be available to the State IV-A agency for any period beginning withthe 31st day after the individual receives aid, if the State has not takenappropriate steps directed towards the participation of the parent in aJOBS program. We have amended andSection; 233.100(c)(2)(iii) to add thisprovision for States with approved JOBS plans.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters objected to the statutory provisionsrequiring unemployed parents to be available or participating in JOBS within30 days of receiving AFDC and denying FFP to a State if it had not taken``appropriate steps directed toward the participation of such parent ina program under part F.'' One State asked what expenditures did the prohibitionon FFP apply to?  <T3>Response:</T3> These are statutory provisions. The final regulationsgive States maximum flexibility within the statutory provisions to implementthese provisions. FFP would not be available for expenditures for the benefitspaid to a family eligible under section 407 of the Act if appropriate stepshad not been taken toward the participation of the parent in that familyin a program under Part F.  <T3>Comment:</T3> Some commenters asked for clarification about what theparticipation requirements in this section mean.  One was concerned aboutphase-in of the JOBS program and how this provision affected it. One saidthat independent job search should be required of unemployed parents priorto enrollment in JOBS as many unemployed parents find jobs in the firstfew months anyhow.  <T3>Response:</T3> Although the amendments to the Act specify some timeframeswithin which either the State or the individual must act, they do not specificallydefine what those activities are. We believe that the State is in the bestposition to determine what activities would both conform to the requirementsof the law and meet the needs of unemployed parents in the State. For example,as the commenter suggested, independent job search might be an appropriateapproach. Independent job search is a JOBS component if the State so definesin its State Plan. It would not be staff intensive or costly, yet wouldmeet the requirements of this provision. However, since the law refersto ``appropriate steps directed toward participation'' and that the participantmust be participating (or available for participation), we believe thatpreparatory activities such as an initial assessment to determine availabilitywould satisfy the requirements of the Act.  Furthermore, we do not believethat such an activity would be a burden even in States that are phasingin the JOBS program.  Loss of Eligibility for Failure to Attend School or Make Satisfactory Progress <T3>Comment:</T3> In the NPRM, we proposed to remove the provision at andSection;233.90(b)(2) which states that an otherwise eligible child under age l8may not be denied aid if he fails to attend school or make satisfactorygrades. Several States questioned our authority to make this change. Theydoubted whether the Statute intended to permit States to require satisfactoryschool attendance of all children in order to receive aid.   <T3>Response:</T3> In lieu of removing andSection; 233.90(b)(2) entirely,we have revised it to provide that if an individual under the age of 18is required to participate in JOBS and her assignment is to educationalactivities, then she is subject to the mandatory participation requirementsof JOBS and may be sanctioned by the loss of her AFDC benefits as prescribedin section 402(a)(19)(G) for non-attendance at school as that would constitutenon-participation in JOBS.  We have not changed the provision that prohibitsdenial of AFDC benefits for failing to make satisfactory grades.  Vendor Payments  The Statute also amends section 402(a)(19)(G) of the Act to extend to theJOBS program the requirement that the State IV-A agency make vendor orprotective payments in the event the caretaker relative is sanctioned forfailure to participate. Therefore, we have revised andSection; 234.60(a)(12)to add JOBS to the list of programs for which imposing a sanction requiresa State IV-A agency to provide protective or vendor payments.  Special Needs  Finally, we have amended andSection; 233.20(a)(2)(v) to prohibit the useof special needs for certain costs related to participation in JOBS orother educational or training activities. We have added the phrase ``orother educational or training activities'' to clarify that the prohibitionapplies to all educational or training activities, including those in areaswhich do not have a JOBS program and those which are self-initiated. Suchcosts are eligible for matching under JOBS or, in the case of self-initiatededucation or training, are not matchable pursuant to andSection; 250.48.The additional language clarifies this. A more complete discussion of specialneeds is contained in the preamble to andSection; 255.4.   <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters pointed out that the language of andSection;233.20(a)(2)(v) as contained in the proposed regulations did not appearto contain the prohibition on use of special needs for educational costsprovided in andSection; 250.46.  <T3>Response:</T3> The commenters are correct in pointing out this oversight.We have amended the final regulations to incorporate specific languageabout the costs of educational activities (including tuition, books, andfees) not being allowable as special needs.   Other Provisions  All conforming amendments and other changes to chapter II necessitatedby the Family Support Act will be handled in another regulatory package.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance Programs 13.780, AssistancePayments Maintenance Assistance, 13.781 Job Opportunities and Basic SkillsTraining)   <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects  </ITAG>45 CFR Part 205 Computer technology, Grant programs-social programs, Privacy, Public assistanceprograms, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Wages.  45 CFR Part 224 Administrative practice and procedure, Grant programs-social programs,Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Work Incentive (WIN) Programs. 45 CFR Part 233 Aliens, Grant programs-social programs, Public assistance programs, Reportingand recordkeeping requirements.  45 CFR Part 234 Grant programs-social programs, Health care, Public assistance programs,Rent subsidies.  45 CFR Part 238 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Grant programs-social programs,Manpower training programs.  45 CFR Part 239 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Employment, Grant programs-socialprograms.  45 CFR Part 240 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Employment, Grant programs-socialprograms.  45 CFR Part 250 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Grant programs-social programs,Employment, education and training.  45 CFR Part 255 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Grant programs-social programs,Employment, education and training,  Day care.  45 CFR Part 256 Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Grant programs-social programs,Employment, education and training,  Day care.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 11, 1989.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Catherine Bertini, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Assistant Secretary for Family Support.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: September 14, 1989.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Louis W. Sullivan, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary, Department of Health and Human Services.</ITAG>Accordingly, Chapter II, Title 45, Code of Federal  Regulations is amendedas set forth below:    <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 205_GENERAL ADMINISTRATION_PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS  </ITAG>l. The authority citation for Part 205 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 402, 403, 406, 411, 1102, and 1106(a), SocialSecurity Act (42 U.S.C. 602, 603, 606, 611, 1302, and 1306(a)); sec. 9101,Pub. L. 99- 509, 100 Stat. 1972; sec. 202, Pub. L. 100-485, 102 Stat. 2377.</ITAG>2. Section 205.50 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(1)(i)(A) to readas follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 205.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Safeguarding information for the financial assistance programs. </ITAG>(a) * * * (1) * * * (i) * * * (A) The administration of the plan of the State approved under title IV-A,the plan or program of the State under title IV-B, IV-C, IV-D, or IV-For under title I, X, XIV, XVI (AABD), XIX or XX or the supplemental securityincome (SSI) program established by title XVI. Such purposes include establishingeligibility, determining amount of assistance, and providing services forapplicants and recipients. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 224_WORK INCENTIVE PROGRAMS FOR AFDC RECIPIENTS UNDER TITLE IVOF THE SOCIAL SECURITY ACT  </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 224 is revised to read as set forthbelow and the authority citations following all the sections in Part 224are removed: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 402(a)(19), 430-444 and 1102, Social SecurityAct (42 U.S.C. 602(a)(19), 630-644, and 1302); secs. 202 and 204, Pub.L. 100-485, 102 Stat. 2377, 2381.</ITAG>2. In andSection; 224.0, paragraph (c) is added to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 224.0</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Purpose and scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) The provisions of this part do not apply to any State IV-A agency whichhas an approved JOBS plan under andSection; 250.20. A list of State IV-Aagencies with approved JOBS plans is available from the Family SupportAdministration, Office of Family Assistance, 370 L'Enfant Promenade, SW.,Washington, DC 20447. For all State IV-A agencies the provisions of thisPart are repealed as of October 1, 1990. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 233_COVERAGE AND CONDITIONS OF ELIGIBILITY IN FINANCIAL ASSISTANCEPROGRAMS  </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 233 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1, 402, 406, 407, 1002, 1102, 1402, and 1602,Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 301, 602, 606, 607, 1202, 1302, 1602, and1382 note); and sec. 6, Pub. L. 94-114, 89 Stat. 579 and Part XXIII ofPub. L. 97-35, 95 Stat. 843, and Pub. L. 97-248, 96 Stat. 324, and Pub.L. 99-603, 100 Stat. 3359, sec. 221, Pub. L. 98-181, as amended by sec.102, Pub. L. 98-479 (42 U.S.C. 602 note) and sec. 202, Pub. L. 100-485,102 Stat. 2377.</ITAG>2. In andSection; 233.20, paragraph (a)(2)(v) is revised, paragraphs (a)(11)(v)and (a)(11)(vi) are redesignated as paragraphs (a)(11)(vi) and (a)(11)(vii)respectively and a new paragraph (a)(11)(v) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 233.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Need and amount of assistance. </ITAG>(a) * * * (2) * * * (v) If the State IV-A agency includes special need items in its standard:(A) Describe those that will be recognized and the circumstances underwhich they will be included, and (B) Provide that they will be considered for all applicants and recipientsrequiring them; except that: (<T3>1</T3>) Under AFDC, work expenses and child care (or care of incapacitatedadults living in the same home and receiving AFDC) resulting from employmentor participation in either a CWEP or an employment search program cannotbe special needs, and (<T3>2</T3>) In a State which has a JOBS program under Part 250, child care,transportation, work-related expenses, other work-related supportive services,and the costs of education (including tuition, books, and fees) resultingfrom participation in JOBS (including participation pursuant to andSection;andSection;250.46, 250.47, and 250.48) or any other education or training activitycannot be special needs. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>(11) * * * (v) The treatment of earned income and expenses under JOBS is as follows:(A) For earned income from regular employment or on-the-job training, asdescribed at andSection; 250.61, the disregards in paragraphs (a)(11)(i)and (a)(11)(ii)(B) shall apply. (B) For earned income from a job under the work supplementation component,as described at andSection; 250.62, the disregards in paragraphs (a)(11)(i)and (a)(11)(ii)(B) shall apply unless the State IV-A agency in its StateJOBS plan, has elected to provide otherwise under andSection; 250.62(j) andandSection; 250.62(k).  (C) For all activities under JOBS and self-initiated education and trainingin non-JOBS areas, advance payment or reimbursement to the individual forchild care, transportation, work-related expenses, or work-related supportiveservices is disregarded.  (D) Payment or reimbursement of child care pursuant to Part 255 for employedindividuals who are not JOBS participants and one-time work-related expensesfor individuals who are not JOBS participants pursuant to Part 255 aredisregarded.  <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>3. Section 233.90 is amended by revising paragraph (b)(2) to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 233.90 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Factors specific to AFDC. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * *(2) An otherwise eligible child who is under the age of 18 years may notbe denied AFDC, regardless of whether she attends school (unless she isrequired to participate in the JOBS program pursuant to andSection; 250.30and she is assigned to educational activities) or makes satisfactory grades.  4. Section 233.100 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(5)(i); (a)(6);and (c)(2)(iii) to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 233.100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Dependent children of unemployed parents. </ITAG>(a) * * * (5) * * * (i) If and for so long as such child's parent, unless exempt under andSection;224.20, is not currently registered for the work incentive program or ifexempt under andSection; 224.20(b)(6), is not currently registered with apublic employment office in the State, except that in a State with an approvedJOBS plan under andSection; 250.20, such child's parent, unless exempt underandSection; 250.30(b), must be currently participating (or available forparticipation) in a program under Part 250, or, if he is exempt under andSection;250.30(b)(5), must be registered with a public employment office in theState, and  <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(6) Provide that within 30 days after the receipt of such aid, unemployedprincipal earners will be certified for participation in the Work Incentiveprogram under Part 224 or, if the State IV-A agency has an approved JOBSplan pursuant to andSection; 250.20, will participate or apply for participationin a program under Part 250 unless the program is not available in thearea where the parent is living.  <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) * * * (2) * * * (iii) For any period beginning with the 31st day after receipt of aid,if and for as long as no action is taken during the period to certify theparent for participation in the Work Incentive program under Part 224,or if the State IV-A agency has an approved JOBS plan pursuant to andSection;250.20, no action is taken during the period to undertake appropriate stepsdirected toward the participation of such parent in a program under Part250; and <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 234_FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO INDIVIDUALS  </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 234 is revised to read as set forthbelow and the authority citations following all the sections in Part 234are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 402, 403, 406 and 1102 of the Social SecurityAct (42 U.S.C. 602, 603, 606, and 1302); Section 201 of Pub. L. 100-485,102 Stat 2359.</ITAG>2. Section 234.60 is amended by revising the first sentence of paragraph(a)(12) to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 234.60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Protective, vendor and two-party payments for dependent children.</ITAG>(a) * * * (12) In cases where an individual is sanctioned for failure to participatein WIN, employment search, CWEP, or JOBS, the State plan must provide thatwhen protective or vendor payments are made pursuant to andSection; 224.52(a)(1),andSection; 238.22, andSection; 240.22(a)(1), andSection; 240.22(b)(1) and andSection;250.34(d) of this chapter, only paragraphs (a)(7), (a)(9)(ii), and (a)(11)(i)and (ii) of this section will be  applicable. * * * <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 238_COMMUNITY WORK EXPERIENCE PROGRAM  </ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 238 is revised to read as set forthbelow and the authority citations following all the sections in part 238are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Section 409 and 1102 of the Social Security Act (42U.S.C. 609 and 1302); Sections 202 and 204 of Pub. L. 100-485, 102 Stat.2378, 2381.</ITAG>2. Section 238.01 is revised to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 238.01</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of this part. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>State IV-A agencies may operate community work experienceprograms (CWEP) which serve a useful public purpose, and require AFDC recipientsto participate in them as a condition of AFDC eligibility.  The purposeof these CWEP programs is to provide work experience for AFDC recipients.CWEP projects must meet appropriate standards for health and safety andmay not displace persons currently employed or fill established unfilledvacancies. Subject to the conditions specified at andSection; 238.16, StateIV-A agencies must provide necessary transportation, day care, and otherrelated services or reimburse CWEP participants for costs directly relatedto participation in the program. Allowable costs to operate CWEP (see SubpartD) are matched by the Federal government at the AFDC administrative matchlevel (50 percent). (b) <T3>Applicability. </T3>The provisions of this part do not apply to anyState IV-A agency which has an approved JOBS plan under andSection; 250.20.A list of State IV-A agencies with approved JOBS plans is available fromthe Family Support Administration, Office of Family Assistance, 370 L'EnfantPromenade, SW., Washington, D.C. 20447. For all State IV-A agencies, theprovisions of this part are repealed as of October 1, 1990. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 239_WORK SUPPLEMENTATION PROGRAM  </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 239 is revised to read as set forthbelow and the authority citations following all the sections in Part 239are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 414 and 1102 of the Social Security Act (42U.S.C. 614 and 1302); Sections 202 and 204 of Pub. L. 100-485, 102 Stat.2378, 2381.</ITAG>2. Section 239.01 is revised to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 239.01</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of this part. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Under the work supplementation program, State IV-A agenciesmay use AFDC funds to develop and subsidize work for AFDC recipients asan alternative to aid provided to AFDC recipients. The work supplementationprogram may be implemented notwithstanding the definitions contained insection 406 of the Social Security Act or any other provision of law. Underthis program AFDC recipients may choose, on a voluntary basis, to acceptan offer of work to the extent such jobs are made available. In order topay for the costs of developing and subsidizing these jobs, a State IV-Aagency may reduce the need standard in effect for selected categories ofrecipients on the basis of their ability to participate in the work supplementationprogram. The reduction of the need standard may be made for either theentire State or for selected geographical areas. The total amount of Federalfinancial participation for operation of a State IV-A agency's work supplementationprogram is limited as provided in subpart D of this part. (b) <T3>Applicability. </T3>The provisions of this part do not apply to anyState IV-A agency which has an approved JOBS plan under andSection; 250.20.A list of State IV-A agencies with approved JOBS plans is available fromthe Family Support Administration, Office of Family Assistance, 370 L'EnfantPromenade, SW., Washington, DC 20447. For all State IV-A agencies, theprovisions of this Part are repealed as of October 1, 1990. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 240_EMPLOYMENT SEARCH PROGRAM  </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 240 is revised to read as set forthbelow and the authority citations following all the sections in Part 240are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sections 402(a) and 1102 of the Social Security Act(42 U.S.C. 602(a) and 1302); Sections 202 and 204 of Pub. L. 100-485, 102Stat. 2377, 2381.</ITAG>2. Section 240.01 is revised to read as follows:   <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 240.01 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of this part. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Each State with a plan approved under title IV-A of theSocial Security Act may establish a program of employment search in accordancewith the requirements in this Part. The single State agency designatedin the State plan to administer or supervise the AFDC program must administerthe employment search program. (b) <T3>Applicability. </T3>The provisions of this Part do not apply to anyState IV-A agency which has an approved JOBS plan under andSection; 250.20.A list of State IV-A agencies with approved JOBS plans is available fromthe Family Support Administration, Office of Family Assistance, 370 L'EnfantPromenade, SW., Washington, DC 20447. For all State IV-A agencies, theprovisions of this Part are repealed as of October 1, 1990. Title 45, chapter II, Code of Federal Regulations is amended by addinga new part 250 to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 250_JOB OPPORTUNITIES AND BASIC SKILLS TRAINING PROGRAM  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.0 Purpose.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.1 Definitions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Administration  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.10 State IV-A agency administration. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.11 Requirement for a statewide program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.12 Coordination and consultation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.13 Contracting authority.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_State Plan Requirements and Content  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.20 Requirement for a State JOBS plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.21 State plan content.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Participation Requirements, Exemptions and Sanctions  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.30 Requirements for individual participation and exemptions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.31 Volunteers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.32 Participation requirements for education. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.33 Participation requirements for unemployed parents. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.34 Sanctions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.35 Good cause.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.36 Conciliation and fair hearings.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Operation of State JOBS Programs/Program Components  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.40 Providing information to AFDC applicants and recipients. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.41 Initial assessment and employability plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.42 Agency-participant agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.43 Case management. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.44 Mandatory components. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.45 Optional components. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.46 Postsecondary education. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.47 Other education, training and employment activities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.48 Self-initiated education or training.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_[Reserved]  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Optional Components of State JOBS Programs  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.60 Job search program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.61 On-the-job training. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.62 Work supplementation program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.63 Community work experience program.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart H_Funding  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.70 JOBS allocation entitlement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.71 Allotment of JOBS limit of entitlement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.72 Maintenance of effort. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.73 Matching rates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.74 Reduced matching rate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.75 Activities excluded from FFP. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.76 Financial reports, records, statements and audits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.77 Costs matchable as AFDC payments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.78 Definition of participation for enhanced FFP.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart I_Uniform Data Collection Requirements  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.80 Uniform data collection requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.81 State data systems options. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.82 Required case record data.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart J_Operation of JOBS Programs by Indian Tribes and Alaska NativeOrganizations  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.90 Scope and purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.91 Eligible Indian Tribe and Alaska Native organization grantees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.92 Selection criteria for eligible Alaska Native organizations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.93 Funding formula. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.94 Program administration, implementation and operations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.95 Supportive services. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.96 Waiver authority. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.97 Application requirements and documentation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">250.98 Maintenance of effort for Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 402, 403, 481, 481 note, 482, 483, 484, 485,486, 487, and 1102 of the Social Security Act as amended (42 U.S.C. 602,603, 681, 682, 682 note, 683, 684, 685, 686, 687, and 1302); Section 204(b)of Pub. L. 100- 485, 102 Stat. 2381.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.0</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Purpose. </ITAG>(a) The purpose of the Job Opportunities and Basic Skills Training (JOBS)program under titles IV-A and IV-F of the Social Security Act is to assurethat needy families with children obtain the education, training and employmentthat will help avoid long-term welfare dependence. To accomplish this purpose,the JOBS program is intended to; (1) Encourage, assist, and require applicants for and recipients of AFDCto fulfill their responsibilities to support their children by preparingfor, accepting, and retaining employment; (2) Provide individuals with the opportunity to acquire the education andskills necessary to qualify for employment; (3) Provide necessary supportive services, including transitional childcare and medical assistance, so that individuals can participate in JOBSand accept employment; (4) Promote coordination of services at all levels of government in orderto make a wide range of services available, especially for individualsat risk of long-term welfare dependency, and to maximize the use of existingresources; and  (5) Emphasize accountability for both participants and service providers.(b) This part provides that a State IV-A agency, as a condition of participationin the AFDC program, must operate a JOBS program. In addition, these regulationsrequire that States provide child care and other supportive services forparticipants in the JOBS program, as well as certain other individuals,pursuant to parts 255 and 256.  This part contains the policies, rulesand regulations pertaining to the Job Opportunities and Basic Skills Training(JOBS) program.  (c) This part is applicable to States with approved JOBS programs pursuantto andSection; 250.20, and to all States as of October 1, 1990. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.  </ITAG>Except to the extent otherwise specified in this section, terms used inpart 250 shall have the same meaning otherwise applicable to the Aid toFamilies with Dependent Children (AFDC) program. <T3>Adult recipient </T3>means an individual other than a dependent child(unless such child is the minor custodial parent of another dependent child)whose needs are met (in whole or in part) with payments of Aid to Familieswith Dependent Children. <T3>Basic literacy level </T3>means a literacy level that allows a personto function at a level equivalent to at least grade 8.9. <T3>Component </T3>means any of the services or activities available underthe provisions of andSection; 250.44 through andSection; 250.48. <T3>CWEP </T3>means the community work experience program authorized inandSection; 250.45 and andSection; 250.63. <T3>Department </T3>means the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.<T3>FFP </T3>means Federal financial participation in expenditures madeby a State. <T3>Institution of higher education </T3>means any institution determinedby the Secretary of Education to meet:  (1) The definition of such term contained in either section 1201(a) orsection 481(a) of the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 1001 <T3>et seq.</T3>), as amended; or  (2) The definitions of ``proprietary institution of higher education''or ``postsecondary vocational institution,'' which are defined at sections481 (b) and (c) of that Act. <T3>Intensive job search </T3>is, for purposes of andSection; 250.74(c), job search by a parent in an unemployed parent case that is either groupor individual job search for a monthly average equivalent to 20 hours perweek. <T3>JAS </T3>means a JOBS Automated System authorized under andSection; 250.81for a State to support its operation of the JOBS program.  <T3>JOBS </T3>is the Job Opportunities and Basic Skills Training programrequired by section 402(a)(19) of the Social Security Act, as amended bysection 201(a) of the Family Support Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-485) andset forth in part F of title IV of the Social Security Act, as added bysection 201(b) of the Family Support Act. <T3>JOBS plan </T3>means the statewide operational plan for JOBS.  <T3>Limited English proficiency </T3>means limited ability in speaking,reading, writing, or understanding the English language by a person whosenative language is a language other than English or by a person who livesin a family or community environment where a language other than Englishis the dominant language. <T3>Make good progress </T3>and <T3>Making satisfactory progress </T3>in an educational component meanthat the participant in any educational activity is meeting, on a periodicallymeasured basis of less than one year, such as a term or quarter, a consistentstandard of progress based upon a written policy that was: developed bythe educational institution or program in which she is enrolled; and  approvedby the appropriate State or local education agency and by the State welfareagency or Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organization. Such standard includesboth a qualitative measure of a participant's progress, such as a gradepoint average, and a quantitative measure, such as a reasonable time limitby which a student is expected to complete her studies. Upon review andapproval by the State or local education agency and the State IV-A agencyor Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organization, the standard may providethat a student who does not meet the institution's or program's progressstandard is nonetheless making satisfactory progress during a probationaryperiod, or shall be deemed to be making satisfactory progress because ofmitigating circumstances. <T3>Make good progress </T3>and <T3>Making satisfactory progress </T3>in a training component (i.e., OJTand skills training) mean that the participant is meeting, on a periodicallymeasured basis of less than one year, such as quarterly, a consistent standardof progress based upon a written policy that was: developed by the trainingprovider, and approved by the State IV-A agency or Indian Tribe or AlaskaNative organization. Such standard includes both a qualitative measureof a participant's progress, such as competency gains or proficiency level,and a quantitative measure, such as a reasonable time limit for completionof the training program. Standards for making good or satisfactory progressin a training program must be employed by October 1, 1992, but should beused at an earlier time if available. <T3>MSA </T3>means Metropolitan Statistical Area, a system of geographicalareas defined and maintained by the Executive Office of the President,Office of Management and Budget. <T3>OJT </T3>means on-the-job training as authorized in andSection; 250.45and andSection; 250.61. <T3>Postsecondary education </T3>means a program of postsecondary instructionoffered by:  (1) An institution of higher education determined by the Secretary of Educationto meet section 1201(a), or section 481 (a), (b), or (c) of the HigherEducation Act of 1965, as amended;  (2) An institution of higher education or a vocational school determinedby the Secretary of Education to meet section 435(b) or section 435(c)of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended; or  (3) A public institution that is legally authorized by the State to providesuch a program within the State. <T3>Secretary </T3>means the Secretary of Health and Human Services. <T3>Target population </T3>means that group composed of each individualwho:  (1) Is receiving AFDC, and who has received such aid for any 36 of thepreceding 60 months;  (2) Makes application for AFDC, and has received such aid for any 36 ofthe 60 months immediately preceding the most recent month for which applicationhas been made;  (3) Is a custodial parent under the age of 24 who:  (i) Has not completed a high school education and, at the time of applicationfor AFDC, is not enrolled in high school (or a high school equivalencycourse of instruction); or  (ii) Had little or no work experience in the preceding year; or  (4) Is a member of a family in which the youngest child is within 2 yearsof being ineligible for AFDC because of age.  For a particular State, this term will include, in lieu of individualslisted, such alternative groups of long-term or potential long-term recipientsas the State has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the Secretary arefeasible target populations in that State's caseload. <T3>UP </T3>means Unemployed Parent and refers to the program authorizedin section 407 of the Social Security Act which provides aid to a dependentchild who is deprived of parental support or care by reason of the unemploymentof the parent who is the principal earner. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Administration  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State IV-A agency administration. </ITAG>(a) The State agency responsible for the administration or supervisionof the State's title IV-A plan is responsible for the administration orsupervision of the JOBS program.  (b) Except as provided in paragraph (c)(2), JOBS activities which involvedecision-making with regard to individual participants may be performedby an entity other than the State IV-A agency according to the policies,rules, and regulations of the State IV-A agency. In doing so, such entitymust not have the authority to review, change, or disapprove any administrativedecision of the State IV-A agency, or otherwise substitute its judgmentfor that of the State IV-A agency as to the application of policies, rules,and regulations promulgated by the State IV-A agency. (c) JOBS activities may be delegated or contracted with the exception ofthe following:  (1) Overall program administration, including: (i) Establishment of optional provisions and components of the program;(ii) Responsibility for program planning, design of program, and determiningwho should participate; (iii) Establishment of program participation requirements;  (iv) Development of a definition of good cause for failing to participate;and  (v) The issuance of other policies, rules, and regulations governing theprogram.  (2) Actions involving individuals, including: (i) Determination of exemption status; (ii) Determination of good cause for failure or refusal to participate;(iii) Determination and application of sanctions;  (iv) Providing notice of case actions; and  (v) Fair hearings.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirement for a statewide program. </ITAG>(a) Not later than October 1, 1992 the State must make the JOBS programavailable on a statewide basis. This means that the JOBS program, includingall components described in andSection; 250.44 and two of the componentsin andSection; 250.45, must be available in each political subdivision ofthe State, unless the State determines that it is not feasible to do so.(b) Although all required and at least two optional components, as describedin andSection;andSection;  250.44 and 250.45, must be included in a State JOBSprogram, the components need not be operated in the same manner in eachpolitical subdivision, nor must the State operate the same optional components,as listed in andSection; 250.45, in each political subdivision.  (c)(1) If the State IV-A agency concludes that a statewide program is notfeasible, appropriate justification must be submitted to the Secretaryfor review and approval as part of its JOBS plan, unless the followingcriteria are met:  (i) A minimal JOBS program is available in a number of political subdivisionsin which 95 percent of the State's adult recipients reside; and  (ii) A complete JOBS program is available in all Metropolitan StatisticalAreas in the State, and in a number of political subdivisions in which75 percent of the State's adult recipients reside.  (iii) A minimal program includes high school or equivalent education, asspecified in andSection; 250.44, one optional component from among thosespecified at andSection; 250.45, and information and referral to availablenon-JOBS employment services. A complete program includes all mandatorycomponents as well as any two optional components.  (iv) In determining the percentages of adult recipients residing in politicalsubdivisions of a State, for purposes of this section, adult members ofIndian Tribes and Alaska Native organizations who reside within the servicearea of a Tribal JOBS program, pursuant to andSection; 250.90, will not becounted. (2) The justification must include the following:  (i) The number of adult recipients that would be excluded and a comparisonof: (A) The estimated average annual unit cost per participant were the JOBSprogram extended to excluded areas with  (B) The estimated average annual unit cost per JOBS participant in theincluded areas;  (ii) A description of the local economic conditions that make operationof the program in such areas infeasible; and  (iii) Whether the State expects to expend all of its limit of entitlement,pursuant to andSection; 250.70, for the period covered by the JOBS plan.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Coordination and consultation. </ITAG>State IV-A agencies are required to assure coordination of JOBS programservices, including child care and supportive services pursuant to andSection;255.3(h) of the regulations, with related services provided by other agencies.(a) The Governor shall assure that JOBS program activities are coordinatedwith programs under the Job Training Partnership Act (JTPA) and with anyother relevant employment, training, and education programs available withinthe State. At a minimum, this means that the appropriate job training andpreparation components of the State JOBS plan shall be consistent withthe coordination criteria specified in the Governor's coordination andspecial services plan required under section 121 of the JTPA.  (b) In developing the JOBS plan and carrying out the JOBS program, includingthe supportive services provisions, the State IV-A agency must consultand coordinate with other providers, including those specified in paragraph(c) of this section, to identify existing resources to prevent duplicationof services, assure that other program services are available to enableparticipants to achieve self-sufficiency, and assure that costs for theseother services for which welfare recipients have been eligible are notincurred by the JOBS program pursuant to andSection; 250.72.  (c) At a minimum, the State IV-A agency must consult and coordinate with:(1) The State agency responsible for JTPA; (2) The State agency responsible for the Employment Service; (3) The State education agency for programs under the Adult Education Act(20 U.S.C. 1201 <T3>et seq.</T3>) and Carl D. Perkins Vocational Education Act (20 U.S.C.2301 <T3>et seq.</T3>); (4) The State agencies responsible for child care activities as describedin andSection; 255.3(h); and (5) The State agencies responsible for public housing. (d) The State IV-A agency and local welfare agencies, as appropriate, mustconsult with the private industry councils (as established under section102 of the JTPA): (1) On the development of arrangements and contracts under JOBS, as describedin andSection; 250.13, and under the JTPA; and  (2) To identify and obtain advice on the types of jobs available, or likelyto become available, in the area.  The State IV-A agency must ensure thatJOBS provides training for the types of jobs which are, or are likely tobecome, available in the area, and that resources are not expended on trainingfor jobs that are not likely to become available. (e) The State IV-A agency must exchange information with an eligible IndianTribe or Alaska Native organization which submitted an application to theDepartment by April 13, 1989 to operate a separate JOBS program under andSection;250.91.  (1) This information includes available data on adult Tribal or AlaskaNative organization AFDC recipients necessary to determine a Tribe or organization'sJOBS funding level and designated service area, as appropriate, as describedin andSection; 250.93(b). State and Tribal and Alaska Native organizationrepresentatives receiving such AFDC recipient data must follow comparablestandards of confidentiality as described in andSection; 250.93(b). (2) Since the State IV-A agency maintains responsibility for providingbasic AFDC program services, such as eligibility notifications, and childcare funds or services to participants in a Tribal JOBS program, the Stateand such grantee must coordinate interrelated activities as described inandSection; 250.94(a) and part 255.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contracting authority. </ITAG>The State IV-A agency shall carry out the JOBS program directly or througharrangements or under contracts with administrative entities under section4(2) of the Job Training Partnership Act (JTPA), with State and local educationalagencies, and with other public agencies, Indian Tribes or Alaska Nativeorganizations or private organizations (including community-based organizationsas defined in section 4(5) of the JTPA). (a) Arrangements and contracts entered into under this section may coverany service or activity (including outreach, information and referral)to be made available under the JOBS program. Such contracted service oractivity must be consistent with the requirements under andSection; 250.10and must not otherwise be available on a nonreimbursable basis, as specifiedin andSection; 250.72(c). (b) The State IV-A agency must consult with the private industry councilson the development of arrangements and contracts under JOBS pursuant toandSection; 250.12. (c) In selecting service providers, the State IV-A agency must take intoaccount appropriate factors which may include past performance in providingsimilar services, demonstrated effectiveness, fiscal accountability, costefficiency, ability to meet performance standards, and such other factorsas the State IV-A agency may determine to be appropriate. (d) For purposes of claiming FFP, the State IV-A agency must segregatecosts by the applicable matching rates, as defined at andSection; 250.73(b)(1),in any arrangement or contract entered into under this section. (e) Services contracted under JOBS are subject to the requirements of part92, excluding the provisions at andSection; 92.30(d)(4).<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_State Plan Requirements and Content  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirement for a State JOBS plan. </ITAG>(a) As a condition of participation in the AFDC program, the agency responsiblefor administering or supervising the administration of the IV-A plan must: (1) No later than October 1, 1990, establish and operate a JOBS programunder a JOBS plan that has been ap- proved by the Secretary before implementationand that meets the requirements of this Part;  (2) Submit its initial JOBS plan to the Secretary for review and actionat least 45 days prior to the anticipated implementation date; and (3) Submit its initial Supportive Services plan, in accordance with andSection;andSection;255.1 and 256.1 concurrent with the initial JOBS plan, except that a Statewhich has not submitted a JOBS plan prior to April 1, 1990, must submita Supportive Services plan for transitional child care in accordance withandSection; 256.1 at least 45 days prior to implementation.  (b) The initial JOBS plan and Supportive Services plan will be subjectto prior approval by the Secretary.  FFP will only be available for expendituresincurred after approval by the Secretary. (c) A State JOBS plan and Supportive Services plan must be submitted to:(1) The Governor for review and comment; and (2) The State Job Training Coordinating Council (SJTCC) and the State educationagency for review and comment at least 60 days prior to submittal to theSecretary. The plan shall be published and otherwise made reasonably availablethrough local news facilities and public announcements, to the generalpublic, including members of federally-recognized Tribes and Alaska Nativeorganizations in the State, for review and comment, concurrent with submittalto the SJTCC and the State education agency. Comments received shall beresolved by the State. (d)(1) State JOBS plans and Supportive Services plans submitted to theSecretary prior to the issuance of the JOBS and Supportive Services planpreprints shall be considered interim plans. (2)(i) A State operating a JOBS program and providing supportive servicesunder interim plans shall submit a new JOBS plan and a new Supportive Servicesplan for approval within 90 days of the date that JOBS and Supportive Servicesplan preprints are issued by the Secretary.  (ii) The new JOBS and Supportive Services plans must be submitted for publicreview and comment pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (c) no laterthan 30 days prior to submittal to the Secretary, if substantial changesto the interim plans have been made. (iii) Interim plans shall remain in force until formal action on the newplans is taken (i.e., approval or disapproval) by the Secretary. (e)(1) The State must submit an update of its JOBS and Supportive Servicesplans to the Secretary for approval not less than every two years. Theupdate shall be considered a new JOBS plan and Supportive Services plan,and shall be submitted to the Secretary for approval at least 90 days priorto beginning of the next biennial period. The State must follow the publicreview and comment provisions in paragraph (c). (2) The update must consist of:  (i) Assurances regarding those parts of the State JOBS Plan and SupportiveServices plan that remain unchanged;  (ii) A description of any changes in program operations including but notlimited to changes in components and target populations served;  (iii) An estimate of the number of persons to be served by the programduring the next biennium and the availability of services provided by theState IV-A agency as well as other providers; and  (iv) An assurance that the State JOBS plan is consistent with the coordinationcriteria specified in the current Governor's Coordination and Special ServicesPlan required under section 121 of the JTPA.  (3)(i) For all States the first biennial update must be submitted by July1, 1992, for the period beginning October 1, 1992. As an alternative, aState may submit its first biennial update by April 1, 1992 for the periodbeginning July 1, 1992. A State which elects to submit its biennial updateon April 1, 1992 for the period beginning July 1, 1992 must show in theupdate that it will have a Statewide program by October 1, 1992.  (ii) A State JOBS plan and Supportive Services plan approved pursuant toparagraph (d)(2) shall remain in force until formal action is taken (i.e.,approval or disapproval) by the Secretary on the first biennial update.(iii) Each approved biennial update shall remain in force until formalaction is taken (i.e., approval or disapproval) by the Secretary on theupdate for the following biennial period. (f)(1) The State shall submit proposed amendments to approved plans asnecessary and they shall be reviewed according to the process describedat andSection;andSection;  201.3(f) and 201.3(g). (2) A plan amendment is necessary if the State makes changes which affecteligibility for services or requirements to participate, or makes changesin program design that alter the nature of the program.  (g) A State that submits a plan, an amendment to an existing plan, or abiennial update that is not approvable will be given the opportunity tomake revisions before formal disapproval; upon formal disapproval, a Statemay request a hearing pursuant to the process set forth in andSection; 201.4and part 213.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State plan content. </ITAG>A State's JOBS plan must contain the following:  (a) Assurances that: (1) The title IV-A agency will, upon approval of the JOBS plan by the Secretary,have in effect and operation: (i) A JOBS program that meets the requirements of section 402(a)(19) andtitle IV-F of the Act; and  (ii) A program for providing child care and other supportive services consistentwith the requirements of the Act and with the State's separate SupportiveServices plan, pursuant to andSection;andSection;  255.1 and 256.1; (2) The JOBS program will meet all statutory and regulatory requirements; (3) To the extent that the program is available in a political subdivisionof a State and the State's resources otherwise permit, the State will requirenon-exempt recipients for whom the State guarantees child care in accordancewith andSection; 255.2(a) to participate;  (4) Individuals are not discriminated against on the  basis of race, sex,national origin, religion, age, or handicapping condition in assignmentto training and education developed under the JOBS program; (5) In assigning participants to any JOBS program activity the State agencywill comply with the provisions of section 484(a) of the Act; (6) Benefits and services provided under the programs in part A, part D,and part F of title IV of the Act are furnished in an integrated manner;(7) Services provided by the State IV-A agency are not otherwise availableon a non-reimbursable basis, as required by andSection; 250.72(e); (8) All applicants for and recipients of aid are encouraged, assisted,and required to fulfill their responsibilities to support their childrenby preparing for, accepting, and retaining such employment as they arecapable of performing; (9) State and local funds expended for such purpose shall be maintainedat least at the level of such expenditures for the FY 1986. The FY 1986level must be identified; (10) Federal funds made available to a State for purposes of the programshall not be used to supplant non-Federal funds for existing services andactivities which promote the purpose of part F of title IV of the Act.(b) Information about overall implementation of the State's JOBS program:(1) A statement of the goals and objectives of the State JOBS program,and a description of how the State intends to implement the program duringthe biennium to support those goals and objectives; (2) A description of the administrative structure for the JOBS program;(3) A description of the contracting process that will be used to deliverservices for the State IV-A agency, pursuant to andSection; 250.13, including:(i) Types of services to be provided under contract; (ii) Types of contracts used;  (iii) Types of providers; (4) If the State program is less than statewide, identification of subdivisionsto be included or excluded.  For any period after September 30, 1992, forwhich the State does not meet the criteria at andSection; 250.11(c)(1), justificationas described at andSection; 250.11(c)(2); (5) If the State proposes to serve target populations other than thosedescribed at andSection; 250.1, (i) The characteristics of the caseload in the State that make it infeasibleto meet the requirements of andSection; 250.74(a)(1); and (ii) The long-term or potential long-term recipients that the State istargeting instead of those described at andSection; 250.1.  (6) A description of the State's dispute resolution process including:(i) A description of the conciliation process including: (A) Length of conciliation; and (B) The entity responsible for conciliation; (ii) A description of an alternative fair hearing process the State usesfor the JOBS program, if any;  (iii) A description of the grievance procedure for resolving complaintsby regular employees pursuant to section 484(d) of the Act.  (c) The options for participation which the State elects including: (1) Lowering the age of the youngest child (but no less than one) for theexemption pursuant to andSection; 250.30(b)(9)(i); (2) Making exemptions in andSection; 250.30 (b)(9)(i) and (b)(9)(ii) inapplicableto both parents and requiring their participation if child care is guaranteedin accordance with part 255; (3) Limiting exemptions in andSection; 250.30 (b)(9)(i) and (b)(9)(ii) tothe parent who is not the principal earner; (4) Establishing minimum standards for work that qualifies an individualfor the exemption at andSection; 250.30(b)(7); (5) Making supplemental payments if a family would experience a net lossof cash income resulting from acceptance of a job, pursuant to andSection;250.35(c). A State must describe what necessary and reasonable expensesit uses to calculate ``net loss of cash income;''  (6) Allowing a parent under age 25 who has not completed high school oran equivalent course of education to meet the unemployed parent program16-hour work requirement by participating in educational activities.  (d) A description of program operations to include the following: (1) A description of the client flow process;  (2) For each required component and each optional component a State elects(including all components in andSection;andSection; 250.46, 250.47, and 250.48):(i) A description of the services to be provided in the component; (ii) The extent to which such services will be: (A) Available on a non-reimbursable basis; (B) Provided directly or funded by the State IV-A agency; (iii) The extent to which such services will be provided in each politicalsubdivision covered by the State JOBS program; (3) If the State elects to use a case management system pursuant to andSection;250.43, a description of the case management system to include: (i) How case management services will be delivered and by what entities;and (ii) If not used statewide, description of methods by which individualswill be assigned a case manager;  (4) If the State elects to use agreements or contracts with participants,pursuant to andSection; 250.42, a description of how they will be used, including,if not used statewide, how the State will determine for whom they willbe used; (5) If the State elects to offer an alternative work experience componentpursuant to andSection; 250.63, a description of potential sponsors, typesof activities, the hours and duration of participation that will be required,target populations, and how the program differs from CWEP; (6) If the State elects to design a work program for unemployed parents,pursuant to andSection; 250.33, a description of the program including anassurance that the State has not substituted education or training activitiesfor the work requirement;  (7) If the State elects to operate a work supplementation component pursuantto andSection; 250.62, which of the following options it elects and, if appropriate,what the policy is with respect to: (i) Exempting individuals holding supplemented jobs from the retrospectivebudgeting requirements at Part 233 and monthly reporting; (ii) Varying the standard of need by subdivision in which the work supplementationcomponent is in operation; (iii) Varying the standard of need for different categories of recipientson the basis of ability to participate in the program; (iv) Making any other adjustment in the amount of aid paid under the titleIV-A plan to different categories of recipients pursuant to andSection; 250.62(i)(3);(v) Reducing or eliminating the amount of earned income to be disregardedfrom participation in a supplemented job; (vi) Varying the number of months (up to nine) the State applies the $30and one-third or the $30 disregard;  (vii) Using a sampling methodology to determine the amounts to be reservedand used for providing and subsidizing jobs pursuant to andSection; 250.62(m);(8) Description of any State limits or restrictions upon postsecondaryeducational services, with respect to the subject matter of the educationor training offered, length of program, characteristics of the institution,and length of coverage under JOBS (if different from length of program),for: (i) Postsecondary education to which the State refers a JOBS participantunder andSection; 250.46. (ii) Self-initiated education or training under andSection; 250.48(a) forwhich the State provides child care or supportive services. (9) Criteria established for: (i) Determining the inappropriateness of educational activities for custodialparents aged 18 or 19 who are to be placed in training or work activitiesin lieu of educational activities under andSection; 250.32(a)(3); (ii) Assigning an individual aged 20 or over who does not have a high schooldiploma or the equivalent to educational activities under andSection; 250.32(b);(iii) Approving postsecondary educational activities under andSection; 250.46,if the State elects to refer participants to such education; and (iv) Approving self-initiated education or training under andSection; 250.48(a).(10) If the State elects to excuse custodial parents under 18 years ofage from educational activities, the criteria in accordance with andSection;250.32; (11) If the State elects to define ``basic literacy level'' as higher thanthe grade 8.9 floor defined at andSection; 250.1, the State's definition;(12) The State's definition of other ``good cause'' for failure to participatein accordance with andSection; 250.35(d). At a minimum this must includecircumstances that are beyond a household's control; (13) If a State elects to provide case management services to an individualwho loses eligibility for AFDC after she accepts employment, the lengthof time up to 90 days for which services will be provided; (e) A description of the nature of coordination with public and privateagencies and organizations as described at andSection; 250.12. This mustinclude: (1) Identification of specific existing resources that are available andappropriate for participants in the State JOBS program; (2) A description of coordination and consultation in the development ofthe State JOBS plan; (3) A description of how the State JOBS plan is consistent with the coordinationcriteria specified in the Governor's coordination and special servicesplan, pursuant to andSection; 250.12(a); (4) The results of consultation with private industry councils to assurethat training and educational activities under JOBS are directed towardjobs that are available or likely to become available;  (f) Annual estimates of the numbers of persons to be served on a monthlybasis during the biennium covered by the plan, and; (g) Other information needed to clarify how the State has chosen to implementits JOBS program in accordance with title II of the Family Support Actof 1988 and implementing regulations.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart D_Participation Requirements, Exemptions and Sanctions  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.30 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for individual participation and exemptions. </ITAG>A State JOBS plan must provide that: (a) Where State resources otherwise permit, all recipients of AFDC wholive in a subdivision covered by a JOBS program and for whom the StateIV-A agency has guaranteed child care in accordance with Part 255 shallbe required to participate in JOBS except as provided under paragraph (b)of this section. (b) An individual shall be considered exempt and not be required to participateif she: (1) Is a child who_  (i) Is under age 16, or  (ii) Attends, full-time, an elementary, secondary, vocational or technicalschool (except that such school attendance as a required JOBS activityfor a child who loses this exemption will not requalify the child for theexemption);  (2) Is ill, when determined by the State on the basis of medical evidenceor another sound basis that the illness or injury is serious enough totemporarily prevent entry into employment or training; (3) Is incapacitated, when verified by the State that a physical or mentalimpairment, determined by a physician or a licensed or certified psychologist,prevents the individual from engaging in employment or training under JOBS.This may include a period of recuperation after childbirth if prescribedby a woman's physician; (4) Is 60 years of age or older;  (5) Resides in a subdivision of the State where the JOBS program is available,but in a location which is so remote from a JOBS program or activity thateffective participation is precluded. The individual shall be consideredremote if a round trip of more than 2 hours by reasonably available publicor private transportation, exclusive of time necessary to transport childrento and from a child care facility, would be required for a normal workor training day. However, if normal round trip commuting time in the areais more than 2 hours, then the round trip commuting time shall not exceedthe generally accepted community standards; (6) Is needed in the home because another member of the household requiresthe individual's presence due to illness or incapacity as determined bya physician or a licensed or certified psychologist, and no other appropriatemember of the household is available to provide the needed care;  (7) Is working 30 or more hours a week. The State IV-A agency may establishminimum standards in its JOBS plan for work that qualifies an individualfor this exemption;  (8) Is pregnant, and it has been medically verified that the child is expectedto be born in the month in which participation would be required or withinthe following six-month period; (9)(i) Subject to paragraph (b)(9)(iv), is the parent or other relativeof a child under 3 years of age (or an age less than 3 but not less than1, if the State plan so provides) who is personally providing care forthe child; or (ii) Subject to paragraph (b)(9)(iv), is the parent or other relative personallyproviding care for a child under 6 years of age, unless the State IV-Aagency assures that child care will be guaranteed and that participationin the program by the parent or relative will not be required for morethan 20 hours per week.  (iii) Only one parent or other relative in a case may be exempt under paragraph(b)(9)(i) or paragraph (b)(9)(ii) of this section.  (iv) In the case of a family eligible for AFDC by reason of the unemploymentof the parent who is the principal earner, only one parent may be exemptunder paragraph (b)(9)(i) or paragraph (b)(9)(ii) of this section. TheState IV-A agency may:  (A) Limit the exemptions in paragraph (b)(9)(i) and paragraph (b)(9)(ii)of this section to the parent who is not the principal earner;  (B) Make the exemptions in paragraph (b)(9)(i) and paragraph (b)(9)(ii)of this section inapplicable to both parents and require their participationin the program if child care in accordance with Part 255 is guaranteedwith respect to the family; or (10) Is a full-time volunteer serving under the Volunteers In Service ToAmerica (VISTA) program, pursuant to Title I of the Domestic VolunteerService Act of 1973;  (c)(1) The State IV-A agency shall reevaluate any exemption at such timeas the condition is expected to terminate but no less frequently than ateach redetermination of AFDC eligibility; (2) The State IV-A agency shall promptly notify the recipient and any appropriateservice providers of any change in the recipient's exemption status. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.31 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Volunteers. </ITAG>The State IV-A agency must provide that applicants for and recipients ofAFDC who are exempt under andSection; 250.30 from participation in the programor who are not otherwise required by the State IV-A agency to participatewill be allowed to do so on a voluntary basis to the extent that the programis available in the applicable political subdivision and State resourcesotherwise permit. (a) The State IV-A agency shall give first consideration to applicantsfor or recipients of AFDC who volunteer to participate in determining thepriority of participation within the target populations described at andSection;250.1. (b) When an individual who volunteers to participate stops participatingin the program without good cause as defined at andSection; 250.35,  (1) If she has been determined to be exempt pursuant to andSection; 250.30,she shall not be given priority to participate so long as other individualsare actively seeking to participate.  (2) If she has been determined not to be exempt pursuant to andSection; 250.30,she shall be subject to sanction as described at andSection; 250.34. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.32 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Participation requirements for education. </ITAG>(a) To the extent that the program is available in the political subdivisioninvolved and State resources otherwise permit, in the case of a custodialparent who is not yet 20 years of age, has not completed a high schooleducation (or its equivalent) and is not exempt from participation underandSection; 250.30(b), the State shall require such a parent to participatein educational activities as described in andSection; 250.44(a)(1). For purposesof this section, custodial parent means the parent who lives with the child,including custodial parents who would otherwise be exempt under andSection;250.30(b)(9) because of the age of the youngest child. (1) The State IV-A agency may require full-time participation (as definedby the educational provider) in educational activities directed towardthe attainment of a high school diploma or its equivalent. This includesindividuals who would otherwise only have to participate on a part-timebasis because their youngest child is under 6 years of age.  (2) The State IV-A agency may excuse a custodial parent who is under age18 from the school attendance requirement if such parent is determinedto be beyond the State's compulsory attendance requirements and if theState's JOBS plan contains criteria for making this determination. TheState's criteria must:  (i) Provide that each determination is based upon an individual assessmentof the parent rather than upon the application of categorical exemptions;(ii) Not rely solely upon grade completion; and (iii) Provide for participation in another educational activity as definedunder andSection; 250.44(a) or in skills training activities under andSection;250.44(b) that are combined with education. (3) The State IV-A agency may require a custodial parent who is age 18or 19, and required to participate in JOBS under this section, to participatein training or work activities (subject to the 20-hour limit in andSection;250.30(b)(9)(ii)) instead of educational activities described at andSection;250.44(a) if one of the following conditions is met:  (i) Such parent fails to make good progress in successfully completingeducational activities, or  (ii) Prior to any assignment of the individual to such educational activitiesit is determined, based on an educational assessment and the employmentgoal established in the individual's employability plan, that participationin educational activities is inappropriate for such parent. (b) If a State IV-A agency requires an individual who has attained theage of 20 years and has not earned a high school diploma (or its equivalent)to participate in JOBS, the State agency shall include educational activitiesconsistent with her employment goals as a component in the individual'semployability plan. Any other services or activities may not be permittedto interfere with her participation in appropriate educational activitiesunder andSection; 250.44. However, a State IV-A agency may elect not to requirean individual to participate in educational activities if: (1) The individual demonstrates a basic literacy level; or (2) The long-term employment goal of the individual, as identified by theState IV-A agency in her employability plan, does not require a high schooldiploma (or equivalent).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.33 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Participation requirements for unemployed parents. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency shall require that at least one parent, in anyfamily eligible for AFDC by reason of the unemployment of the parent whois the principal earner, participate for a total of at least l6 hours aweek in a work supplementation program, a community work experience program,or other work experience program, on-the-job training, or a State-designedwork program described in the State JOBS plan and approved by the Secretary.A State-designed work program may not substitute education or trainingactivities for the work requirement.  (b) In the case of a parent under age 25 who has not completed high schoolor an equivalent course of education, the State IV-A agency may requirethe individual to participate in educational activities as defined at andSection;250.44(a) in lieu of one or more of the programs specified in paragraph(a). An individual meets the participation requirements of this sectionif he or she is making satisfactory progress as defined at andSection; 250.1.(c) An individual participating in a community work experience programunder andSection; 250.63 shall be considered to have met the participationrequirement in paragraph (a) if the individual participates for the maximumnumber of hours in any month calculated in accordance with andSection; 250.63(d)(1).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.34 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sanctions.  </ITAG>(a)(1) When an AFDC recipient who is required to participate in the JOBSprogram, including those individuals required to participate because theState IV-A agency exercised its option under andSection; 250.30(b)(9)(iii),fails to comply (i.e., fails without good cause to participate in the program,refuses without good cause to accept employment, or terminates employmentor reduces earnings without good cause), the sanctions in paragraph (c)of this section shall apply during the following periods: (i) For the first such failure to comply, until the failure to comply ceases;(ii) For the second such failure to comply, until the failure to complyceases, or 3 months, whichever is longer; and (iii) For any subsequent failure to comply, until the failure to complyceases, or 6 months, whichever is longer.  (2) Failure to participate in the program includes failure to meet StateIV-A agency requirements for orientation, assessment, employability developmentplanning, or case management. (b) For the purpose of determining that an individual's failure to complyhas ceased, a State IV-A agency may require the individual to participatein the activity to which she was previously assigned or an activity designedby the State to lead to full participation for a period of up to two weeksbefore terminating the sanction. During such participation, the individualshall be eligible for child care and support services which the State determinesare necessary for participation. If she successfully participates in suchactivities, the sanction will be considered to have terminated as of theday she agreed to participate. If no such activity is available, the sanctionwill terminate on the day she agrees to participate. (c) During the sanction period: (1) The State IV-A agency will not take into account the individual's needsin determining the family's need for assistance and the amount of the assistancepayment. (2) If the individual is a parent whose family is eligible in accordancewith andSection; 233.100, the State IV-A agency will not take into accountthe needs of the second parent in determining the family's need for assistanceand the amount of the assistance payment unless the second parent is participatingin the JOBS program. (3) If the individual is the only dependent child, the State IV-A agencywill not take into account the individual's needs in determining the family'sneed for assistance and the amount of the assistance payment.  (d) If such individual is a parent or other caretaker relative, paymentsfor the remaining members of the assistance unit will be in the form ofprotective or vendor payments in accordance with andSection; 234.60(a)(12).However, if after making reasonable efforts the State IV-A agency is unableto locate an appropriate individual to whom protective payments can bemade, the State may continue to make payments on behalf of the remainingmembers of the assistance unit to the sanctioned caretaker relative. (e) The State IV-A agency will promptly remind in writing any individualwhose failure or refusal has continued for 3 months of the individual'soption to end the sanction. The notice shall advise that:  (1) She may immediately terminate the first or second sanction by participatingin the program or accepting employment; and (2) She may terminate any subsequent sanction after six months have elapsedby participating in the program or accepting employment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.35 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Good cause.  </ITAG>For the purposes of andSection; 250.34(a), good cause for failure to participatein the program or refusal to accept employment shall be found if: (a) The individual is the parent or other relative personally providingcare for a child under age 6 and the employment would require such individualto work more than 20 hours per week; (b) Child care (or day care for any incapacitated individual living inthe same home as a dependent child) is necessary for an individual to participateor continue participation in the program or accept employment and suchcare is not available and the State agency fails to provide such care; (c)(1) The employment would result in the family of the participant experiencinga net loss of cash income. A participant may not claim good cause underthis paragraph if the State IV-A agency assures that the family will notexperience a net loss of cash income by making a supplemental payment; (2) Net loss of cash income results if the family's gross income less necessarywork-related expenses is less than the cash assistance the individual wasreceiving at the time the offer of employment is made. Gross income includes,but is not limited to, earnings, unearned income and cash assistance; or (d) The individual meets other grounds for good cause set forth by theState IV-A agency in its JOBS plan. At a minimum, the State must describewhat circumstances beyond the household's control will constitute ``goodcause.'' <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.36 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conciliation and fair hearings. </ITAG>(a) Each State IV-A agency shall establish a conciliation procedure toresolve disputes related to an individual's participation in the JOBS Program.(b) Once conciliation ends and the notice of adverse action has been issued,the individual may contest the proposed sanction. If she contests and loses,or does not contest, then a sanction will be imposed for the appropriatetime period. (c) If a dispute is not resolved through conciliation, the State shallprovide the individual with an opportunity for a hearing. The hearing processmay follow the provisions of andSection; 205.10. Alternatively, the hearingprocess may be established for the JOBS program.  However, assistance maynot be suspended, reduced, discontinued, or terminated as a result of adispute involving an individual's participation in JOBS unless the hearingmeets the due process standards set forth by the U.S. Supreme Court in<T3>Goldberg </T3>v. <T3>Kelly, </T3>397 U.S. 254 (1970).<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Operation of State JOBS Programs/Program Components  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Providing program information to AFDC applicants and recipients. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency must at the time of application or redeterminationinform all AFDC applicants and recipients, in writing and orally as appropriate,of the availability of the program activities and the supportive servicesfor which they are eligible, and agency and participant responsibilities,including: (1) Education, employment, and training opportunities available under theJOBS plan; (2) Supportive services, including, but not limited to, child care duringparticipation, transitional child care, health coverage transition optionspursuant to section 1925 of the Act, and transportation and other work-relatedsupportive services provided under the JOBS plan; (3) The obligations of the State IV-A agency including the program andsupportive services to be provided, as described in paragraphs (a) (1)and (2) of this section; (4) The rights, responsibilities, and obligations of participants in theprogram, including but not limited to, the grounds for exemptions fromparticipation and the consequences for refusing or failing to participate(including the effect on volunteers as described in andSection; 250.31);(5)(i) The types and locations of child care services reasonably accessibleto participants in the program. Such information may be provided directlyor through arrangement with others such as the appropriate human servicesor resource and referral agency; (ii) The assistance that is available to help participants select appropriatechild care services; and  (iii) The assistance available, on request, to help participants obtainchild care services. (b) The agency must also inform applicants and recipients of their responsibilityto cooperate in establishing paternity and enforcing child support obligations,as described in Part 232, and must assist individuals in obtaining thepaternity establishment and child support services for which they may beeligible.  (c)(1) After the State IV-A agency gives an AFDC applicant the informationdescribed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section, the State IV-A agencymust notify the individual, in writing, within one month of the determinationof eligibility, of the opportunity to indicate her desire to participatein the program and provide a clear description of how to enter the program. (2) After the State IV-A agency gives an AFDC recipient the informationdescribed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section, the State IV-A agencymust notify the individual, in writing, within one month of providing thatinformation, of the opportunity to indicate her desire to participate inthe program, and provide a clear description of how to enter the program.(3) The notification provision in paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2) of thissection does not prohibit the State IV-A agency from requiring non-exemptrecipients, or applicants in the case of job search, to participate inthe JOBS program prior to the one-month notice. (4) If a non-exempt individual indicates a preference not to participate,in response to such notification under paragraphs (c)(1) or (c)(2) of thissection, such a preference does not prevent the State IV-A agency fromotherwise requiring participation in JOBS. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.41 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Initial assessment and employability plan. </ITAG>(a)(1) Within a reasonable time period prior to participation the StateIV-A agency must make an initial assessment of employability based on: (i) The individual's educational, child care, and other supportive servicesneeds;  (ii) The individual's proficiencies, skills deficiencies, and prior workexperience;  (iii) A review of the family circumstances, which may include the needsof any child of the individual; and (iv) Other factors that the State IV-A agency determines are relevant indeveloping the employability plan, as described in paragraph (b) of thissection. (2) The State IV-A agency may conduct the initial assessment through variousmethods such as interviews, testing, counseling and self-assessment instruments. (b) On the basis of the assessment described in paragraph (a) of this section,the State IV-A agency must develop an employability plan in consultationwith the participant, including a participant in a self-initiated activitypursuant to andSection; 250.48 of this Part. (1) The employability plan must: (i) Contain an employment goal for the participant;  (ii) Describe the services to be provided by the State IV-A agency, includingchild care and other supportive services pursuant to Part 255;  (iii) Describe the JOBS activities, as provided in Subpart E of this Part,that will be undertaken by the participant to achieve the employment goal;and (iv) Describe any other needs of the family, pursuant to paragraph (a)(1)(iii),that might be met by JOBS, such as participation by a child in drug educationor in life skills planning sessions. (2) The employability plan shall take into account: (i) Available program resources; (ii) The participant's supportive services needs; (iii) The participant's skills level and aptitudes; (iv) Local employment opportunities; and (v) To the maximum extent possible the preferences of the participant.(3) The employability plan shall not be considered a contract. (4) Final approval of the plan rests with the State IV-A agency.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Agency-participant agreement. </ITAG>(a) Following the initial assessment and the development of the employabilityplan as described in andSection; 250.41, the State IV-A agency may requirethe participant (or the adult caretaker in the family of which the participantis a member) to negotiate and enter into an agreement with the State IV-Aagency. (1) Such agreement should indicate at a minimum: (i) The purpose of the agreement; (ii) The participant's obligations under the program; (iii) The length of participation in the program, including the numberof hours of participation per week; and (iv) The educational, training and employment activities, and the supportiveservices, including child care, to be provided by the agency during theperiod of participation. (2) If the State IV-A agency elects this option, it must give the participantsuch assistance as she may need to review and understand the agreement.(3) This agreement may be considered a contract between the State IV-Aagency and the JOBS participant, pursuant to applicable State laws andregulations.  (b) If the State IV-A agency elects to use agreements or contracts, itdoes not have to use them in all political subdivisions having JOBS programs.The State IV-A agency, however, must apply this provision to participantson an equitable basis. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Case management. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency may assign a case manager to a participant andthe participant's family. The decision to assign a case manager may bemade on a case-by-case basis. (b) The case manager must be responsible for assisting the family to obtainany services that may be needed to assure effective participation in theprogram. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.44</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mandatory components. </ITAG>A State's JOBS program must include the following four services and activities.The State IV-A agency need not make each service or activity a discreteoffering, but may combine several into a single program activity, providedthat the State IV-A agency can adequately distinguish the principal componentsfor the purpose of Federal reporting requirements. The required servicesand activities are: (a) Any educational activity below the postsecondary level that the StateIV-A agency determines to be appropriate to the participant's employmentgoal. Such activities may be combined with training that the State IV-Aagency determines is needed in relation to the participant's employabilityplan. The educational activities that must be made available include, butare not limited to: (1) High school education or education designed to prepare a person toqualify for a high school equivalency certificate; (2) Basic and remedial education that will provide an individual with abasic literacy level, equivalent to at least grade 8.9; and (3) Education in English proficiency for an individual who is not sufficientlycompetent to understand, speak, read, or write the English language toallow employment commensurate with her employment goal;  (b) Job skills training, which includes vocational training for a participantin technical job skills and equivalent knowledge and abilities in a specificoccupational area;  (c) Job readiness activities that help prepare participants for work byassuring that participants are familiar with general workplace expectationsand exhibit work behavior and attitudes necessary to compete successfullyin the labor market; and (d) Job development and job placement activity by the agency, in solicitinga public or private employer's unsubsidized job opening or in discoveringsuch job openings, and the marketing of participants, and securing jobinterviews for participants. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Optional components. </ITAG>A State JOBS program must include, but is not limited to, at least twoof the following four components: (a) Group and individual job search, as described in andSection; 250.60;(b) On-the-job training, as described in andSection; 250.61; (c) Work supplementation, as described in andSection; 250.62; and (d) Community work experience program, or other approved work experienceprogram, as described in andSection; 250.63.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.46 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Postsecondary education. </ITAG>A State's JOBS program may include referral of a participant to postsecondaryeducation, as determined necessary to meet any individual goals that aredirectly related to obtaining useful employment in a recognized occupation,within limits established by the State IV-A agency and reflected in theState JOBS plan. In accordance with andSection; 233.20(a)(2)(v), the costsof such education, including tuition, books and fees, do not qualify forFFP as special needs. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.47 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other education, training, and employment activities. </ITAG>(a) A State's JOBS program may include education, training, and employmentactivities other than those described in andSection;andSection;  250.44 through250.46, but which are included in the approved State JOBS plan. (b) In no event will a State program of public  service employment be approvedunder JOBS. Public service employment is fully-subsidized employment ina public agency. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.48 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Self-initiated education or training. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency may allow a parent or other caretaker relativeor any dependent child in the family who is attending in good standingan institution of higher education (as defined in section 481(a) of theHigher Education Act of 1965), or a school or other entity offering a courseof vocational or technical training, at the time she would otherwise commenceparticipation in the JOBS program, to continue to attend. Vocational ortechnical training leads to useful employment in a recognized occupation.It includes postsecondary education, as defined in andSection; 250.1, thatresults in other than a baccalaureate or advanced degree, and such trainingoffered by other entities such as public secondary schools and public andprivate entities that offer adult vocational education.  (1) Self-initiated activity qualifies as ``self-initiated education ortraining'' under this paragraph if:  (i) The participant is attending at least half-time as defined by the institution; (ii) The participant is making satisfactory progress in such institution,school, or course;  (iii) The course of study is consistent with the individual's employmentgoal; and (iv) The participant meets the State's criteria for determining the appropriatenessof the self-initiated education or training.  (2)(i) The State IV-A agency must conduct an assessment and develop anemployability plan, as provided at andSection; 250.41, so that the StateIV-A agency may determine the appropriateness of the education or trainingin accordance with the criteria it has established. (ii) If the State IV-A agency approves the self-initiated education ortraining, any other JOBS activities in which such individual participatesmay not be permitted to interfere with the education or training activity. However, an individual may be required to accept employment after a reviewof her employability plan, if the State IV-A agency has informed her atthe time it first approves the self-initiated activity that it could performsuch a review and reassignment. (3) The costs of self-initiated education or training under this paragraphshall not constitute federally reimbursable expenses under JOBS. (4) A State IV-A agency may restrict postsecondary education or trainingin its State JOBS plan. (5) The costs of child care, transportation, and other supportive servicesnecessary for approved self-initiated education or training under thisparagraph are eligible for Federal reimbursement pursuant to andSection;255.4. (b) If an individual in a JOBS area is enrolled in a self-initiated activitythat does not meet the requirements of paragraph (a) of this section, theState may approve such activity as a JOBS activity according to the regulationsand State criteria applicable to JOBS component activities covered underandSection;andSection; 250.44 through 250.47.  Eligibility for child care,transportation and other supportive services shall be in accordance withandSection; 255.2.  <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_[Reserved]  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart G_Optional Components of State JOBS Programs   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.60 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Job search program. </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency may operate a job search program as a componentof its JOBS program. A job search program may serve participants in eithergroup or individual job-seeking activities. (1) Individual job search includes the provision of counseling, job-seekingskills training, information dissemination and support on a one-to-onebasis. (2) Group job search includes the provision of counseling and trainingin a group setting where applicants or recipients are taught job-seekingskills, and may include a phone bank from which participants contact potentialemployers. (b) In addition to non-exempt recipients, a State IV-A agency may requirean individual applying for AFDC to participate in a job search componentunless she is exempt under andSection; 250.30(b).  (c) A State IV-A agency may require an individual to participate in a jobsearch component from the date she files an application for aid for aninitial period of up to eight consecutive weeks. Following this initialperiod (which may extend beyond the date when eligibility is determined),the State IV-A agency may require additional participation in a job searchcomponent not in excess of eight weeks (or its equivalent) in any periodof 12 consecutive months. The first such period of 12 consecutive monthsshall begin at any time following the close of the initial period. (1) A State IV-A agency may not delay the processing of an individual'sapplication for aid because of her participation in job search. (2) In no event may an individual be required to participate in job searchfor more than 3 weeks before the State IV-A agency conducts an assessmentas provided at andSection; 250.41. If the State IV-A agency determines basedon the assessment that another JOBS activity is more appropriate, or isrequired by Part 250, the State IV-A agency shall terminate the job searchrequirement. (d) Additional job search activities beyond those required in paragraph(c) may be required only as part of another educational, training, or employmentcomponent designed to improve the individual's employment prospects. (e) Job search by an individual under this section shall in no event betreated, for any purpose, as an activity under JOBS if the individual hasparticipated in such job search for 4 months (or its equivalent) out ofthe preceding 12 months.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.61 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">On-the-job training. </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency may operate an on-the-job training (OJT) programas a component of its JOBS program.  Under OJT a participant is hired bya private or public employer and while engaged in productive work receives training that provides knowledge or skills essential to the full and adequateperformance of that job. The State IV-A agency or its agent shall enterinto a contract with the OJT employer to reimburse the employer for providingtraining and additional supervision to the participant.  (b) Payments to an employer for on-the-job training shall not exceed anaverage of 50 percent of the wages paid by the employer to the participantduring the period of such training.  (c) A participant in OJT shall be compensated by the employer at the samerates, including benefits and periodic increases, as similarly situatedemployees or trainees and in accordance with applicable law, but in noevent less than the higher of the Federal minimum wage or applicable Stateor local minimum wage law. (d) Wages paid to participants in OJT will be considered to be earned incomefor purposes of any provision.  (e) If a participant in OJT becomes ineligible for AFDC pursuant to therules applicable to earned income at andSection; 233.20, or pursuant to the100-hour rule at andSection; 233.100 in the case of a principal earner inan unemployed parent case, she shall remain a JOBS participant for theduration of the OJT and shall be eligible for supportive services underPart 255 available to other JOBS participants similarly situated.  (f) If the individual would have been eligible for transitional child carepursuant to Part 256 at the time the ineligibility for AFDC occurred, sheshall be eligible for transitional child care after the OJT ends for thenumber of months that remain in the 12-month period following the monthin which she became ineligible for AFDC after OJT ended. As an alternative,the State IV-A agency may treat all child care provided after an individualin an OJT job loses eligibility for AFDC as transitional child care ifthe individual meets the requirements at Part 256.  (g) The State IV-A agency must develop qualitative measures for makinggood or satisfactory progress, pursuant to andSection; 250.1, in order forOJT to qualify as a component activity under JOBS.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.62 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Work supplementation program. </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency may operate a work supplementation program as acomponent of its JOBS program.  Under the work supplementation program,a State IV-A agency may use AFDC funds to develop and subsidize jobs forAFDC recipients as an alternative to aid.  (b) A ``supplemented job'' is a job provided under this section to an eligibleindividual by the State or local agency administering the State IV-A planor by any other employer for which all or part of the wages are paid bysuch State or local IV-A agency. (1) The State IV-A agency may use whatever means it determines appropriateto provide or to subsidize jobs for participants.  (2) The State IV-A agency may provide or subsidize any type of job. Itmay determine the length of time the position is to be provided or subsidized,the amount of wages to be paid to the recipient, the amount of subsidyto be provided by the State or local IV-A agency, and the conditions ofparticipation, except that no participant may be assigned to fill any established,unfilled position vacancy in accordance with section 484 of the Act. (c)(1) An eligible individual is an individual who is in a category whichthe State IV-A agency determines should be eligible to participate in thework supplementation program, and who would, at the time of placement inthe supplemented job, be eligible for AFDC if the State IV-A agency didnot have a work supplementation program in effect. For the purpose of thissection, time of placement is defined as the date on which the State IV-Aagency and the employer reach agreement on the terms of the placement andthe specific individual to be placed. (2) The State may establish a work supplementation program as either amandatory or voluntary program. (d) A State or local IV-A agency administering the State plan is not requiredto provide employee status to any eligible individual to whom it providesa job position or with respect to whom it subsidizes all or part of thewages paid to such individual by another entity under this program, noris it required to provide that eligible individuals filling job positionsprovided by other entities under such program be provided employee statusby such entity during the first 13 weeks in which they fill such position.(e) Participants in supplemented jobs will be paid wages which shall beconsidered to be earned income for purposes of any provision of law. (f) The State IV-A agency may elect to calculate the amount of an eligibleindividual's residual (direct AFDC) grant, if any, at the time of placementin the supplemented job and base the amount of the residual grant (theAFDC grant minus earnings and other countable income) for the durationof the individual's participation in the supplemented job (in whole orpart) on that calculation.  Such a policy is known as ``freezing the grant.''If the individual becomes otherwise ineligible for AFDC benefits, the StateIV-A agency may allow the individual to continue in the supplemented joband divert the AFDC grant to the wage pool, but the State IV-A agency shallnot pay a residual grant to the individual.  (g) At State option, individuals who hold supplemented jobs may be exemptfrom the retrospective budgeting requirements at Part 233 and monthly reporting, and the amount of the aid which is payable to the family of any such individualfor any month, or which would be so payable but for the individual's participationin a supplemented job, shall be determined on the basis of the income andother relevant circumstances in that month. (h) If an individual in a supplemented job would have been eligible fortransitional child care pursuant to Part 256 at the time the ineligibilityfor AFDC occurred, she shall be eligible for transitional child care afterher supplemented job ends for the number of months that remain in the 12-monthperiod following the month in which she became ineligible. In the alternative,the State IV-A agency may treat all child care provided after an individualin a supplemented job loses eligibility for AFDC as transitional childcare if the individual meets the requirements at Part 256. (i) A State IV-A agency may adjust the standard of need under the StateIV-A plan as the State determines to be necessary and appropriate to carryout a work supplementation program. Such changes in the need standard maybe made notwithstanding andSection; 233.20.  (1) The standard of need in effect in those subdivisions of the State inwhich such program is in operation may be different from the need standardin effect in subdivisions in which such program is not available. (2) The standard of need for categories of recipients of aid may vary amongsuch categories as the State IV-A agency determines to be appropriate onthe basis of ability to participate in the work supplementation program. (3) A State IV-A agency may make further adjustments in the amount of aidpaid under the title IV-A plan to different categories of recipients inorder to offset increases in benefits from other government-provided, needs-relatedprograms as the State IV-A agency deems necessary and appropriate to furtherthe purpose of the work supplementation program.  (j) A State IV-A agency may reduce or eliminate the amount of earned incometo be disregarded from participation in a supplemented job.  (k) Notwithstanding the time limitations on the $30 and one-third and the$30 disregard in andSection; 233.20(a)(11), a State IV-A agency may allowa participant employed in a supplemented job to receive the $30 and one-thirdor the $30 disregards for one or more of the first nine months of suchemployment.  (l) Payments by the State IV-A agency to individuals or to entities providingjobs for recipients under the work supplementation program shall be expendituresincurred by the State IV-A agency for AFDC and shall not exceed the amountthat would otherwise be payable under the title IV-A plan if the familyof each individual employed in the program had received the maximum amountof aid payable to such a family with no income for a period of either 9months or the length of the individual's employment in the program, whicheveris less. (This amount is determined without regard to any adjustments madeunder paragraphs (i), (j), and (k), and for each month of participation,may be based upon the maximum amount that would otherwise have been payablefor a month at the time of placement in the program).  (m) A State IV-A agency may determine the amounts to be reserved and usedfor providing and subsidizing jobs under this section by using a samplingmethodology. The State IV-A agency must describe its sampling methodologyin its JOBS plan.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.63 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Community work experience program. </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency may operate a community work experience program(CWEP) as a component of its JOBS program. The purpose of CWEP is to improvethe employability of individuals not otherwise able to obtain employmentby providing work experience and training to assist them to move promptlyinto regular public or private employment. (b) The State IV-A agency shall provide coordination among a communitywork experience program, any program of job search, and the other employment-relatedactivities under the JOBS program to insure that job placement will havepriority over participation in CWEP, and that individuals eligible to participatein more than one program under JOBS are not denied AFDC on the groundsof failure to participate in one such program if they are actively andsatisfactorily participating in another. The State IV-A agency may providethat part-time participation in more than one such program may be requiredwhere appropriate. (c) Community work experience programs shall be limited to projects whichserve a useful public purpose in fields such as health, social service,environmental protection, education, urban and rural development and redevelopment,welfare, recreation, public facilities, public safety, and day care. (d)(1) The maximum number of hours that an individual may be required towork or undergo training (or both) in CWEP is the number of hours whichwould result from dividing the family's monthly grant amount by the greaterof the Federal or the applicable State minimum wage.  (2) The portion of a recipient's aid for which the State is reimbursedby a child support collection (except for the $50 pass-through) shall beexcluded in determining the maximum number of hours that she is requiredto work.  (e) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as authorizingthe payment of AFDC as compensation for work performed, nor shall a participantbe entitled to a salary or to any work or training expense provided underany other provision of law by reason of her participation in a CWEP program. (f) To the extent possible, a State IV-A agency shall take into accountthe prior training, experience and skills of a recipient in making appropriatework assignments. (1) After each six months of an individual's participation in a communitywork experience program and at the conclusion of each assignment undersuch a program the State IV-A agency must provide a reassessment and revision,as appropriate, of the individual's employability plan. (2) After an individual has been assigned to a position for a total ofnine months, such individual may not be required to continue in that assignmentunless the maximum number of hours of participation is no greater thanthe family's grant divided by the highest of: (i) The Federal minimum wage; or (ii) The applicable State minimum wage; or (iii) The rate of pay for individuals employed in the same or similar occupationsby the same employer at the same site. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The portion of a recipient's aid for which the State is reimbursedby a child support collection (not including the $50 pass-through) shallcontinue to be excluded in determining the number of hours that such individualmay be required to work. (g) Participants in CWEP may perform work in the public interest (whichotherwise meets the requirements of this section) for a Federal officeor agency with its consent, and, notwithstanding 31 U.S.C. 1342, or anyother provision of law, such agency may accept such services, but suchparticipants shall not be considered to be Federal employees for any purpose.(h) Nothing in this section or in any State plan approved under andSection;250.20 shall be construed to prevent a State IV-A agency from operating(on such terms and conditions and in such cases as the State IV-A agencymay find to be necessary or appropriate) a community work experience program.(i) CWEP participants must not fill established, unfilled position vacanciesin accordance with section 484 of the Act. (j) FFP is not available for: (1) Capital expenditures, depreciation or use allowances in connectionwith a CWEP; (2) The cost of making or acquiring materials or equipment in connectionwith participation in a project; or (3) The cost of supervision of participants. (k) The State IV-A agency may offer any other work experience program whichis described in the JOBS plan and approved by the Secretary. (1) The program narrative for such a program should include a descriptionof the potential sponsors, the type of activities, the hours or lengthof participation required, target group(s), and how the program is differentfrom CWEP.  (2) The limitations on FFP for CWEP in paragraph (j) apply to all Statework experience programs. (3) Any other work experience program must meet the general program standardsat section 484 of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart H_Funding  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">JOBS allocation entitlement. </ITAG>(a) Federal matching for JOBS program expenditures is limited to a nationaltotal equal to the amounts established for each fiscal year in section403(k)(3) of the Act. (b) A State IV-A agency with an approved JOBS plan shall be entitled topayments from this annual limit. The maximum annual payment for a Statewill be the sum of two amounts:  (1) An amount equal to the State's WIN or WIN Demonstration allotment forfiscal year 1987; and  (2) An amount allocated from the balance of the annual national limitationon the basis of each State's relative average monthly number of adult recipientsas defined at andSection; 250.1. (c) In accordance with andSection; 92.23, JOBS funds allocated to a StateIV-A agency for a given Federal fiscal year are for use during that fiscalyear and must be obligated by the State no later than the end of the fiscalyear. Carry forward of an unobligated balance of Federal funds to a succeedingFederal fiscal year is not permitted. An unobligated Federal fund balanceat the close of a Federal fiscal year will be returned to the Federal governmentthrough the issuance of a negative grant award by the Department followingreceipt of the final quarterly expenditure report for the fiscal year.(d) A State must liquidate all obligations incurred under the title IV-Fgrant awards not later than one year after the end of the fiscal year forwhich the funds were awarded and obligated. The Federal share of unliquidatedobligations will be returned to the Federal government.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.71 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Allotment of JOBS limit of entitlement. </ITAG>(a) For a State IV-A agency that implements JOBS in a quarter of a fiscalyear prior to October 1, 1990, the State's allotment from its JOBS limitof entitlement for that period will be proportional to the number of suchquarters that JOBS is operational in that State in that fiscal year. (b) An Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organization which receives the Secretary'sapproval to conduct a JOBS program shall receive a direct payment for operationof its JOBS program, without the requirement for a non-Federal share, pursuantto andSection; 250.93. (1) The amount of any such direct payment will be deducted from the amountof the State's allotment, and will be proportional to the Tribe's or organization'sproportion of the State's adult AFDC recipient population, as establishedpursuant to andSection; 250.93. (2) The remaining allocation to a State IV-A agency shall be subject tothe regulations governing FFP at andSection; 250.73. (c) The following rules apply to Puerto Rico, Guam, the Virgin Islandsand American Samoa which are subject to the provisions of section 1108of the Act: (1) The limitations on payments contained in section 1108 do not applyto a State's annual limit of entitlement for the JOBS program as describedin andSection; 250.70(b). (2) The availability of FFP for child care under Part 255 and the relatedappropriate FFP rates are described at andSection; 255.4(b)(2) and andSection;255.4(g).  (3) The availability of FFP for transitional child care under Part 256and the related appropriate FFP rates are described at andSection; 256.4(b). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.72 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance of effort. </ITAG>(a) Federal JOBS funds shall not be used to supplant non-Federal fundsfor services and activities that promote the purposes of the JOBS program. (b) States must spend no less than the total of State and local expendituresincurred in fiscal year 1986 for training, employment and education programswhich had a defined purpose of preventing welfare dependency or potentialwelfare dependency. This requirement includes State and local funds expendedfor title IV-A and title IV-C work programs, including expenditures onthose programs which were unmatched, and other State and local funds expendedfor this purpose, with or without benefit of Federal matching funds. Thisrequirement also applies to expenditures for supportive services, includingchild care, expended for this purpose. In determining that State and localfiscal year expenditures are no less than fiscal year 1986 expenditures,States may use total aggregate expenditures.  (c) State IV-A agency contracts and arrangements may be made for servicesonly to the extent that they are not otherwise available on a non-reimbursablebasis. ``Not otherwise available'' here means that if the services areavailable to AFDC applicants and recipients by a provider, the providermust maintain that level of service before the State IV-A agency may contractfor additional services of the same sort from that provider.  (d) Any State IV-A agency arrangement or contract must contain a certificationfrom the provider that the services being contracted for are not otherwiseavailable from that provider on a non-reimbursable basis. Services providedon a ``non-reimbursable basis'' are those services that a State makes availableto most eligible residents or to the low income population, including AFDCapplicants and recipients.  (e) A State IV-A agency directly providing JOBS component services mustcertify in the State JOBS plan that such services are not otherwise availableon a non-reimbursable basis. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.73 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Matching rates. </ITAG>(a) From a State IV-A agency's total annual limit of entitlement, FFP isavailable at a rate of 90 percent for expenditures up to an amount equalto the State's WIN or WIN Demonstration allotment for fiscal year 1987.The State's match for this amount may be in cash or in kind fairly evaluated.(b)(1) FFP will be available for the balance of a State IV-A agency's limitof entitlement as follows:  (i) At the higher of the State's Medicaid matching rate or 60 percent for:personnel costs (salaries and benefits) for full-time staff working full-timein any capacity in the JOBS program; and all direct costs associated withproviding JOBS program services to individuals, including assessment, developmentof the employability plan, case management, and JOBS component activities.(ii) At 50 percent for: indirect personnel costs which are excluded fromJOBS matching at the FMAP rate (or 60%); non-personal services costs associatedwith these indirect personnel costs, including space, travel, utilities,equipment, and supplies; the costs of such items as JOBS program planning,monitoring, letting contracts, systems, title IV-F fair hearing activities,and other indirect costs of providing JOBS services and activities; andfor transportation, work-related expenses, and work-related supportiveservices as provided under the requirements of Part 255.  (2) A State's match for these amounts must be in cash, not in kind.  (c) The costs of services and activities purchased under contract by theState or local IV-A agency must be segregated according to the requirementsof the FMAP rate with a floor of 60 percent and the requirements for 50percent matching.  (d) A State's share of JOBS expenditures may include public and privatefunds. (1) Public funds may be considered as the State's share in claiming FFPwhen the funds are: (i) Appropriated directly to the State or local agency, or transferredfrom another public agency (including Indian tribes) to the State or localagency and under its administrative control; (ii) Not used to match other Federal funds; and (iii) Not Federal funds, or are Federal funds authorized by Federal lawto be used to match other Federal funds. (2) Funds donated from private sources may be considered as the State'sshare in claiming FFP when the funds are: (i) Transferred to the State or local agency and under its administrativecontrol; (ii) Donated without any restriction which would require their use forassisting a particular individual or at particular facilities or institutions;(iii) Do not revert to the donor's facility or use. (e) If included in a State's JOBS and Supportive Services plans, FFP isavailable for JOBS activities and services provided for certain periodsto an individual who has been a JOBS participant but who loses eligibilityfor AFDC. These activities and periods are: (1) Case management activities and supportive services for up to 90 daysfrom the date the individual loses eligibility for AFDC; and (2) JOBS component activities for the duration of the activity if fundsfor the activity are obligated or expended before the individual loseseligibility for AFDC. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.74 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reduced matching rate. </ITAG>(a)(1) FFP for a State IV-A agency shall be 50 percent (rather than therates described in andSection; 250.73) in any fiscal year in which that Statespends less than 55 percent of the State's JOBS expenditures on applicantsand recipients who are members of the State's target populations as definedin andSection; 250.1.  (2) If any State IV-A agency demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Secretarythat the characteristics of the caseload in that State make it infeasibleto meet the requirements of paragraph (a)(1), and that the State is targetingan approved set of long-term or potential long-term recipients, the matchrate in andSection; 250.73 shall be applied.  (3) A State IV-A agency need not require or allow participation of an individualin the program if, as a result of such participation, the amount payableto the State for quarters in a fiscal year with respect to the programwould be reduced pursuant to paragraph (a)(1). (b)(1) FFP for a State IV-A agency shall be 50 percent (rather than therates described in andSection; 250.73) in any fiscal year for the State'sJOBS expenditures if the State's participation rate (determined under paragraph(b)(2)) for the preceding fiscal year does not equal or exceed:  (i) 7 percent if the preceding fiscal year is 1990; (ii) 7 percent if such year is 1991, however, no reduction in FFP shallbe made in 1991 for any failure to meet the participation rate specifiedin (b)(1)(i); (iii) 11 percent if such year is 1992;  (iv) 11 percent if such year is 1993;  (v) 15 percent if such year is 1994; and (vi) 20 percent if such year is 1995.  (2) The State IV-A agency's participation rate for a fiscal year shallbe the average of its participation rates for computation periods in suchfiscal year. The computation periods shall be:  (i) The fiscal year, in the case of fiscal year 1990; (ii) The first six months, and the seventh through twelfth months, in thecase of fiscal year 1991;  (iii) The first three months, the fourth through sixth months, the sevenththrough ninth months, and the tenth through twelfth months, in the caseof fiscal years 1992 and 1993; and  (iv) Each month, in the case of fiscal years 1994 and 1995.  (3) The State IV-A agency's participation rate for a computation periodshall be the number, expressed as a percentage, equal to:  (i) The average monthly number of individuals required or allowed by theState to participate in the program, who have participated (as definedin andSection; 250.78) in such program in months in the computation period,plus the number of individuals required or allowed by the State to participatein such program, who have so participated in that month in such periodfor which the number of such participants is the greatest; divided by (ii) Twice the average monthly number of individuals required to participatein such period (other than individuals described in paragraphs (b)(9)(i)and (b)(9)(iv) of andSection; 250.30 with respect to whom the State IV-Aagency has exercised its option to require their participation and individualssanctioned under andSection; 250.34). (4) In determining the average monthly number of individuals required toparticipate as provided in paragraph (b)(3)(ii), the following individualsshall be excluded: (i) Those who are determined exempt in accordance with exemption criterionin andSection; 250.30(b); (ii) Those who on a case-by-case basis have been determined to have goodcause for not participating; (iii) Those who reside in an area of the State in which the JOBS programis not operated; and (iv) Those who have been sanctioned. (5) If the Secretary determines that the State IV-A agency has failed toachieve the participation rate for any fiscal year, if the Secretary maywaive, in whole or in part, the reduction in the payment rate otherwiserequired by paragraph (b)(1) if he finds that:  (i) The State is in conformity with section 402(a)(19) and part F of theAct;  (ii) The State has made a good faith effort to achieve the applicable participationrate for such fiscal year; and  (iii) The State has submitted a proposal which is likely to achieve theapplicable participation rate for the current fiscal year and the subsequentfiscal years (if any) specified therein. (c)(1) FFP for a State IV-A agency shall be 50 percent beginning in fiscalyear 1995 for the State's JOBS expenditures (rather than the rates describedin andSection; 250.73) if the percentage of UP cases meeting the participationrequirements in andSection; 250.33, for the preceding fiscal year does notequal or exceed:  (i) 40 percent in the case of the average of each month in fiscal year1994;  (ii) 50 percent in the case of the average of each month in fiscal year1995;  (iii) 60 percent in the case of the average of each month in fiscal year1996; and  (iv) 75 percent in the case of the average of each month in each of thefiscal years 1997 and 1998. (2) The percentage of participants for any month in a fiscal year for thispurpose shall equal the average of: (i) The number of individuals described in andSection; 250.33 who have metthe requirement therein; divided by  (ii) The total number of principal earners (but excluding those in familieswho have been recipients of aid for 2 months or less if, during the periodthat the family received aid, at least one parent engaged in intensivejob search as defined in andSection; 250.1). (3) If the Secretary determines that the State IV-A agency has failed toachieve the participation rate for any fiscal year specified above, theSecretary may waive, in whole or in part, the reduction in the paymentrate otherwise required by paragraph (c)(1) if he finds that:  (i) The State is in conformity with section 402(a)(19) and Part F of theAct;  (ii) The State has made a good faith effort to achieve the applicable participationrate and has been unable to do so because of economic conditions in theState, including significant numbers of recipients living in remote locationsor isolated rural areas where the availability of work sites is severelylimited, or because of rapid and substantial increases in the caseloadthat cannot reasonably be planned for; and  (iii) The State has submitted a proposal which is likely to achieve theapplicable participation rate for the current fiscal year and the subsequentfiscal years (if any) specified therein. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Activities excluded from FFP. </ITAG>(a) The costs of education or training activities (such as tuition, books,fees, room and board) that the State IV-A agency determines may constituteparticipation under the provisions of andSection; 250.48(a) shall not constitutefederally reimbursable expenses for purposes of the JOBS program. (b) No funds shall be used for construction. (c) No funds shall be used to assist, promote, or deter union organizing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.76</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Financial reports, records, statements and audits. </ITAG>(a) The following Departmental regulations are applicable to the JOBS program:Part 92, ``Uniform administrative requirements for grants and cooperativeagreements to State and local governments;'' Part 16, ``Procedures of theDepartmental Appeals Board;'' Part 30, ``Claims collection;'' Part 75,``Informal grant appeals procedures;'' Part 95, ``General administration-grantprograms;'' and Part 201, ``Grants to States for public assistance programs.'' (b) Financial reporting of JOBS program expenditures are generally subjectto the requirements of the existing regulations at andSection; 201.5 andandSection; 92.41, as appropriate.  (c) Financial records and accounts shall be made available for audit purposesto the Secretary or any authorized representative.  (d) JOBS program funds and activities shall be audited in conformity withthe requirements of andSection;andSection;  92.26 and 74.62(a). (e) FFP improperly claimed under the JOBS program is  subject to disallowance.If a State IV-A agency disagrees with a decision to disallow FFP, it canappeal within 30 days of the date of the disallowance decision. The proceduresfor appeal of AFDC disallowances apply, including review of the DepartmentalAppeals Board, in accordance with part 16 of the Department's regulations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.77</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Costs matchable as AFDC payments. </ITAG>(a) Costs incurred by the State IV-A agency for supplemental AFDC paymentsshall be treated as title IV-A costs with respect to which sections 403(a)(1)or 403(a)(2) of the Act apply, when such payments are made in order thata recipient's family shall not experience a net loss of cash income fromthe recipient having been required by the State to accept a job. (b) Payments to employers under work supplementation as described at andSection;250.62(l) shall be expenditures incurred by the State IV-A agency for AFDC.(c) States may claim as AFDC administrative expenditures those costs relatedto JOBS orientation, determination of mandatory status, and referral tothe JOBS program when such activities are conducted by a title IV-A eligibilityor income maintenance worker. When these same activities are conductedby JOBS staff, these costs must be claimed under title IV-F.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.78 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definition of participation for enhanced FFP. </ITAG>(a) For the purpose of determining a State's participation rate under andSection;250.74(b), the average monthly number of individuals who have participatedwill be the largest number of applicants and recipients whose combinedand averaged weekly hours of participation in the activities specifiedin paragraph (b)(1) equals or exceeds 20 hours per week.  (b) For the purpose of paragraph (a),  (1) Activities include: (i) Assessment and employability plan development, but only for one monthfor each such individual for each period on AFDC;  (ii) Any component specified in the State JOBS plan, with the exceptionof job development and job placement;  (iii) Any approved self-initiated education or training pursuant to andSection;250.48(a);  (iv) Job entry, in the following manner. For the month in which the jobentry occurs, an individual will be considered to be participating forthe number of hours of work. Hours of work will then be included with hoursof component activity in the month of the job entry in determining theaverage weekly activity level for the individual. Hours of work in thefollowing month will be counted, provided the individual retains employmentthroughout the month. However, job entries will only be considered for: (A) Individuals who were participating in a JOBS component or activityduring the month of the job entry, or the preceding calendar month, or;(B) Individuals who received job development and placement services duringthe month of job entry, or the preceding calendar month. (2) The number of hours counted for an individual will not include timespent commuting to or from the assignment or to or from a child care provider;(3) Individuals, other than those in high school, will not be consideredto be participating in an educational activity during the period betweenschool years. An individual enrolled and in attendance in high school duringthe last semester of the school year will be considered to be participatingat her average weekly attendance level for the previous school year duringthe period between school years if she is expected to return to high schoolfor the next school year. Individuals in all educational activities willbe considered to be participating for the assigned hours during shorter,scheduled school breaks; (4) An individual will be considered to have satisfactorily participatedif she attended an activity for at least 75 percent of the monthly hoursscheduled. All hours of scheduled activity will be counted if the individualhas satisfactorily participated. Neither hours of scheduled activity norhours of participation will be counted if an individual has not satisfactorilyparticipated.  <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart I_Uniform Data Collection Requirements  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.80 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Uniform data collection requirements. </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency must provide to the Department a sample of monthlyunaggregated case record data containing such data and identifiers as arespecified in andSection; 250.82, and such additional data as the Secretarymay from time to time specify in an Action Transmittal or in reportinginstructions.  (1) The sample must be provided in formats specified by the Department.Data must be submitted electronically on an on-going basis by means ofdisk, tape or electronic connection, with all cases submitted no laterthan 45 days after the end of the month in which the sample is drawn. (2) Each record of the sample must contain an identifier that is not theSocial Security number, and that protects the privacy of the individualpursuant to the requirements of andSection; 205.50.  (3) The sample must be large enough to provide a precision of plus or minustwo percentage points for an 0.2 attribute (p=20% or 0.2) at a 95 percentconfidence level.  Submission of 100 percent of unaggregated JOBS caserecords is also acceptable.  (4) The sample shall be drawn from the population of individuals scheduledto participate in a component, actively engaged in assessment or employabilityplanning in the month, or who had a job entry in the sample month or themonth previous to the sample month.  (5) For each record in the sample, the State must verify that the individualsatisfactorily participated in the sample month, as defined in andSection;250.78, except that for individuals who entered employment, the State mustverify only that the individual was employed at the end of the sample month.(b) For the purpose of determining participation rates, a State IV-A agencymust report, for each month, on a quarterly basis, the aggregate numberof individuals required to participate as specified in andSection; 250.74(b)(3)(ii).(c)(1) For the purpose of calculating whether a State spent 55 percentof its title IV-F funds on target groups pursuant to andSection; 250.74(a),and determining the amounts spent per family by component and activity,each year a State  IV-A agency may, instead of a cost-tracking system thatidentifies all funds spent on each individual, develop and submit to theSecretary a table of the previous Federal fiscal year's average total JOBScost per participant per month of participation.  (2) The average total cost data in the table must separately state:  (i) For pre-component activity: assessment and related testing, employabilitydevelopment planning, and associated administrative and case managementcosts; (ii) For each component: component costs, and associated administrativeand case management costs;  (d) A State IV-A agency must submit any other information that the Secretarydetermines necessary. (e) Until October 1, 1991, or until sample based reporting is implemented,whichever is later, the State must submit such interim aggregate hardcopyreports as are required by the Secretary. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.81 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State data systems options.  </ITAG>(a) A State IV-A agency may integrate its JOBS Automated System (JAS) withan existing or planned title IV-A system. A State IV-A agency may alsouse a stand-alone system. Either option must be a client-based informationsystem capable of producing at a minimum all data elements required inandSection; 250.82.  (b)(1) Title IV-A funding is available for planning, design, developmentand implementation of the JOBS interface between title IV-A and title IV-Frequirements.  The interface of an automated JOBS program with the titleIV-A system, for verification of eligibility and reconciliation of data,includes planning, design, development and implementation of title IV-Asystems to:  (i) Manage information on eligibility factors and target group membership; (ii) Effect notifications and referrals including non-cooperation;  (iii) Check records of applicants and recipients on a periodic basis withother agencies to verify continued eligibility; and  (iv) Notify appropriate officials when a recipient ceases to be eligible.(2) If the JAS interfaces with an existing or planned FAMIS-type systemand all FAMIS requirements are met, title IV-A FFP at 90 percent is available.Otherwise interface expenditures are matched at 50 percent under titleIV-A. (c) JOBS funding is available at a 50 percent administrative rate for theacquisition and development of the remainder of the JAS, subject to therequirements of andSection; 205.35 through andSection; 205.38. This excludesthe JOBS interface with the title IV-A system, but includes all other input,maintenance and reporting of those data elements required in andSection;250.82 that cannot be obtained from the title IV-A system through the JOBSinterface. A cost allocation plan must be approved to share the cost amongall Federal and State programs benefiting from the State's JAS. (d) Administrative funding under either title IV-A or title IV-F for systemsdesign, development, and implementation must comply with the requirementsof andSection; 95.601, <T3>et seq.</T3> <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.82 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Required case record data. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency must maintain an individual case record for eachJOBS participant. (1) For the purposes of this section, a JOBS participant is an individualwho is: (i) Actively engaged in assessment or employability planning during themonth; or (ii) Assigned to a component, including self-initiated education or trainingpursuant to andSection; 250.48(a). (2) To the extent the State IV-A agency's JAS can access the required datain the required form from other systems, duplicate entry is to be avoided. (b) The minimum data required are: (1) Case identifier other than Social Security Number, but the State mustmaintain in its files a link between the identifier and the SSN; (2) Date of birth; (3) Program status and exemption code;  (4) Youngest child's date of birth; (5) Date of most recent AFDC opening;  (6) Number of months within the most recent 60 months of receipt of AFDC; (7) Education level (highest grade completed) and date completed; (8) Literacy level, but only when the State elects to determine a literacylevel; (9) Target group codes to identify which of the target groups specifiedin andSection; 250.1 an individual was a member of, if any, at the time ofentry into JOBS, and the date of entry;  (10) Identifier for a person not exempt, because the State elected to reducethe age of youngest child exemption to less than age three, or becausethe State elected to require participation of the second parent in a UPcase where the second parent would otherwise be exempt for meeting therequirements of andSection; 250.30(b)(9); (11) Assignment status: scheduled hours, and beginning and ending dates,for each of the following that apply: (i) Assessment and employability development planning; (ii) Each JOBS component, including separate identification for self-initiatededucation or training, pursuant to andSection; 250.48(a);  (iii) Job status, including date of job entry; (12) Identifier indicating that the individual satisfactorily participatedin the JOBS program, as defined at andSection; 250.78, during the month,but only for sampled cases described in andSection; 250.80;  (13) Amount of supportive services, other than child care, paid duringthe month;  (14) Amount of child care payment for the month;  (15) Type of child care; (16) Such additional data as the Secretary may from time to time specifyin an Action Transmittal or in reporting instructions.  <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart J_Operation of JOBS Programs by Indian Tribes and Alaska NativeOrganizations  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.90 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope and purpose. </ITAG>The purpose of an Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organization JOBS programis to assure that Tribal (refers to both an Indian Tribe and Alaska Nativeorganization) members receiving AFDC obtain the education, training andemployment services they need to avoid long-term dependency. Tribal granteesare subject to all the regulations under part 250, unless otherwise indicatedin this subpart, and regulations under parts 255, 74, and 92, which includegeneral funding and disallowance and termination provisions for Federalprograms.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.91</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligible Indian Tribe and Alaska Native organization grantees. </ITAG>Funds shall be allotted to operate a JOBS program pursuant to andSection;250.71 to groups meeting the following eligibility standards: (a) An Indian Tribe, defined as any Tribe, band, nation, or other organizedgroup or community of Indians which: (1) Is federally recognized as eligible for the special programs and servicesprovided by the United States Government to Indians because of their statusas Indians; and (2) Has a reservation, which means Indian reservation, public domain Indianallotment, or former Indian reservation in Oklahoma. (b) A consortium or Tribal organization representing more than one Tribeif each participating member Tribe meets the eligibility requirements forJOBS as defined in paragraph (a) of this section and if such consortiumor organization meets the following criteria:  (1) All the participating members must be in geographic proximity to oneanother. However, a consortium may operate in more than one State; (2) The consortium must demonstrate that it has the managerial, technicalor administrative staff with the ability to properly administer governmentfunds, manage a  JOBS program, and comply with the provisions of the Statuteand of the regulations; (3) The consortium must submit with its JOBS application a resolution fromeach participating Tribe authorizing the consortium to receive JOBS fundson behalf of each Tribe in its JOBS program.  (c) An Alaska Native organization including any Alaska Native village,or regional or village corporation eligible to operate a Federal programunder Public Law 93-638 (Indian Self-Determination and Education AssistanceAct, 25 U.S.C. 450) or such group's designee. The boundaries of an AlaskaNative organization are those of the geographical region, established pursuantto section 7(a) of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, (85 Stat. 688)within which the Alaska Native organization is located. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.92</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection criteria for eligible Alaska Native organizations. </ITAG>(a) The Secretary may approve only one application from an Alaska Nativeorganization for each of the 12 geographical regions established pursuantto section 7(a) of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act. The Departmentshall designate the Alaska Native grantee for each geographic region basedon the following criteria:  (1) Previous experience in operating an effective employment and trainingprogram serving Indians and Native Alaskans; (2) The number and kinds of activities of similar magnitude and complexitythat the applicant has successfully completed; and (3) The ability to provide services effectively to all eligible NativeAlaskans residing in the region.  (b) In order to be approved an Alaska Native application must promote theefficient and nonduplicative administration of the JOBS program in theState of Alaska.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.93</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Funding formula.  </ITAG>(a) A Tribal grantee's share of program funds will be calculated annuallypursuant to andSection; 250.71 and will be based on the following ratio:(1) The number of adult members of the Indian Tribe receiving AFDC wholive in the designated service area compared to the total number of adultAFDC recipients in the State. The designated service area must includethe reservation but can not extend to areas or communities which are notdesignated by the Commissioner of Indian Affairs as ``near reservation''as defined at 25 CFR 20.1(r). Tribal grantees may exclude a portion ofthe reservation which is remote from that part of the reservation whereJOBS services are provided; or  (2) The number of adult Alaska Natives receiving AFDC who reside withinthe boundaries of the region which the organization represents to the totalnumber of adult AFDC recipients in the State of Alaska. (3) Tribal member means a person who is enrolled in, or certified as meetingthe membership requirements by the designated official of, that IndianTribe or Alaska Native organization. (b)(1) The State IV-A agency and the Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organizationmust exchange available information on adult Tribal AFDC recipients neededto determine the eligible Tribal population and to define the designatedservice area, if other than the reservation or trust lands. State and Tribalrepresentatives receiving such AFDC recipient data must follow standardsof confidentiality to assure that recipient and Tribal privacy is protectedpursuant to andSection; 205.50.  (2) If sufficient data on adult AFDC recipient members of a Tribe or ofan Alaska Native organization are not available, the State IV-A agencyand the Tribe or organization may enter into an agreement covering a mutuallyagreed upon estimated figure of the eligible Tribal population or coveringthe designated service area. (3) If the State IV-A agency and the Tribe or organization cannot agreeon the number of Tribal adult AFDC recipients or designated service area,the Secretary, in consultation with the Tribe or organization and State,will make the final determination of Tribal funding.  (c) A Tribal grantee is not required to match Federal funds. (d) States with Tribal JOBS programs in operation or a pending applicationmay require applicants and recipients living in the designated servicearea to provide Tribal membership status as a condition of eligibilityfor AFDC under the following conditions: (1) The information is necessary either to determine the number of adultmembers of an Indian Tribe or Alaska Native organization who receive AFDC,or to help determine whether such individual is to be served by a Stateor Tribal JOBS program; (2) Upon requesting information about Tribal status, the State must explainthe reason for its request for the information (e.g., to determine whichJOBS program will serve the individual), and refer the individual to theappropriate Tribal JOBS program for further information;  (3) Such information is only requested in those areas in which there isa Tribal JOBS program or an application pending and where a State JOBSprogram is also in operation; and (4) Information requested must relate only to membership in those Tribesor Alaska Native organizations operating or expected to operate a JOBSprogram in the area. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.94 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program administration, implementation and operations. </ITAG>(a) The Tribal grantee must designate a Tribal agency or department toadminister the Tribal JOBS program.  (1) The designated agency or department will be responsible for the administrationof the Tribal JOBS program including the requirements under 402(a)(19)and Part F of the Act. (2) The responsibility for the administration of JOBS, pursuant to paragraph(a)(1) of this section, includes functional areas such as exemption andpriority determinations (andSection; 250.30), orientation and referrals (andSection;250.40), assessment and the development of the employability plan (andSection;250.41), JOBS activities (andSection; 250.44 and andSection; 250.94(e)), disputeresolution and hearings (andSection; 250.36).  Certain other related functionsare retained by the State IV-A agency. These include the administrationof provisions on child care (Part 255) and transitional child care services(Part 256). (3) The designated agency or department may not delegate or contract outany functions which involve agency discretion, except as provided for inandSection; 250.10 of the regulations. (b) The Tribe or organization that submitted an application by April 13,1989, may begin operating its JOBS program as of the first day of any quarterbetween July 1, 1989 and October 1, 1990, independent of the State's JOBSimplementation date. If the Tribe or organization elects to begin operatingits program before the State, during this interim time period:  (1) The Tribe or organization must guarantee necessary child care (withoutadditional title IV-A funding for child care pursuant to Part 255) if itrequires an individual to participate in its JOBS program.  (2) If the Tribe or organization cannot guarantee necessary child careas described in paragraph (b)(1), it cannot require an individual to participatein its JOBS program but may operate an entirely voluntary program.  (c) The Tribe or organization may not begin its JOBS program prior to approvalof the Secretary. Final documentation for the application (meaning supplementalmaterials submitted after the initial April 13, 1989 application) mustbe sent to the Department at least 45 days prior to implementation of theTribal program. This will allow sufficient time for the Department's reviewand approval. (d)(1) Tribes or organizations shall not be subject to the specific requirementsof andSection; 250.12 of the regulations, but must coordinate program serviceswith appropriate agencies as follows: (i) The Tribal application with final documentation must be submitted tothe State IV-A agency for its review and comment at least 30 days beforesubmittal to the Secretary. The Tribe or organization shall consider commentsmade by the State IV-A agency in its application submitted to the Secretary. (ii) The application with final documentation must also be made availableto Tribal members for review and comment at least 30 days prior to submittalto the Secretary. The Tribe or organization must certify in its applicationthat such public participation has taken place. (2) To operate a JOBS program, the Tribe or organization must coordinatewith the State IV-A agency to ensure that interrelated program functionsare effectively performed. These functions include State responsibilities_suchas providing to the Tribal grantee eligibility notifications and the necessarychild care funds or services for Tribal participation_and Tribal responsibilities_suchas notifying the State IV-A agency when Tribal members fail to participatewithout good cause.  (3) A Tribe or organization must consult and coordinate with other providersincluding those specified in paragraph (d)(4) of this section, to identifyexisting resources, prevent duplication of services, and ensure that themaximum level of services is available to enable participants to achieveself-sufficiency.  (4) At a minimum, the Tribal grantee must consult and coordinate with:(i) The Tribal agency responsible for JTPA, if applicable; (ii) The Tribal agency responsible for other employment and training services,including those offered under the Bureau of Indian Affairs; (iii) The Tribal agency responsible for education, including any programsunder the Bureau of Indian Affairs, the Department of Interior, or underthe Office of Indian Education of the Department of Education. (5) The Tribal grantee must consult with existing formal advisory councils,such as private industry councils, on the development of arrangements andcontracts under JOBS, as described in andSection; 250.12(d). (6) The Tribal grantee must consult with private industry councils andTribal Employment Rights Offices, as appropriate, to identify, and obtainadvice on, the types of jobs available or likely to become available withina reasonable commuting distance from the Tribe's designated service areaor the organization's boundaries. The Tribe or organization must ensurethat JOBS provides training for the types of jobs which are, or are likelyto become, available in or near its designated service area or organization'sboundaries and that resources are not expended on training for jobs thatare not likely to become available.  (e) Tribal programs are subject to the requirements of andSection; 250.44but are not subject to the requirements of andSection; 250.45. (1) A Tribal JOBS program must include all the mandatory components atandSection; 250.44 unless the Tribe or organization can justify that suchactivities are inappropriate. A Tribe's or organization's application mustdescribe the types of activities and methods of delivery for each of themandatory components. (2) Tribal programs are not subject to the provisions at andSection; 250.45but must include at least one of the following components unless a Tribeor organization can justify that such activities are inappropriate: (i) Group and individual job search, as described in andSection; 250.60; (ii) On-the-job training, as described in andSection; 250.61; (iii) Community work experience program, as described in andSection; 250.63,or a work experience program as approved by the Secretary; (iv) Work supplementation program, as described in andSection; 250.62; (v) Alternative education, training and employment activities which arenot described in andSection; 250.60, andSection; 250.61, andSection; 250.62 orandSection; 250.63, as approved by the Secretary.  (A) Innovative approaches with the private sector are encouraged if theyare consistent with the purpose of JOBS to assist AFDC recipients to avoidlong-term dependency. (B) JOBS funds may not be used for public service  employment or for allowancesother than for those required for supportive services as described in Part255. (3) Because the amount of the IV-A payment is an integral part of determiningparticipation in work supplementation and community work experience programs,a Tribe or organization may operate these programs only if adequate agreementswith the State IV-A agency are implemented. The agreements should coveroperational procedures and the exchange of information, including grantlevels and child support calculations for community work experience participantsand earnings for work supplementation participants. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.95 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Supportive services.  </ITAG>(a) The Tribal grantee must provide, pay for, or reimburse necessary supportiveservices (other than child care) pursuant to Part 255, including transportationand other work-related expenses, that the Tribe or organization determinesare necessary to enable an individual to participate in JOBS. (b) The State IV-A agency is responsible for guaranteeing child care forTribal JOBS participants according to the provisions specified under Part255.  (c) If the Tribe or organization is using child care funds or servicesprovided by the State pursuant to paragraph (b) of this section, it mustensure, based on a method which is mutually acceptable to the State IV-Aagency and Tribal grantee, that necessary child care is available whenrequiring an individual to participate in its program.  (d) If the Tribe or organization does not choose to use State funds orservices for child care, it must provide (without additional title IV-Afunding for child care) these funds or services in order to guarantee necessarychild care when requiring an individual to participate. (e) Once the State has implemented its JOBS program, the Tribe or organization,in order to require an individual to participate, must guarantee necessarychild care either through the State IV-A agency, pursuant to paragraphs(b) and (c), or directly, pursuant to paragraph (d) of this section; butit may not operate an entirely voluntary JOBS program. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.96 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Waiver authority. </ITAG>The Secretary may waive any JOBS requirements set forth under section 402(a)(19)and Part F of the Act that he determines inappropriate for Tribal JOBSprograms.  (a) The Secretary has determined that certain requirements of the Act areinappropriate for JOBS programs operated by Indian Tribes or Alaska Nativeorganizations.  They cover the following provisions or sections of theregulations: (1) Section 250.10 (IV-A agency administration); (2) Section 250.11 (Statewide requirement); (3) Section 250.12 (Coordination and consultation); (4) Section 250.20 (State plan requirements); (5) Section 250.21 (State plan content); (6) Section 250.33 (UP-16 hour rule); (7) Section 250.45 (Optional components); (8) Section 250.70 (a) and (b) (Allocation entitlement); (9) Section 250.71 (b)(2) and (c) (Allotment); (10) Section 250.72 (Maintenance of effort);- (11) Section 250.73 (Matching rates); (12) Section 250.74 (Reduced matching rate); (13) Section 250.78 (Definition of Participation for Enhanced FFP); (14) Section 250.80 (Uniform Data Collection Requirements); (15) Section 250.81 (State data systems); (16) Section 250.82 (Required case record data); (17) Section 255.1 (c) and (h) (Supportive Services plan requirements).(b) A Tribe or organization may request that the Secretary waive any otherrequirements of section 402(a)(19) or Part F of the Act not listed underparagraph (a) of this section with proper justification. The Secretarywill consider the appropriateness of such waivers on a case-by-case basis.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.97</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application requirements and documentation. </ITAG>(a) As a condition of participation in the JOBS program, the designatedTribal agency or department responsible for administering the JOBS programmust: (1) No later than October 1, 1990, establish and operate a JOBS programunder a JOBS application that has been approved by the Secretary beforeimplementation and meets the requirements of parts 250 and 255. (2) Submit final documentation for the application to the Secretary forreview and action at least 45 days prior to the anticipated implementationdate. The Tribal grantee may not begin its JOBS program prior to the Secretary'sapproval pursuant to andSection; 250.94(c).  (b) The Tribal application must be submitted to the State IV-A agency forreview and comment at least 30 days prior to submittal to the Secretary.The application shall be made available to Tribal members for review andcomment at least 30 days prior to submittal to the Secretary. Commentsreceived shall be resolved by the Tribe or organization. (c)(1) The Tribal grantee must submit an update of its JOBS applicationto the Secretary for approval at least every two years. The update shallbe considered a new JOBS application and shall be submitted to the Secretaryfor approval at least 90 days prior to the beginning of the next biennialperiod. The Tribal grantee must follow the public review and comment provisionsin paragraph (b). (2) The update must consist of:  (i) Assurances regarding those parts of the Tribal JOBS application thatremain unchanged;  (ii) A description of any changes in program operations including but notlimited to changes in component activities; and  (iii) An estimate of the number of persons to be served by the programduring the next biennium. (3)(i) For all Tribal grantees the first biennial update must be submittedby July 1, 1992, for the period beginning October 1, 1992. (ii) Each approved biennial update shall remain in force until formal actionis taken (i.e. approval or disapproval) by the Secretary on the updatefor the following biennial period. (d) The Tribal grantee shall submit proposed amendments to the approvedapplication as necessary, and they shall be reviewed according to the processdescribed at andSection;andSection;  201.3(f) and 201.3(g). (e) A Tribe or organization that submits an application, an amendment toan existing application, or a biennial update to its application that isnot approvable will be given the opportunity to make revisions before formaldisapproval; upon formal disapproval, a Tribe or organization may requesta hearing pursuant to the process set forth in andSection; 201.4 and Part213. (f) A Tribal applicant must submit documentation (which is in additionto the information requested in the application) covering the followingitems for the Secretary's review before final approval of the applicationcan be determined: (1) Assurances that the administering Tribal agency will have in effecta JOBS program which meets the requirements of section 402(a)(19) and PartF of the Act, unless waived by the Secretary, and including cross-referencesto all appropriate statutory and regulatory requirements that the JOBSprogram will meet; (2) A description of the administrative process and methods of deliveryfor: (i) Providing program information under andSection; 250.40; (ii) Assessments pursuant to andSection; 250.41; (iii) Agency-participant agreements, if this option is elected; (iv) Case management system (andSection; 250.43), if this option is elected;(3) A description of the mandatory and elected optional component activitiesdescribed under andSection; 250.94(e) and the methods of delivery; (4) A description of the selection and assignment criteria that will beused to refer participants to the various services and activities providedunder the Tribal JOBS program; (5) A description of the coordination processes with other programs, includingany agreements with the State IV-A agency, Tribal JTPA agency, other employmentand training agencies and educational agencies, specifying how these otheragencies will track and report to the Tribe or organization on satisfactoryparticipation and use of JOBS funds;  (6) A description of how the administering Tribal agency will determineeligibility for work-related expenses such as clothing or transportationand other supportive services; a listing of the work-related expenses andthe supportive services it will provide to its JOBS participants; the methodsof delivering these supportive services; and (7) A description of the conciliation and hearings procedures which meetthe due process standards specified in proposed andSection; 250.36, includingnotification to the State  IV-A agency of formal decisions that a non-exemptTribal member has failed to participate. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.98</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance of effort for Indian Tribes and Alaska Native organizations.</ITAG>Tribal programs are not subject to the requirements in andSection; 250.72but are subject to the following requirements: (a) JOBS funds shall be used only for education, training and employmentactivities that are in addition to those which would otherwise be availableto Tribal AFDC recipients in the absence of such funds.  (b) A Tribe or organization may contract for services only to the extentthat such services are not otherwise available to AFDC Tribal recipientson a non-reimbursable basis.  Title 45, Chapter II, Code of Federal Regulations is amended by addinga new Part 255 to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 255_CHILD CARE AND OTHER WORK-RELATED SUPPORTIVE SERVICES DURINGPARTICIPATION IN EMPLOYMENT,  EDUCATION, AND TRAINING  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.0 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.1 State plan requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.2 Eligibility. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.3 Methods of providing child care and other supportive services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.4 Allowable costs and matching rates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.5 Child care standards.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">255.6 Uniform reporting requirements for child care.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 402, 403 and 1102 of the Social Security Actas amended (42 U.S.C. 602, 603 and 1302). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.0</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose. </ITAG>This Part pertains to child care and other supportive services for familiesreceiving, and in some cases applying for, AFDC. State IV-A agencies mustprovide such services, under conditions specified in this Part, to eligiblefamilies to allow participation in employment, education or training. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State plan requirements. </ITAG>A State IV-A agency operating a program under title IV-A must submit aSupportive Services plan to the Secretary, consistent with the schedulespecified at andSection; 250.20, which includes the following: (a) The methods the State IV-A agency will use to provide child care inaccordance with andSection; 255.3. (b) The dollar amount(s) which the State IV-A agency establishes for limitingthe amount of payment or reimbursement for child care, if the State IV-Aagency elects pursuant to andSection; 255.4(a)(1), to set an amount (or amounts)higher than the amount of the disregard at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i).(c) A description of the types of other supportive services and work-relatedexpenses, including transportation, which will be available to participantsin the JOBS program under Part 250 and other eligible recipients, the methodsby which they will be provided, the monetary limits to be applied to eachtype of service or activity, and the basis for determining need for eachtype. (d)(1) A description of the criteria which will be used to approve educationor training for child care and supportive services in non-JOBS areas ofthe State, in accordance with andSection; 255.2. Such criteria must, at aminimum, include: (i) That the education or training is consistent with an appropriate employmentgoal; and (ii) That the individual is making satisfactory progress. (2) Specification of any procedures under which IV-A staff will approve,in non-JOBS areas: (i) Education or training activities for child care and supportive services;and (ii) One-time work-related expenses which are necessary for an applicantor recipient to accept or maintain employment. (e) An assurance that procedures are established to ensure that: (1) Child care meets applicable standards of State and local law, and/orTribal law, where applicable; (2) Any entity providing child care allows parental access as requiredunder andSection; 255.4(c)(1); (3) In arranging child care, the State IV-A agency takes the individualneeds of the child into account, in accordance with andSection; 255.3(b);and (4) Child care provided or claimed for reimbursement is reasonably relatedto the hours of participation or employment. (f) An assessment of the availability of child care services provided ona non-reimbursable basis by Federal, State and local sources other thantitle IV-A. (g) Specification of a State IV-A agency's policies on: (1) Interim child care and other supportive services as provided in andSection;255.2(d); and (2) Transitional supportive services, as provided in andSection; 250.73(e)(1).(h) Specification of a State IV-A agency's policy on provision of one-timework-related expenses in accordance with andSection; 255.2(c)(3), including:(1) The types of any such expense; (2) The monetary limits to be applied to such expenses; and (3) Whether the State provides one-time work-related expenses in non-JOBSareas. (i) A description of the methodology used for setting local market ratespursuant to andSection; 255.4(a)(2). Such methodology must address ratesestablished for each type of care (i.e., center, group family day care,family day care, and in-home care) provided. The plan must address variationsin the costs of care for infants, toddlers, pre- school and school-agechildren, special needs children, whether care is full or part-time, andreduction in the cost of care for additional children in the same familyif such variations exist. The rates must be submitted to the Family SupportAdministration Regional Office and must be updated periodically, but noless than biennially. (j) A description of the nature of the State IV-A agency's efforts to coordinatechild care and other supportive services, with the groups specified atandSection; 255.3(h). (k) In States where Tribal entities are directly funded to operate a JOBSprogram, a description of how the State will provide child care servicesfor JOBS participants served by those Tribal entities. (l)(1) A description of the State's procedures for ensuring that center-basedcare will be subject to State and local requirements designed to ensurebasic health and safety, including fire safety, protections; or (2) A plan for developing such procedures. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligibility. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency must guarantee child care for a dependent childwho is: under age 13; physically or mentally incapable of caring for himselfor herself, as verified by the State based upon a determination by a physicianor a licensed or certified psychologist; or  under court supervision (andfor a child who would be a dependent child except for the receipt of benefitsunder Supplemental Security Income under title XVI or foster care undertitle IV-E), to the extent that such child care is necessary to permitan AFDC eligible family member to_ (1) Accept employment or remain employed; or (2) Participate in an approved education or training activity under JOBS(including self-initiated education or training pursuant to andSection; 250.48(a)),or in approved education or training consistent with criteria in the State'sSupportive Services plan for approval of education or training in non-JOBSareas.  (b) The guarantee under paragraph (a) also applies to Tribal members whoare subject to participation requirements under Subpart J of Part 250,consistent with the requirement in paragraph (f). (c)(1) The State IV-A agency must provide, pay for, or reimburse transportationand other work-related expenses (including work-related supportive services)which it determines are necessary to enable an individual to participatein approved JOBS activities under Part 250, including self-initiated educationor training pursuant to andSection; 250.48(a)). (2)(i) The State agency may provide, pay for, or reimburse transportationand other work-related expenses (including work-related supportive services)which it determines are necessary to enable a recipient to participatein approved education or training in non-JOBS areas;  (ii) Approval of education and training for necessary supportive servicesin non-JOBS areas must be consistent with criteria established in the SupportiveServices plan. (3)(i) The State agency may provide, pay for, or reimburse one-time, work-relatedexpenses which it determines are necessary for an applicant or recipientto accept or maintain employment. (ii) The State IV-A agency may approve these expenses through the JOBSprogram or, in non-JOBS areas, through procedures established in accordancewith andSection; 255.1(d)(2).  (d) The State IV-A agency may provide for child care and other necessarysupportive services for an individual who is waiting to enter an approvededucation, training, or JOBS component or employment: (1) For a period not to exceed two weeks; or  (2) For a period not to exceed one month where child care (or other services)arrangements would otherwise be lost and the subsequent activity is scheduledto begin within that period.  (e) The State IV-A agency must provide child care and supportive servicesnecessary:  (1) For applicants to participate in job search pursuant to andSection; 250.60;and  (2) For applicants and recipients to participate in other approved activitiesto prepare them for participation in the JOBS program.  (f) The State IV-A agency must make child care services available to applicantsand recipients who are participating in a JOBS program operated by an IndianTribe or Alaska Native organization, pursuant to andSection;andSection;  250.94and 250.95. Child care services, which are also appropriate in meetingany special needs of Tribal participants, must be made available on anequitable basis. To the extent it is appropriate, the same range of reimbursementmethods must be available to Tribal JOBS participants as are availableto participants in the State JOBS program.  (g)(1) The State IV-A agency must inform families requesting child careunder this Part of their rights and responsibilities. (2) The State IV-A agency must respond to a request for child care underthis Part within a reasonable period of time.  (h) AFDC applicants and recipients are entitled to hearings under the provisionsof andSection;andSection;  205.10 or 250.36, as appropriate, on issues concerningthe appropriateness of, denial of, prompt issuance of, or intended actionsto discontinue, terminate, suspend or reduce assistance under this part.However: (1) Changes in the manner of payment are not subject to timely notice requirementsunless they result in a discontinuation, suspension, reduction, or terminationof benefits, or they force a change in child care arrangements; and  (2) The provisions of andSection; 205.10(a)(6) regarding aid paid pendinga hearing do not apply. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Methods of providing child care and other supportive services. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency may use any of the following methods for guaranteeingthe availability of child care: (1) Providing the care directly; (2) Arranging the care through providers by use of purchase of servicecontracts or vouchers; (3) Providing cash or vouchers in advance to the caretaker relative inthe family; (4) Reimbursing the caretaker relative in the family; (5) Arranging with other agencies and community volunteer groups for non-reimbursedcare;  (6) Using the child care disregard as provided in andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i);or  (7) Adopting such other arrangements as the State  IV-A agency deems appropriate. (b) In arranging for child care, the State IV-A agency must take into accountthe individual needs of the child, including the reasonable accessibilityof the care to the child's home and school, or caretaker's place of employmentor training (based on normally accepted standards in the community or State),and the appropriateness of the care to the age and special needs of thechild.  (c) If more than one type of child care is available, e.g., center, groupfamily care, family day care or in-home care, the caretaker relative mustbe provided an opportunity to choose the arrangement. The State IV-A agencymay select the method of payment under paragraph (a). (d)(1) An individual required to participate under Part 250 may refuseavailable appropriate child care as determined by the State IV-A agency,if she can arrange other child care or can show that such refusal willnot prevent or interfere with participation in approved education or trainingactivities (including JOBS) or employment. (2) The State IV-A agency must establish at least one method by which self-arrangedchild care can be paid. (e)(1) If a State IV-A agency chooses to meet the cost of child care througha method other than use of the child care disregard at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i),the State IV-A agency must then determine AFDC eligibility and paymentamount without this disregard, except for families described in paragraph(e)(2) of this section.  (2) In the case of a family which was receiving AFDC on October 13, 1988,based on application of the child care disregard at andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i)or through the provision of special needs, if such a family would be disadvantagedas a result of meeting the cost of child care through another method whichdoes directly affect AFDC eligibility, the State must determine the family'sAFDC eligibility and payment (including child care needs), as if the methodof provision which was applicable on October 13, 1988, is still in effect. (f)(1) For cases subject to retrospective budgeting, the State IV-A agencyhas the option to meet the cost of child care directly for the first oneor two months of employment and then to apply the child care disregardat andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i) to offset income received in those initialone or two months in determining the AFDC payment for the correspondingpayment months. The State IV-A agency's payment shall not be counted asincome or resources for any month. Under these circumstances, a State IV-Aagency may not apply the disregard to income used to determine the amountof the payment for the month(s) following the month in which child careceases. (2) The State IV-A agency, at its option, may provide a supplemental paymentto a family when the amount available through the disregard is less thanthe amount that would be available if another method were used. (g) The State IV-A agency may assure the availability of necessary transportationand other work-related expenses (including other work-related supportiveservices) through direct provision, or payment, or reimbursement of costsconsistent with its Supportive Services plan. (h) Each State IV-A agency must coordinate:  (1) Its child care activities with existing child care resource and referralagencies and with early childhood education programs in the State, includingHead Start programs, preschool programs funded under Chapter 1 of the EducationConsolidation and Improvement Act of 1981, and school and nonprofit childcare programs (including community-based organizations receiving fundsdesignated for preschool programs for handicapped children); and (2) Its supportive services with related services provided by other agencies.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Allowable costs and matching rates.  </ITAG>(a) FFP is available for the actual cost of child care up to a statewidelimit established by the State IV-A agency in its State Supportive Servicesplan, but not for more than the applicable local market rate. (1) In setting the statewide limit:  (i) The State IV-A agency may choose the amount of the child care disregardat andSection; 233.20(a)(11)(i), or some higher amount(s); and (ii) The State agency may specify a higher statewide limit for childrenwith special needs. (2) The applicable local market rates must be determined: (i) Based on representative samples of child care providers or slots; (ii) For all political subdivisions or for alternative areas which representreasonable local child care markets based upon their geographic proximityor common characteristics; and (iii) Based on the 75th percentile cost of such types of care in the localareas. (However, where there are only one or two providers of a type ofcare in a local market area, the rate may be set at the 100th percentile.)(3) Local market rates must: (i) Be established for center care, group family care, family day care,and in-home care; (ii) Differentiate among care for children with special needs, infants,toddlers, pre-school and school-age children, where applicable; (iii) Differentiate between full-time and part-time care, if applicable;and (iv) Consider reductions in the cost of care for additional children inthe same family. (b)(1) Except for Puerto Rico, Guam, the Virgin Islands, and American Samoa,in the case of amounts expended for child care, FFP shall be at the Federalmedical assistance program (Medicaid) rate and is included in the titleIV-A general program entitlement. (2) For Puerto Rico, Guam, the Virgin Islands, and American Samoa, therate is 75 percent and is included in the JOBS limit of entitlement.  (c) FFP is available only if: (1) The entity providing the care allows parental access; and (2) The care meets applicable standards of State and local law, and/orTribal law, where applicable. (d) In the case of amounts expended for transportation and other work-relatedexpenses and supportive services for eligible individuals, FFP shall beat the rate of 50 percent and is subject to the annual limit of entitlement,pursuant to andSection; 250.73(b)(1). (e) The State IV-A agency is not permitted to provide payment for childcare or any other supportive service or work-related expense as an AFDCspecial need pursuant to andSection; 233.20(a)(2)(v)(B)(2). (f) FFP is not available for: (1) Recruitment or training of child care providers, resource development,or licensing activities; or (2) Payments made for care provided by parents, legal guardians, or membersof the assistance unit (including essential persons). (g) The matching rate for child care administrative costs under this Partis 50 percent and, except for Puerto Rico, Guam, the Virgin Islands, andAmerican Samoa, the amount is outside the funding limitation for JOBS.(h) The State IV-A agency must take reasonable precautions to guard againstfraud and abuse in the funding of child care costs, consistent with requirementsat andSection; 235.110.  (i)(1) Federal matching funds improperly claimed for child care servicesor administration are subject to disallowance under Part 201. If the StateIV-A agency disagrees with the decision to disallow FFP, it can appealunder existing title IV-A procedures, including review of the DepartmentalAppeals Board in accordance with Part 16 of these regulations. (2) Financial reporting of child care expenditures is generally subjectto the requirements of the existing regulations at andSection; 201.5. (3) Child care expenditures are generally subject to the requirements ofPart 201, including the provisions at andSection; 201.5(e) (regarding theapplicability of most of the requirements of Part 74 to the administrationof grants to States), the provisions at Subpart B (regarding review andaudits), and the provisions of andSection; 201.67 (regarding treatment ofuncashed or cancelled checks). (j)(1) The State must take all reasonable steps necessary to promptly correctany overpayment to a recipient or a service provider under this section(or Part 256). An overpayment to a family or provider currently receivingchild care payments or benefits must be recovered through repayment (inpart or in full) by the family or provider responsible for the overpaymentor by recovering the overpayment through a reduction in the amount payableto the family or provider. (2) State IV-A agencies need not attempt recovery of overpayments fromproviders if obligated to make the full payment under contract; however,FFP may not be claimed for such overpayments. (3) In recovering overpayments from a recipient family, the State shallprovide that the family retains, for any month, a reasonable amount offunds. (4) Recoupment of child care overpayments may be made only from child carebenefits; and recoupment of supportive services overpayments may be madeonly from supportive services benefits. Any recoveries of child care orsupportive services overpayments may be made from AFDC benefit paymentsonly upon a voluntary request of the recipient family. (5) Overpayments to individuals may be recovered from the family unit whichwas overpaid, from individuals who were members of the family when overpaid,or from families which include members of a previously overpaid family.In cases of former recipients or recipients who refuse to repay, recoveryshall be made by appropriate action under State law against the incomeand resources of the overpaid individual or family. (6) Underpayments and overpayments may be offset against each other incorrecting incorrect payments. (7) Recovery must be attempted in all cases of fraud, in all cases involvingcurrent recipients, and in all cases where the overpayment amount wouldequal or exceed the costs of recovery. (8) States must collect and maintain information on the collection of overpaymentsand make appropriate adjustments for Federal matching, consistent withrequirements established by the Secretary. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Child care standards. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency must establish procedures to ensure that center-basedchild care will be subject to State and local (and/or Tribal, where applicable)requirements designed to ensure basic health and safety (including firesafety) protections.  (b) The State must also endeavor to develop guidelines for family day careif it has not already done so.  (c) Upon request of the Secretary, the State IV-A agency must make availableinformation on applicable standards of State and local law, including therequirements specified in paragraph (a) of this section and the guidelinesspecified in paragraph (b) of this section.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 255.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Uniform reporting requirements for child care.  </ITAG>Each State IV-A agency shall be required to provide such child care informationand data as are determined to be necessary by the Secretary to ensure theeffective implementation of the provisions under this Part and Part 250.The uniform reporting requirements include, at a minimum, the average monthlynumber of families served, the types of such families, the amounts expendedwith respect to families assisted, the types of paid child care arrangements,and the length of time for which such families are assisted. The informationand data for these families shall be separately stated with respect tofamilies who have earnings and those who do not, and with respect to familieswho are receiving aid under the State IV-A plan and those who are not.Title 45, chapter II, Code of Federal Regulations is amended by addinga new part 256 to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 256_TRANSITIONAL CHILD CARE  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">256.0 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">256.1 State plan requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">256.2 Eligibility. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">256.3 Fee requirement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">256.4 Other provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sections 402, 403 and 1102 of the Social Security Actas amended (42 U.S.C. 602, 603 and 1302). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 256.0 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose. </ITAG>This part pertains to child care available to families whose eligibilityfor AFDC assistance has ceased due to increased hours of, or earnings from,employment or as a result of the loss of income disregards due to the expirationof the time limits at andSection; 233.20(a)(11). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 256.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State plan requirements. </ITAG>(a) The State Supportive Services plan specified under andSection; 255.1must include a description of: (1) The methods the State IV-A agency will use to provide transitionalchild care;  (2) The sliding fee scale under which families will contribute toward thecost of child care;  (3) The methods and procedures the State IV-A agency shall use to ensurethat fees are collected; and  (4) The application requirements established by the State. (b) A State IV-A agency which has not implemented a JOBS program as ofApril 1, 1990 must submit a Supportive Services plan for transitional carewhich includes the provisions described in this Part and the provisionsat andSection; 255.1 which apply to transitional child care (i.e., paragraphs(a), (b), (e), (f), (i), (k) and (l)).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 256.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligibility. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency must guarantee child care for a child who is:under age 13; is physically or mentally incapable of caring for himselfor herself, as verified by the State based on a determination of a physicianor a licensed or certified psychologist; or under court supervision, andwho would be a dependent child, if needy, (and for a child who would bea dependent child except for the receipt of benefits under SupplementalSecurity Income under title XVI or foster care under title IV-E), to theextent that such care is necessary to permit a member of an AFDC familyto accept or retain employment.  (b) A family is eligible for transitional child care provided the followingconditions are met: (1) The family must have ceased to be eligible for AFDC as a result ofincreased hours of, or increased income from, employment or the loss ofincome disregards due to the time limitations at andSection; 233.20(a)(11); (2) The family must have received AFDC in at least three of the six monthsimmediately preceding the first month of ineligibility;  (3) The family requests transitional child care benefits, provides theinformation necessary for determining eligibility and fees, and meets appropriateapplication requirements established by the State; and (4) The family ceased to be eligible for AFDC on or after April 1, 1990.(c) Notwithstanding when the family requests assistance under this Part,eligibility for transitional child care begins with the first month forwhich the family is ineligible for AFDC, for the reasons included in paragraph(b)(1), and continues for a period of 12 consecutive months. Families maybegin to receive child care in any month during the 12-month eligibilityperiod.  (d) The family is not eligible for child care under this Part for any remainingportion of the 12-month period if the caretaker relative: (1) Terminates employment without good cause, as defined in andSection; 250.35;or  (2) Fails to cooperate with the State IV-A agency in establishing paymentsand enforcing child support obligations, as defined in andSection; 232.12.(e)(1) If the caretaker relative loses a job with good cause, and thenfinds another job, the family can qualify for the remaining portion ofthe 12-month eligibility period. (2) If the family re-establishes eligibility for AFDC during this period,it could qualify for a new 12-month eligibility period if it met the necessaryconditions of eligibility (including the 3-of-6 month requirement). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 256.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fee requirement. </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency must require each family receiving transitionalchild care to contribute toward the payment for such care based on thefamily's ability to pay. (b) Each State IV-A agency shall establish a sliding fee scale which willprovide for some level of contribution by all recipients. (c) A State IV-A agency may vary the period of collection for differentfee levels. (d) The State IV-A agency may establish whether fees are paid to the providersor the State agency. In cases where the family's contribution is paid tothe State IV-A agency, such contribution is subject to the program incomerequirements in andSection; 74.42(c), Subpart F. Claims for Federal matchingfunds for child care expenditures shall be adjusted to reflect collectionof fees under this Part. (e) Individuals who fail to cooperate in paying required fees will, subjectto appropriate notice and hearings requirements, lose eligibility for benefitsunder this Part for so long as back fees are owed, unless satisfactoryarrangements are made to make full payment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 256.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other provisions.  </ITAG>(a) The State IV-A agency, in providing transitional child care, must meetthe requirements in andSection;andSection;  255.3(a) paragraphs (1)-(5) and(7), (b), (c), (d), and (h); 255.5; and 255.6. (b) The provisions on child care costs and matching rates at andSection;255.4 shall apply to this Part, except in the case of Puerto Rico, Guam,the Virgin Islands, and American Samoa, child care expenditures under thisPart are not covered as JOBS expenditures, but as expenditures subjectto the limitation under section 1108 of the Act.  (c) The State IV-A agency must notify all families of their potential eligibilityfor transitional child care services under this part in writing, and orallyas appropriate, at the time they become ineligible for AFDC.  The notificationmust include information on the steps they must take to establish eligibilityfor benefits and of their rights and responsibilities under the program.(d) Provision of benefits under this part are subject to the notice andhearings provisions at andSection; 205.10, except that timely notice requirementsdo not apply to changes in the manner of payment, unless those changesresult in a discontinuation, suspension, reduction, or termination of benefits,or they force a change in child care arrangements.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-23937 Filed 10-12-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4150-04-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>